<BODY DOCID=221>
Average interest rates on yen certificates
of deposit, CD, fell to 4.27 pct in the week ended February 25
from 4.32 pct the previous week, the Bank of Japan said.
    New rates (previous in brackets), were -
    Average CD rates all banks 4.27 pct (4.32)
    Money Market Certificate, MMC, ceiling rates for the week
starting from March 2          3.52 pct (3.57)
    Average CD rates of city, trust and long-term banks
    Less than 60 days          4.33 pct (4.32)
    60-90 days                 4.13 pct (4.37)
    Average CD rates of city, trust and long-term banks
    90-120 days             4.35 pct (4.30)
    120-150 days            4.38 pct (4.29)
    150-180 days            unquoted (unquoted)
    180-270 days            3.67 pct (unquoted)
    Over 270 days           4.01 pct (unquoted)
    Average yen bankers' acceptance rates of city, trust and
long-term banks
    30 to less than 60 days unquoted (4.13)
    60-90 days              unquoted (unquoted)
    90-120 days             unquoted (unquoted)
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=247>
Gulf money markets have grown reasonably
well during the past decade, but bond and stock markets remain
to a large extent fragmented and lag behind, &lt;Gulf
International Bank BSC> (GIB) said.
    The bank's economist Henry Azzam said in a review of Gulf
capital markets that investors have to relinquish traditional
investment vehicles such as real estate, foreign currency bank
accounts and precious metals.
    "Greater financial sophistication is needed coupled with
more diversified capital market instruments and a change in the
disclosure requirements on company accounts," he said.
    The GIB study reviewed capital markets under three
categories -- money markets, stock and bond markets.
    Azzam said Gulf states had been making greater use of
short-term money market instruments and banks in the region had
floated various euronotes and underwriting facilities.
    "Nevertheless, bond and stock markets remain, to a large
extent, fragmented and lagging behind," he said.
    Most debt in the region is still raised by syndicated loans
and bank facilities and very few companies had made use of
stock or bond issues. Only Kuwait has an official stock
exchange, while other Gulf nations have yet to establish
exchanges.
    But with dwindling financial surpluses in the Gulf,
governments are actively pursuing ways to develop capital
markets and set up domestic stock exchanges, Azzam said.
    He said recession stemming from sliding oil prices had
"clearly had a negative impact on the development of capital
markets in the region."
    In addition, family firms are reluctant to go public,
financial awareness among investors is still lacking and
investment analysis and corporate reporting standards lack
depth. A sharp fall in share prices in the early 1980s prompted
investors to hold on to shares hoping for an eventual recovery.
    Azzam said the absence of proper commercial law in some
Gulf countries and authorities' apparent reluctance to adopt
financial innovations had also hampered capital markets.
    He called for clearly defined laws governing incorporation
of joint stock companies and the flotation of debt instruments.
    Azzam said capital market instruments should be made
available to all citizens and institutions of Gulf Cooperation
Council (GCC) states -- Bahrain, Kuwait, Qatar, Oman, Saudi
Arabia and the United Arab Emirates (UAE). Some moves had been
taken in this direction, with Bahrain allowing GCC nationals to
own up to 25 pct of locally incorporated companies.
    Azzam said Gulf money markets had received greater depth
from the introduction of treasury bill offerings in Bahrain and
the expansion of securities repurchase regulations in Saudi
Arabia.
    But he added there is "no bond market to speak of" in Saudi
Arabia, Qatar, Oman or the UAE, with the last Saudi riyal
denominated bond issued in 1978.
    While Bahrain plans an official stock exchange and trading
in Saudi Arabia has picked up, establishment of formal
exchanges in Qatar, Oman and the UAE does not appear imminent,
Azzam said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=256>
Zambia will retain its foreign-exchange
auction system despite the suspension of weekly auctions since
January 24, President Kenneth Kaunda said.
    "We have not run away from the auction. It hasn't been
abolished at all," he told Reuters in an interview.
    He said the system would be reintroduced after current
talks with the World Bank and the International Monetary Fund
and, he hoped, would be backed by fresh foreign aid funds.
    Kaunda dismissed central bank statements the new auction
system would be used to allocate foreign exchange to private
bidders but not to fix the exchange rate.
    Kaunda said the auction system had faltered because of the
government's shortage of foreign exchange to meet demand.
    It was suspended when the kwacha's rapid devaluation and
strong fluctuations made economic planning almost impossible
for the government and the private sector, he said.
    Weekly foreign-exchange auctions began in October 1985. The
kwacha fell from 2.20 to the dollar to about 15 in 16 months.
In January 1987 the government was more than two months in
arrears in paying foreign currency to successful bidders, and
the auction was suspended and replaced with a fixed exchange
rate of nine kwacha to the dollar.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=296>
The Dutch Central Bank said it has
accepted bids totalling 4.8 billion guilders at tender for new
seven-day special advances at 5.3 pct covering the period March
2 to 9 aimed at relieving money market tightness.
    Subscriptions to 300 mln guilders were met in full, amounts
above 300 mln at 50 pct.
    The new facility replaces old five-day advances worth 8.0
billion guilders at the same rate.
    Dealers expect this week's money market shortage to be
around 12 billion guilders.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=307>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
shortage of around 800 mln stg in the money market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
some 1.61 billion stg.
    Partly offsetting this outflow, exchequer transactions and
a fall in note circulation will add around 425 mln stg and 360
mln stg respectively. In addition, bankers' balances above
target will add some 20 mln stg to the system today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=336>
The Bank of England said it revised its
forecast of the shortage in the money market down to around 700
mln stg from its original estimate of 800 mln.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=341>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with 37 mln stg assistance in the morning
session. This compares with the Bank's downward revised
estimate of the shortfall in the system today of around 700 mln
stg.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright comprising
four mln stg in band one at 10-7/8 pct and 33 mln stg in band
two at 10-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=411>
The Bank of England said it had offered
borrowing facilities to those discount houses wishing to use
them at 1430 GMT.
    The Bank also said it provided the money market 456 mln stg
assistance in the afternoon session bringing its total help so
far today to 493 mln stg. This compares with its forecast of a
shortage in the system today of around 700 mln stg.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright comprising
41 mln stg in band one at 10-7/8 pct 361 mln stg in band two at
10-13/16 pct and 54 mln stg in band three at 10-3/4 pct.
    Money market dealers said the Bank of England has recently
used the offer of borrowing facilities to signal that it does
not want to see an early reduction in U.K. Base lending rates.
    The Bank does this by lending to the discount houses at
rates of interest higher than its prevailing money market
dealing rates.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=475>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
enter the U.S. Government securities market to add temporary
reserves, economists said.
    They expect it to supply the reserves indirectly by
arranging a fairly large round, two billion dlrs or more, of
customer repurchase agreements. The Fed may add the reserves
directly instead via System repurchases.
    Federal funds, which averaged 6.02 pct on Friday, opened at
6-1/8 pct and traded between there and 6-1/16 pct. Funds are
under upward pressure from settlement of recently sold two-year
notes and from a Treasury tax and loan call on banks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=522>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange 1.5 billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-3/16 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=872>
The yen should stabilize at around
152 to 153 to the U.S. Dollar for about a year, the Bank of
Tokyo's economic adviser Koei Narusawa said.
    "Both sides are showing clear interest to secure stability
of the currencies. The major target of the Japanese government
is to maintain the yen at above 150, at least for the rest of
the year," he told reporters during a brief visit to Malaysia.
    Narusawa said the U.S. Is unlikely to push the yen up
further because this might spark off inflation and depress the
U.S. Economy before the 1988 presidential election.
    The yen is trading at around 153.70 to the dollar.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=903>
The Philippines must devalue the peso if
it wants its exports to remain competitive, Economic Planning
Secretary Solita Monsod told Reuters.
    "The peso/dollar rate has to be undercut to make our exports
more competitive," Monsod said an interview. "No question about
it. I'm saying you cannot argue with success. Taiwan, South
Korea, West Germany, Japan, all those miracle economies
deliberately undervalued their currencies."
    The peso has been free-floating since June 1984. It is
currently at about 20.50 to the U.S. Dollar.
    Finance Secretary Jaime Ongpin has said the government does
not intend to devalue the peso and wants it to be flexible and
able to continue to respond to market conditions.
    Monsod said Ongpin was looking at the exchange rate from
the point of view of finance. "If the dollar rate goes higher,
our debt service in terms of pesos gets higher, so the
financing is very difficult," she said. "But I am looking at it
in terms of the economy."
    She said she was not trying to oppose official policy.
    "I'm just saying, keep it competitive. I do not want it to
become uncompetitive because then we are dead."
    Monsod said, "The ideal movement in the peso/dollar rate is
a movement that will reflect differences in inflation (rates)
of the Philippines versus the other country. It's an arithmetic
thing."
    Official figures show Philippine inflation averaged 0.8 pct
in calendar 1986. Ongpin told reporters on Saturday it was
expected to touch five pct this year.
    He said the government and the International Monetary Fund
had set the peso/dollar 1987 target rate at 20.80.
    The peso lost 22.2 pct in value to slump to 18.002 to the
dollar when it was floated in 1984.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=913>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
shortage of around 350 mln stg in the money market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
some 525 mln stg while bankers' balnces below target will take
out around 175 mln stg.
    Partly offsetting these outflows, exchequer transactions
and a fall in note circulation will add some 300 mln stg and 40
mln stg to the system respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=915>
Saudi riyal interbank deposit rates
eased across the board in a dull market which was long in
day-to-day funds, dealers said.
    Today's quiet market continued a lull of several days in
which traders were said to be waiting on the sidelines ahead of
further clues to the direction of oil prices and the Saudi
economy.
    Dealers cited some borrowing interest in two, three, and
six-month deposits but said activity focused on short dates and
one-month deposits as banks tried to lend surplus funds.
    Spot-next was put at 5-3/4, 5-1/4 pct, down from six, 5-1/2
yesterday while one-week rates were steady at six, 5-1/2 pct.
    One-month deposits declined to 6-1/4, 1/8 pct from 6-1/2,
1/4 on Monday, while three months was barely changed at seven,
6-15/16 pct.
    The spot riyal was little changed at 3.7501/03 to the
dollar after quotes of 3.7498/7501 yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=926>
The Bundesbank is unlikely to change
its credit policies at its central bank council meeting on
Thursday, as exchange rates and short-term interest rates have
stabilized over the past few weeks, money market dealers said.
    Attention in the money market is focused on tomorrow's
tender for a securities repurchase pact, from which funds will
be credited on Thursday, when an earlier pact expires, draining
16 billion marks from the system.
    The tender was announced last Friday, because carnival
festivities closed banks in Duesseldorf yesterday, and will
close banks here this afternoon.
    Because of the disruption to business from carnival,
minimum reserve figures for the start of the month are
unrealistic, making it difficult for banks to assess their
needs at the tender.
    Dealers said the Bundesbank would want to inject enough
liquidity in this week's pact to keep short-term rates down.
    But because of uncertainty about banks' current holdings,
the Bundesbank may well allocate less than 16 billion marks
this week, and top it up if necessary at next week's tender.
    "I would not be surprised if the Bundesbank cuts the amount
a little, to say 14 or 15 billion marks," one dealer said.
    "They would then stock it up at the next tender when the
need is clearer," he added.
    An earlier pact expires next week, draining 8.5 billion
marks from the system. Banks also face a heavy but temporary
drain this month from a major tax deadline for customers.
    Banks held 52.0 billion marks on February 27 at the
Bundesbank, averaging 51.0 billion over the whole month, just
clear of the 50.5 billion February reserve requirement.
    Call money traded today at 3.85/95 pct, up from 3.80/90
yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=942>
The Bundesbank is unlikely to change
its credit policies at its central bank council meeting on
Thursday, as exchange rates and short-term interest rates have
stabilized over the past few weeks, money market dealers said.
    Attention in the money market is focused on tomorrow's
tender for a securities repurchase pact, from which funds will
be credited on Thursday, when an earlier pact expires, draining
16 billion marks from the system.
    The tender was announced last Friday, because carnival
festivities closed banks in Duesseldorf yesterday, and will
close banks here this afternoon.
    Because of the disruption to business from carnival,
minimum reserve figures for the start of the month are
unrealistic, making it difficult for banks to assess their
needs at the tender.
    Dealers said the Bundesbank would want to inject enough
liquidity in this week's pact to keep short-term rates down.
    But because of uncertainty about banks' current holdings,
the Bundesbank may well allocate less than 16 billion marks
this week, and top it up if necessary at next week's tender.
    "I would not be surprised if the Bundesbank cuts the amount
a little, to say 14 or 15 billion marks," one dealer said.
    "They would then stock it up at the next tender when the
need is clearer," he added.
    An earlier pact expires next week, draining 8.5 billion
marks from the system. Banks also face a heavy but temporary
drain this month from a major tax deadline for customers.
    Banks held 52.0 billion marks on February 27 at the
Bundesbank, averaging 51.0 billion over the whole month, just
clear of the 50.5 billion February reserve requirement.
    Call money traded today at 3.85/95 pct, up from 3.80/90
yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=943>
The Bank of England said it revised up
its forecast of the shortage in the money market today to
around 500 mln stg from its initial estimate of 350 mln.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=953>
The Bank of England said it provided 24
mln stg help to the money market in the morning session.
    This compares with the bank's upward revised shortage
forecast of around 500 mln stg.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright comprising
two mln stg in band one at 10-7/8 pct and 22 mln stg in band
two at 10-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=999>
The Bank of England said it had revised
its forecast of the shortage in the money market down to 450
mln stg before taking account of its morning operations. At
noon the bank had estimated the shortfall at 500 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1008>
The Bank of England said it had provided the
money market with a further 437 mln stg assistance in the
afternoon session. This brings the Bank's total help so far
today to 461 mln stg and compares with its revised shortage
forecast of 450 mln stg.
    The central bank made purchases of bank bills outright
comprising 120 mln stg in band one at 10-7/8 pct and 315 mln
stg in band two at 10-13/16 pct.
    In addition, it also bought two mln stg of treasury bills
in band two at 10-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1088>
Former Treasury official C. Fred
Bergsten said a new exchange rate system is needed to replace
the fixed and flexible exchange rate systems which he said had
not worked.
    "I prefer a move to 'target zones' in which the major
countries would determine ranges of 15-20 pct within which they
would pledge to hold their exchange rates by direct
intervention and, as necessary, by changes in monetary and
other policies," Bergsten, now the director of the Institute
for International Economics, said in a statement to a House
Banking subcommittee.
    "The substantial correction of the exchange rate that has
occurred since early 1985 is enormously welcome, and should
produce a sizeable reduction in the U.S. trade deficit this
year and next, but the imbalance will not fall much below 100
billion dlrs on present policies, so much more is needed," he
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1112>
Loans and advances from the Dutch
central bank to the commercial banks were barely changed at
12.9 billion guilders in the week up to and including March 2,
the central bank weekly return showed.
    The Treasury's account with the bank dropped 1.3 billion
guilders. Dealers said a larger amount of funds in the form of
interest and repayments on state loans went out than came in
the form of tax payments to the state.
    Notes in circulation rose 360 mln to 27.7 billion as the
public withdrew cash to celebrate this week's Carnival festival
or take an end-of-winter holiday break, dealers said.
    Current money market rates are at 5-3/4 to 6-1/4 pct for
call money against 5-1/4 to 5-3/8 a week ago, and between
5-5/16 and 5-9/16 pct against 5-1/4 to 5-1/2 for one to 12
month periods, dealers said.
    The cause for the rise was a rather tight 4.8 billion
guilders of special advances set by the Bank yesterday compared
with 8.0 billion guilders for the previous set, dealers added.
    They expect the money market shortage to continue around 12
billion guilders this week.
    The weekly return showed total Dutch gold and currency
reserves rose 11.3 mln guilders to 56.0 billion guilders.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1154>
The Swiss Federal Government's new series
of six-month money market certificates raised 177.5 mln Swiss
francs at an issue price of 98.401 pct to give an average
annual yield of 3.286 pct, the National Bank said.
    Payment date is March 5.
    The last series of six-month paper issued in January raised
159.6 mln francs at 98.392 pct to give an average yield of
3.251 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1421>
The International Swap Dealers
Association has developed the first standard form contract for
use by arrangers of currency and interest rate swap
transactions, said Thomas Jasper, the Association's
co-chairman.
    The contract, unveiled at a press conference , is expected
to make the 300 billion dlr a year swap market more efficient,
he said. "The contracts wil accelerate the process and reduce
the expense of swap documentation," Japsper said.
    Privately, eurobond traders estimate that about 80 pct of
all new issues eventually become part of either an interest
rate or currency swap.
    An interest rate swap occurs when two issuers, usually
acting through a bank middleman, agree to accept each other's
interest payments on debt securities. Usually, the issuer of a
floating rate debt security swaps into fixed-rate debt and vice
versa. But the obligation for repayment of the debt remains
with the original borrower.
    Bank regulators have become concerned about the use of
swaps because the middleman, usually a bank, takes on some
portion of the risk but is not required to show it on the
balance sheet as a liability and may not have sufficient
capital to cushion it.
    Kenneth McCormick, a co-chairman of the ISDA and president
of Kleinwort Benson Cross Financing Inc, said the Bank of
England and the U.S. Federal Reserve Board were expected later
today to announce joint proposals for setting minimum capital
standards for counterparties in swaps.
    The standards are part of the recently announced
convergence agreement between the two countries in which
regulators have attempted to set similar capital requirements
for institutions.
    McCormick told reporters the ISDA was concerned that a
"level playing field" be maintained in the swaps market.
    He said if U.K. And U.S. Banks were required to hold more
primary capital against swap transactions than is the current
practice, the additional costs would have to be passed on to
issuers.
    The issuers might then choose to do business with
lower-cost banks which are not subject to U.S. Or U.K. Banking
rules.
    He said the ISDA had been working on a code of conduct for
swap dealers as part of its self-regulatory effort.
    That code should be completed within the next few weeks, he
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1457>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with late assistance of around 85 mln stg.
    This brings the bank total help so far today to some 87 mln
stg and compares with its latest forecast of a 250 mln stg
shortage in the system today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1503>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
enter the U.S. Government securities market to add temporary
reserves, economists said.
    They expect it to supply the reserves indirectly by
arranging around 1.5 of customer repurchase agreements.
    Federal funds, which averaged 6.22 pct yesterday, opened at
six pct and remained there in early trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1533>
Thomas Berger, Deputy Assistant
Secretary of the Treasury, said that a further drop in the
exchange value of the dollar could cause prices to go up and
trigger inflation.
    He told a meeting of the President's Export Council that
the Japanese and the Germans have cut their profit margins to
reflect recent drops in the dollar, so prices have remained
much the same.
    But he added that if the dollar dropped further there could
be inflation in the United States.
    Berger also said that a further devalued dollar may cause
economic depressions in some U.S. trading partners, and that
would not be in America's interest because it would close those
markets to U.S. goods.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1553>
The Federal Reserve Board voted
unanimously to propose a formula for calculating the risk of
interest rate and currency swaps as part of its ongoing effort
to come up with a new capital standard for U.S. banks that
takes into account the riskiness of a bank's loans and other
assets.
    Fed officials said an identical proposal was being issues
today by the Bank of England.
    The Fed set a 60-day period for public comment on the plan.
    The proposal adopted today addresses only the credit risks
associated with interest rate swaps, forward foreign exchange
contracts and similar financial instruments.
    Previously, the Fed Jan. 8 proposed a series of guidelines
for calculating the risk of other off-balance-sheet activities
that banks would be required to take into account in
calculating the minimum financial cushion they would need to
maintain.
    Both guidelines set five broad categories of risk for loans
and other bank assets and assigned to each a level of risk that
would establish a bank's minimum capital needs.
    The additional guidelines proposed today would determine
the amount of capital support required for a bank's current
exposure for a given asset and the potential future exposure.
    The current exposure would be measured by the
mark-to-market value of the asset, which would reflect the
replacement cost.
    Potential future increases in the replacement cost would be
calculated using credit conversion factors based on statistical
analyses by the staffs of the Bank of England and U.S. banking
regulators. Future exposure would rise over the life of the
asset.
    The Fed staff said the risk gauge attempted to balance
conflicting needs for precision and simplicity.
    They ignore, for example, the relative volatility of the
particular currencies involved in exchange rate contracts.
    Board officials said the new gauge could increase the
capital required of the largest money center banks, which are
the principal participants in these types of activities.
    They cautioned the Fed board to take account of the
potential impact of the plan on the ability of U.S. banks to
compete in world financial markets.
    However, the staff concluded, "The credit risks inherent in
such contracts now constitute a significant element of the risk
profiles of some banking organizations."
    The Fed proposal would exempt all but the 20-25 largest
participants in this market, on grounds the benefits of
including the smaller banks would be outweighed by costs.
    Also excluded would be interest rate and foreign exchange
contracts traded on organized exchanges.
    Governor Martha Seger said she was concerned that Japan was
not involved in the U.K.-U.S. effort to draft new capital
rules.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1560>
The Bank of England and the U.S. Federal
Reserve Board have agreed new proposals for joint standards to
measure the risk of an array of credit exposures that do not
show up in bank balance sheets, the Bank of England said.
    The plan, covering swaps, forward contracts and options
involving interest or exchange rates, complements proposals
agreed in January between the two central banks to make
commercial banks in the U.S. And Britain subject to similar
standards for measuring capital adequacy, the proposal said.
    It said no final decisions had been reached yet and banks
have until April 16 to comment on the trunk proposals.
    The Bank of England and Fed said they had faced a dilemma.
    "On the one hand (we) are determined to require adequate
capital support for potential future exposure -- on the other
hand (we) are concerned that overly stringent capital
requirements might unnecessarily affect the ability of U.S. And
U.K. Banking organisations to price...Contracts competitively."
     At the basis of the new proposals lies the concept of the
so-called credit equivalent amount - the current value of a
currency or interest rate contract and an estimate of its
potential change in value due to currency or interest rate
fluctuations until the contract matures.
    In treatment similar to that agreed in January for balance
sheet assets, the credit equivalent will be assigned one of
five risk weights between zero and 100 pct, depending on the
quality of the counterparty, the remaining maturity of the
contract and on collaterals or guarantees to the contract, the
plans showed.
    The proposal showed that collaterals and guarantees would
not be recognised in calculating credit equivalent amounts.
    They would, however, be reflected in the assignment of risk
weights. The only guarantees recognised are those given by U.S.
And U.K. Governments or, in the U.S., By domestic national
government agencies, the proposals showed.
    The paper said the proposed rules would not cover spot
foreign exchange contracts and securities traded in futures and
options exchanges.
    It said U.S. Regulatory authorities and the Bank of England
were keen to encourage banks to "net" contracts -- consolidate
multiple contracts with the same counterparty into one single
agreement to create one single payments stream.
    It recognised that "such arrangements may in certain
circumstances reduce credit risk and wish to encourage their
further development and implementation," and said some of the
current proposals may be changed to take this into account.
    The paper said the proposed rules would not cover spot
foreign exchange contracts and securities traded in futures and
options exchanges.
    It said U.S. Regulatory authorities and the Bank of England
were keen to encourage banks to "net" contracts -- consolidate
multiple contracts with the same counterparty into one single
agreement to create one single payments stream.
    It recognised that "such arrangements may in certain
circumstances reduce credit risk and wish to encourage their
further development and implementation," and said some of the
current proposals may be changed to take this into account.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1724>
U.S. and U.K. bank regulators are asking
banks to set aside more reserves than is necessary to cushion
them against the risks posed by the interest rate and currency
swap transactions they carry, swap dealers said.
    After viewing proposed guidelines released jointly today by
the Bank of England and the Federal Reserve Board, dealers said
that in effect, regulators are asking them to set aside
reserves twice for the same risk.
    Market participants will have 60 days to respond to the
proposals.
    Adoption of stiffer capital requirements is especially
significant in the eurobond markets, which saw new issue volume
of about 183 billion dlrs in 1986 according to figures compiled
by Euromoney magazine. While no firm figures exist, dealers in
eurobonds estimate that 80 pct of all new issues are involved
in some swap arrangement. Separately, the ISDA estimates that
about 300 billion dlrs worth of swap transactions are
outstanding. Kenneth McCormick, co-chairman of the
International Swap Dealers Association (ISDA) and President of
Kleinwort Benson Cross Financing Inc, said that the Association
has no comment and will study the proposals.
    "What they are proposing is really double counting," Patrick
de Saint-Aignan, managing director of swaps for Morgan Stanley
and Co, said. Instead, he argues, banks should either be
required to hold a percentage of the face value -- say one pct
per year to maturity -- or to hold a percentage of the cost of
replacing the contract in the event of a counterparty default.
    "The potential risk factors are very large relative to what
we had expected," said a director at one U.K. merchant bank.
"What they are really doing is asking you to capitalize now --
to borrow money now -- to cushion you against risk you might
have 10 years from now," he added.(Adds title first paragraph).
    Dealers also said they believe that banks not covered by
the agreement, such as those based in Japan, will have a
competitive advantage because they will not have to pass the
costs on to customers.
    Indeed, regulators are apparently also concerned about the
exclusion of other countries from the new requirements. Federal
Reserve Board Governor Martha Seger, following approval of the
proposed guidelines by the Fed, said she is concerned that
Japan was not involved in the U.K.-U.S. effort to draft new
capital rules.
     Dealers said they were somewhat relieved to see that bank
regulators recognized the concept of netting, that is,
offsetting the amounts receiveable from and payable to a single
counterparty against each other.
    The paper said that regulatory authorities "recognize that
such arrangements (netting) may in certain circumstances reduce
credit risk." Furthermore, the paper said, if a netting
agreement could be reached that would withstand legal tests, it
might be willing to reduce capital requirements accordingly.
    But dealers said they fear regulators may insist on an
airtight netting agreement that is impossible to design.
     "One problem is that there has never been a major default
in the swaps market. So we don't know if any of the swap
arrangements will really stand up in court," said one bank
official.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1811>
U.S. Trade Representative Clayton
Yeutter said he hoped the U.S. dollar would continue to decline
in relation to the currencies of Taiwan and South Korea as a
way to improve the U.S. trade picture.
    Testifying before the House Appropriations subcommittee
which must approve his agency's 1988 budget, he said, "In my
judgment economic factors justify a continued decline."
    Asked by a committee member if he expected a further
decline, and how much, Yeutter said the Taiwan and South Korean
currencies should be adjusted to reflect "positive factors" in
their economies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1916>
New Zealand clearing house &lt;DataBank
Systems Ltd> said it will know tomorrow what services it will
be able to provide during a strike by bank officers against
trading banks and DataBank set for March 9 and 10.
    Trading banks polled by Reuters said their ability to offer
money market services during the strike depends on whether
Databank remains open, and whether the banks have enough staff
to process transactions.
    A spokesman for the New Zealand Foreign Exchange
Association said dealers would be able to trade during the
strike.
    But the spokesman added that from March 6 to 10 the value
date of currency transactions will be March 16.
    Trading bank spokesmen told Reuters they will try to honour
transactions in which an offshore party sought payment on March
9 or 10, but they could not guarantee settlement.
    The Futures Exchange said trading members and their clients
will be able to continue trading provided they have made
suitable financial arrangements.
    The trading banks affected are the &lt;Bank of New Zealand>,
Australia and New Zealand Banking Group Ltd &lt;ANZA.S>, Westpac
Banking Corp &lt;WSTP.S> and &lt;National Bank of New Zealand Ltd>.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1926>
The highly visible drama involving the
yen's sharp rise against the U.S. Dollar is obscuring the fact
that the Japanese currency has hardly budged against major
European currencies, thus creating a new set of exchange rate
distortions, Japanese and European research officials said.
    The officials, looking beneath the rhetoric of statements
by the Group of Five (G-5) industrial nations, told Reuters the
currency movements of the past two years are also creating a
fundamentally new world trade picture, which is throwing up new
trade tensions and imbalances.
    Trade figures show that the new currency alignments are
already changing the Japan-U.S. Trade axis into a Japan-
European Community (EC) axis, to the discomfort of Europe.
    In many ways, not least in terms of rare international
cooperation, the September, 1985 New York Plaza pact between
the U.S., Japan, West Germany, Britain and France to cut down
the value of the dollar was a historic one.
    But it is the underlying peaks and troughs of the major
currency movements which lay bare the real picture, in which
the Plaza pact appears as an event of prime importance, but not
necessarily central significance, the officials said.
    The officials said that when the Plaza agreement took
place, the dollar was already on its way down. The agreement
simply helped it on its way. Senior EC financial expert in
Tokyo Tomas de Hora has watched the movements closely.
    "You have to look at the dollar's peak compared with now,
and that was well before Plaza," he said.
    On February 25, 1985, the dollar peaked against the yen at
263.15 yen. On September 20, the Friday before Plaza, it was
242. Since then, despite massive Bank of Japan intervention and
periodic market frights about further G-5 concerted action, the
dollar trend has been down, down, down.
    Yet the ECU is now around 173.4 yen. The historical cross
rates for sterling and the mark tell much the same story. The
European currencies are moving back up against the yen.
    The close relationship between exchange rates and trade
flows makes it difficult to see which is driving which, but
undoubtedly the trade equation between the big three is
changing. In 1986, Japanese imports and exports with the EC
both grew by around 50 pct in dollar terms, five pct in yen.
This gave Japan a 16 billion dlr trade surplus.
    Last January, Japanese exports to the EC totalled half of
of sales to the U.S, against about a third in recent years.
    Trade with the U.S in 1986 rose 23 pct for exports and 12
pct for imports in dollar terms, but fell 13 pct for exports
and 21 pct for imports in yen terms.
    "The basic meaning for Europe is that Japanese firms have a
tremendous interest in exporting to Europe, where every unit
sold maximises profits in yen terms, which is what is important
to them. Suddenly, instead of the U.S., It is Europe that is
laying the golden egg," said de Hora.
    The EC is worried. EC business also had a remarkable year
in Japanese sales, but this can be explained partly due to its
start from a small base, compared with total Japan-U.S. Trade.
    The Japanese think EC firms are now more competitive than
U.S. Firms, a factor which is aggravating the exchange rate
imbalance, and which will cause problems.
    "This currency alignment between Japan and the EC is
reflecting the excellent performance of the EC countries. But
therefore, Japanese goods may keep their price competitive
edge," said Azusa Hayashi, Director of the First International
Economic Affairs Division of the Foreign Ministry. "If you want
my objective view, I don't expect a drastic improvement in our
trade imbalance. Last year, we asked for moderation in exports,
and this year we may have to do so again," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1931>
The Bank of England said it had invited
an early round of bill offers from the discount houses. The
Bank forecast the shortage in the system today at around 1.15
billion stg.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
some 732 mln stg and exchequer transactions some 245 mln. In
addition, bankers' balances below target and a rise in note
circulation will drain a further 135 mln stg and 30 mln stg
respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1943>
The Bank of England said it provided just
17 mln stg assistance to the money market in response to an
early round of bill offers.
    Earlier, the Bank had estimated the shortage in the system
today at around 1.15 billion stg.
    The central bank purchased bills for resale to the market
on April 2 at an interest rate of 10-15/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1949>
The Nigerian naira firmed 2.6 pct against
the dollar after 17 banks were disqualified from bidding at
today's weekly foreign exchange auction, the central bank said.
The naira finished at 3.8050 to the dollar, against 3.9050 last
week.
    Only 38.39 mln dlrs of the 50 mln dlrs on offer was sold,
with all 27 bidding banks successfully obtaining hard currency.
    The effective rate, including a central bank levy, for
transactions in the coming week, was 3.8241 against 3.9246 last
week.
    The failure to sell the whole allocation was due to the
central bank's unprecedented disqualification of 17 banks as
punishment for inadequate documentation in previous
transactions.
    Banks are required to submit proof that their bids are
based on valid commercial transactions and the central bank has
complained in the past that many are failing to produce the
right paperwork within the specified time.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1967>
The Bank of France is likely to cut its
money market intervention rate by up to a quarter point at the
start of next week.  This follows a steady decline in the call
money rate over the past 10 days and signals from the Finance
Ministry that the time is ripe for a fall, dealers said.
    The call money rate peaked at just above nine pct ahead of
the meeting of finance ministers from the Group of Five
industrial countries and Canada on February 22, which restored
considerable stability to foreign exchanges after several weeks
of turbulence.
    The call money rate dropped to around 8-3/8 pct on February
23, the day after the Paris accord, and then edged steadily
down to eight pct on February 27 and 7-3/4 pct on March 3,
where it has now stabilised.
    Dealers said the Bank of France intervened to absorb
liquidity to hold the rate at 7-3/4 pct.
    While call money has dropped by well over a percentage
point, the Bank of France's money market intervention rate has
remained unchanged since January 2, when it was raised to eight
pct from 7-1/4 pct in a bid to stop a franc slide.
    The seven-day repurchase rate has also been unchanged at
8-3/4 since it was raised by a half-point on January 5.
    The Bank of France has begun using the seven-day repurchase
rate to set an upper indicator for money market rates, while
using the intervention rate to set the floor.
    Sources close to Finance Minister Edouard Balladur said
that he would be happy to see an interest rate cut, and dealers
said any fall in the intervention rate was most likely to come
when the Bank of France buys first category paper next Monday,
although an earlier cut could not be excluded.
   A cut in the seven-day repurchase rate could come as early
as tomorrow morning, banking sources said.
    They said recent high interest rates have encouraged an
acceleration in foreign funds returning to France, discouraging
the authorities from making a hasty rate cut. But they also
pointed out that money supply is broadly back on target, giving
scope for a small fall in rates.
    M-3 money supply, the government's key aggregate, finished
1986 within the government's three to five pct growth target,
rising 4.6 pct compared with seven pct in 1985.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1976>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with a further 20 mln stg of assistance during the
morning. It again bought bills for resale to the market on
April 2 at a rate of 10-15/16 pct. Earlier this morning, it
bought 17 mln stg of bills at the same rate and for resale on
the same date.
    The Bank has thus given a total of 37 mln stg so far today,
which leaves the bulk of a 1.15 billion stg shortage still in
the system. Dealers noted that money market rates again eased
this morning and the Bank may have refused bill offers from the
discount houses at rates below its established dealing levels.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1982>
The Swiss Finance Ministry is inviting
tenders for a new series of three-month money market
certificates to raise about 150 mln Swiss francs, the Swiss
National Bank said.
    Bids would be due on March 10 and payment on March 12.
    The last issue of three-month paper conducted on February
12 yielded 2.969 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1983>
Egypt's Central Bank today set the dollar
rate for commercial banks for March 6 at 1.373/87 dollars,
unchanged from the previous rate.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10048>
French Finance Minister Edouard Balladur
discussed the need to control public spending in talks here
today with British Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson, a
Treasury spokesman said.
    The spokesman said the ministers reviewed their economies,
and public spending, domestic and European Community-wide.
    He declined to comment on whether the subject of concerted
action to shore up the dollar had arisen. The U.S. Currency
dipped sharply earlier this week after a month of relative
stability after an agreement by six major industrialised
nations in Paris on February 22 to stabilise their currencies.
REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10081>
Federal Reserve Board governor Robert
Heller said that the dollar's current level is appropriate but
declined to comment on widespread market reports of concerted
central bank intervention this week.
    "The dollar is stable again... The current level is the
appropriate level," Heller told reporters after a speech to a
meeting of financial services analysts.
    He said last month's six-nation currency accord in Paris
did not include target ranges for the dollar in an "academic
way."
    Heller also said that it was too early to determine whether
the parties to the six-nation accord were taking appropriate
steps to carry out the longer-term economic adjustments agreed
to in Paris.
    "Clearly, they've not been implemented yet... No one
expects implementation within a week or two," he said.
    Earlier today, U.S. Treasury assistant secretary told a
Senate banking subcommittee that he did not believe that West
Germany and Japan have yet carried out their international
responsibilities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10091>
Bank of England Governor Robin
Leigh-Pemberton said the Paris pact agreed between six leading
industrialised nations set no nominal exchange rate targets.
    Leigh-Pemberton said in oral evidence to a select committee
that "we did not swap numbers - we reached an understanding" on
how to cooperate towards stabilizing currencies at around their
current levels.
    He said the accord had brought Britain into a form of joint
currency float - but one which let it still purse an
independent monetary policy. "I would concede that, since the
Louvre Accord, we are acting as if we are in something,"
Leigh-Pemberton said.
    "The Louvre and Plaza accords show there is a very effective
role for the (Group of) seven central banks to operate together"
towards stabilising exchange rates," Leigh-Pemberton said.
    He did not mention this week's intervention by central
banks to support the dollar, after markets decided to test the
accord.
     Leigh-Pemberton said that "the effectiveness of this
(cooperation) is actually larger than many of us had thought in
the pre-Plaza days" before September 1985.
    He did not indicate what exchange rate levels were broadly
sought by the six nations, and noted that "we are more effective
in our agreement if we can leave the markets guessing."
    He did not indicate what exchange rate levels were broadly
sought by the six nations, and noted that "we are more effective
in our agreement if we can leave the markets guessing."
    Leigh-Pemberton said that, in principle, the Bank of
England favoured full EMS membership for sterling, provided
such a move did not endanger U.K. Anti-inflation monetary
policy. Asked whether he wanted to see U.K. Interest rates
lower, he said "the two half point cuts (this month in banks'
base lending rates) have been appropriate up until now."
    Leigh-Pemberton said he preferred a "cautious step-by-step
approach" to reducing short term interest rates, not least
because "we have a potential problem with inflation."
    Underlying U.K. Inflation was currently around 4.0 pct, "one
of the highest" among industrialised nations, he added.
    Leigh-Pemberton said the Bank of England had not wanted
base rates to fall before the unveiling of the 1987/88 budget
on March 17, but he said pressure from financial markets for
such a move had proved irresistible. Base rates are now at 10
pct.
    Regarding sterling's relationship with oil, Leigh-Pemberton
said that the pound could be seen being undervalued overall.
    He said the current oil price of some 18 dlrs a barrel
might suggest a level of 74 on the Bank of England's sterling
index, when compared with the index's level before oil prices
dropped from around the 30 dlr level. The index, base 1975,
closed here today at 72.1, unchanged from the previous close.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10191>
The former chief currency
dealer of Herstatt Bank, which collapsed in 1974 on foreign
exchange speculation in West Germany's biggest banking crash,
can stand trial for damages, a court ruled.
    The court overturned a claim by Danny Dattel that a case
for damages should not be allowed after such a long interval.
    Herstatt creditors are seeking 12.5 mln marks from Dattel,
whom they accuse of causing losses at the bank of over 500 mln
marks by manipulating forward foreign exchange contracts.
    The crash of the private Herstatt bank with losses of over
one billion marks stunned West Germany's business community,
and led to a tightening of banking regulations.
    The losses were even greater than the 480 mln marks
announced recently by Volkswagen as a result of fraud in
currency transactions.
    Ivan Herstatt, managing director of the bank when it
collapsed, was sentenced to four and a half years in prison in
1984 but appealed. Six other people associated with the bank
were jailed in 1983.
    But Dattel was freed from prosecution after he produced
medical evidence of paranoia caused by Nazi persecution during
his childhood, which might have led him to take his own life.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10308>
The 50-day provisional 1987/88 budget,
adopted today by the government, allows the Finance Ministry to
issue up to 14,600 billion yen worth of foreign exchange fund
financing bills, government sources said.
    Foreign exchange dealers said the yen funds would be used
to buy dollars, to prevent a further dollar fall.
    The government sources said the amount, covering the first
50 days of the year starting April 1, accounts for more than 90
pct of the 16,000 billion yen in bills incorporated in the full
budget.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10321>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
shortage of around 700 mln stg in the money market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands will drain some 501 mln stg while a rise in
note circulation and bankers' balances below target will take
out around 285 mln stg and 45 mln stg respectively.
    Partly offsetting these outflows, exchequer transactions
will add some 120 mln stg to the system today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10340>
Italy's gross domestic product (GDP) will
grow three pct in real terms this year and 2.7 pct in 1988,
said economic information company Data Resources Europe Inc
(DRI).
    Michel Girardin, DRI Europe's senior economist, said at a
conference that Italian GDP growth this year "will be mainly
driven by consumption and especially investment."
    Girardin said the driving force behind GDP growth next year
will shift from domestic demand to exports as a result of
expected depreciation of the lira against the major currencies.
    Italy's budget ministry said yesterday that GDP rose 2.7
pct in real terms in 1986.
    DRI forecast that inflation, which was an average 6.3 pct
in 1986, will be under five pct this year and that interest
rates should drop two pct.
    Girardin said the lira is expected to appreciate 14 pct
against the dollar this year following last year's 22 pct
appreciation. An expected German mark appreciation against the
dollar means that the lira should lose about six pct of its
value relative to the German currency, he said.
    DRI estimates that foreign demand for Italian products
should grow by a 3.2 pct this year following last year's 6.2
pct increase.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10344>
Recent slackness on Dutch capital
markets has led some bankers to question the Central Bank's
policy of pegging the guilder firmly to the West German mark
and to ask for more flexiblility in exchange rate policy.
    While agreeing with the Bank's commitment to defend the
guilder strongly, some bankers want the Bank to make more use
of the range within which the guilder and the mark can
fluctuate against each other in the European Monetary System
(EMS).
    Roelof Nelissen, chairman of Amsterdam-Rotterdam Bank NV
(Amro) said the Central Bank's policy was overcautious.
    "I would like to suggest that the Bank use more freely the
range given to the guilder in the EMS," Nelissen said at the
presentation of Amro's 1986 annual report last week.
    Within the EMS, the mark is allowed to fluctuate against
the guilder between 110.1675 and 115.235 guilders per 100.
    The Central Bank maintains a stricter policy and tries to
keep the mark below the 113.00 guilders per 100. It regards a
stable exchange rate as its main target, using interest rate
policies to influence the exchange rate.
    The preference of exchange rate goals above interest rate
aims goes almost undisputed in the Netherlands.
    Critics say the Bank keeps the reins unnecessarily short.
    Rabobank Nederland said in its latest economic bulletin: "By
maintaining the 113.00 limit, the Central Bank raises the
expectation it will always intervene above that level. If it
suddenly needs more flexibility it will find it very hard to
obtain."
    Amro's Nelissen said relatively small changes in interest
rates and exchange rates could cause substantial flows of
securities business and sharp fluctuations on the Dutch capital
market. Large interest rate changes were often needed to bring
about small changes in the guilder/mark exchange rate, he
added.
    Unlike Amro, Algemene Bank Nederland NV (ABN) says this is
a price the Dutch have to pay. It fully agrees with the Central
Bank's policy, director-general Julien Geertsema told Reuters,
noting a 1983 decision not to revalue the guilder fully with
the mark in the EMS hurt confidence in the Dutch currency.
    "It is a pity we need such a wide interest rate difference
between West Germany to maintain the exchange rate," he added.
    Interest rate differentials between West Germany and the
Netherlands are the main factors that trigger capital flows
between the two countries, as the economic performance of the
two does not differ much, economists said.
    Data on 1986 capital flows between West Germany and the
Netherlands have not yet been released, but in 1985 they
accounted for only 10 pct of total trade flows between the two
countries, put at 110 billion guilders for 1986 by the
Dutch-German Chamber of Commerce earlier this month.
    Economists say capital flows are more sensitive to interest
and exchange rates.
    West Germany is the Netherlands' largest single trading
partner, taking 28 pct of Dutch exports and providing 26 pct of
imports in the last quarter of 1986, Central Bureau of
Statistics figures show.
    At the moment, the rates for three month euromark deposits
trade around 4.0 pct while the same deposits in guilders have a
rate of around 5-7/16 pct.
    Amro bank argues that the Dutch real interest rate will
even rise further because of expectations of deflation here in
1987, contrasting with slight inflation in West Germany.
    In the Netherlands, the cost of living is expected to
decrease by 1.5 pct at a GNP growth rate of two pct, the Dutch
Central Planning Agency said in its 1987 forecast last month.
German GNP is seen rising by two to 2.5 pct, but with inflation
between zero and 1.0 pct, according to most German forecasts.
    But despite this upward push on real Dutch rates, money
dealers do not expect the Central Bank to cut official rates
independently without prior moves by the Bundesbank.
    Following the West German interest rate cuts on January 22,
the Dutch Central Bank did not lower its rates but set a 0.5
pct lower tariff for special advances and abandoned its credit
surcharge. Most traders were surprised by this move as they had
expected the Bank to follow suit unconditionally, they said.
    The Bank said it lowered the rate with the largest impact
on the money market as far as the exchange rate permitted.
    While not entirely unsympathetic to critics of its
policies, the Central Bank keeps its grip firm and the range
narrow.
    "The European Monetary System is not only a relationship
between the guilder and the mark. Many times widening of the
margin between the two would implicate we have to buy or sell
large amounts of a third currency," Central Bank vice-director
Jan-Hendrik Du Marchie Sarvaas said.
    "If we allowed the guilder to become a little cheaper, the
markets would start to believe it was weak. We don't want that.
We want to make clear that the guilder is just as strong as the
mark," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10354>
The Bank of Spain suspended its daily
money market assistance obliging borrowers to take funds from
the second window, where on Wednesday rates were raised to 16
pct compared with 14 pct for normal overnight funds.
    Money market sources said in view of high borrower demand
the suspension was likely to remain in effect until April 3,
the start of the next 10-day accounting period for reserve
requirements. The suspension comes after the Bank yesterday
gave 1,145 billion pesetas assistance, a record high for this
year.
    It said 90 billion pesetas was provided at the second
window.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10356>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with 265 mln stg in assistance this morning.
    This compares with the bank's estimate of the shortage in
the system of 750 mln stg, earlier revised up from 700 mln.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright comprising
119 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct, 144 mln stg in band two
at 9-13/16 pct and two mln stg in band three at 9-3/4 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10357>
The Bank of Japan intervened in the
market to keep the dollar above 149 yen but the unit was under
strong selling pressure by an investment trust, dealers said.
    The central bank stepped into the market when the dollar
fell towards 149.00 yen, but a trust bank aggressively sold
dollars to hedge currency risks, and the Bank intervened again
at 149.00, they said.
    The trust bank apparently changed its earlier view that the
dollar would rise and started selling relatively large amounts
of dollars, pushing the unit down to 148.80 at one point,
brokers said.
    One dealer estimated that the Bank bought 400 mln to 500
mln dlrs as it tried to keep the U.S. Currency above 149 yen.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10358>
The Bank of France intervened in the
Paris foreign exchange market this morning for the third
successive day, banking sources said.
    Like yesterday, it bought dollars and sold yen in small
amounts, they said.
    One dealer said it was seen in the market twice in early
dealing, buying five mln dlrs each time.
    Other dealers also reported small-scale intervention to
stabilise the dollar after aggressive selling overnight in
Tokyo, where the Bank of Japan also intervened again.
    The dollar steadied at around 6.0650/0700 francs after
easing in early trading to 6.0615/35 from an opening 6.0700/50.
It closed yesterday at 6.0800/30.
    One major french bank said it bought 10 mln dlrs for the
central bank, selling yen, within a trading range of 148.20/30
yen to the dollar, compared with yesterday's 149.28 rate at
which intervention was carried out here.
    The yen later firmed to around 147.90/148.00.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10359>
The Bundesbank entered the open
market in the late morning to buy dollars against yen in
concert with the Bank of France, dealers said.
    The Bundesbank came into the market when the dollar was
around 148.10 yen just after it had fallen below 148 to touch
147.80 at 1027 GMT. The move had little effect, with the dollar
still testing 148 yen ahead of the official fixing.
    Dealers said the intervention was for fairly small amounts,
in contrast to the Bundesbank's activity on Wednesday when
dealers reported it bought about 100 mln dlrs.
    The Bundesbank had no comment.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10364>
The 50-day provisional 1987/88 budget,
adopted today by the government, allows the Finance Ministry to
issue up to 14,600 billion yen worth of foreign exchange fund
financing bills, government sources said.
    Foreign exchange dealers said the yen funds would be used
to buy dollars, to prevent a further dollar fall.
    The government sources said the amount, covering the first
50 days of the year starting April 1, accounts for more than 90
pct of the 16,000 billion yen in bills incorporated in the full
budget.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10382>
The Swiss National Bank bought dollars
against yen today, a spokesman for the bank said.
    He declined to say how many dollars the bank bought or when
precisely it intervened.
    Swiss foreign exchange dealers described the National
Bank's purchases as modest, perhaps amounting to no more than
20 or 30 mln dlrs.
    The Bank of France, which was reported buying dollars
against the yen in Paris, had made inquiries with Swiss banks
as well, and the Bundesbank had also intervened. Bank of Japan
dollar purchases today were perhaps 1.2 to 1.5 billion dlrs.
    Dealers said this tended to confirm the market's impression
that major industrial countries had agreed at the Paris meeting
on an effective floor for the dollar of 148 yen, and the market
seemed ready to test it.
    Commercial clients were also selling dollars against the
yen as the end of the Japanese fiscal year on March 31 drew
closer. Today's dealings in spot currencies are booked for
March 31.
    One dealer said he had the feeling Japanese companies had
been asked by the Bank of Japan not to sell dollars at this
point, but some, while sticking to the letter of that request,
were offering dollars forward today, rather than lose out if
the dollar fell further.
    The run on the dollar against the yen came in a market
thinned by the absence of many dealers for a Forex Club meeting
in Hamburg.
    Trading was, in fact, rather light against currencies other
than the yen, the dollar holding little changed through the
day.
    The market now expected the U.S. Federal Reserve to
intervene in support of the dollar. "But they will probably do
it only half-heartedly, so I don't think it will matter too
much on rates," one dealer said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10416>
The Bank of England said it gave the
money market a further 663 mln stg assistance in the afternoon
session. This takes the Bank's total assistance so far today to
928 mln stg and compares with its forecast shortage which it
earlier revised up to 850 mln stg from 750 mln.
    The central bank purchased bills in band one at 9-7/8 pct
comprising 267 mln stg bank bills, four mln stg local authority
bills and one mln stg treasury bills. It also bought 378 mln
stg bank bills and 13 mln stg of treasury bills in band two at
9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10418>
The Austrian National Bank did not
intervene on the foreign exchange markets today to support the
dollar, deputy banking department chief Herbert Danzinger told
Reuters.
    He denied a suggestion by a dealer at one Vienna bank that
the National Bank had sold marks to support the U.S. Currency.
    Senior dealers at Creditanstalt and Girozentrale, Austria's
two largest banks, said they would have been aware of any
National Bank intervention. Any dollar purchases by the Bank
today were for purely day-to-day purposes, they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10475>
U.S. dealers said the New York Federal
Reserve Bank has intervened in the foreign exchange market
today buying dollars against yen.
    Fed officials do not comment on such intervention, but
dealers said it appeared that the Fed had intervened when the
dollar reached 147.50 yen in New York.
    The dollar subsequently hovered at 147.55/65 yen.
    Dealers said they were uncertain about the size of the
intervention, but some said it was only for a small amount.
They were also uncertain whether the Fed intervened on its own
account, or if it executed orders for the Bank of Japan.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10503>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange one billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-1/8 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10546>
The price of gold bullion and share
prices of North American gold stocks are benefiting from
continued weakness in the U.S. dollar, analysts said.
    "There's been a tug of war between the (currency)
speculators and the central banks over the U.S. dollar and it
looks like the game has gone to the speculators," said John Ing
at Maison Placements Canada Inc.
    The dollar remained close to post-World War II lows today
against the Japanese yen despite buying by several central
banks, including the Federal Reserve, dealers said.
    A drop in the dollar means uncertainty and gold is the
traditional hedge against uncertainty, Ing noted.
    Another analyst, Richard Cohen at Brown Baldwin Nisker Ltd,
noted that "a lot of foreign investors are holding U.S. dollars.
If they see they are losing money, they move back into gold."
    A dollar decline also has inflationary implications, Ing
said, adding that Maison Placements sees inflation rising to a
four pct annual rate from the current level of about three pct.
    Ing predicts gold will peak at 510 dlrs this year from its
current level of about 416 dlrs per ounce. Cohen sees an
average price of 425 dlrs, and another analyst, Michael
Pickens, at Yorkton Securities, puts the average at 450 dlrs,
with a possible spike above 500 dlrs.
    However, gold stocks in the U.S. and Canada have risen far
faster in recent months than the price of the metal itself,
causing concern among analysts that a correction lies somewhere
in the future. But for now, all analysts say there is no sign
the buying pressure is slowing down. "The stocks have run an
incredible way," Cohen said.
    On U.S. markets today, ASA Ltd &lt;ASA> rose 4-1/8 to 61-1/2,
Campbell Red Lake Mines &lt;CRK> was up 1-3/8 and Newmont Gold
&lt;NGC> increased 1-1/2 to 31-1/4.
    The Toronto Stock Exchange gold index today was up 268
points at 8067.90. Hemlo Gold gained 1-1/4 at 26-3/4, LAC
Minerals was up 1-5/8 at 41, Placer Development rose 1-1/4 at
43-3/8 and Lacana Mining gained 1 at 18.
    Ing pointed out that the TSE gold index has gained 51 pct
since December 31, 1986, while the price of bullion has
increased six pct. "Canadian golds have been the top performing
index this year," he noted.
    In the U.S., there is "too much money chasing too few
stocks," Pickens said. And many investing institutions such as
pension funds and insurance companies still have excess cash,
he added.
    Cohen also noted that today's silver price break through
six dlrs an ounce indicates small investors are entering the
precious metals market and he expects the ratio between gold
and silver prices to narrow.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10606>
Premier Yu Kuo-Hua ordered financial
officials to quicken the pace of relaxing foreign exchange
controls and study the possibility of suspending the controls,
a cabinet statement said.
    The statement quoted Yu as telling Finance Ministy and
Central Bank officials the relaxation was needed to help reduce
Taiwan's surging foreign exchange reserves, which reached a
record 53 billion U.S. Dollars this month.
    Finance Minister Robert Chien told reporters his ministry
and the Central Bank would work jointly on new measures to ease
the controls, but he did not give details.
    Yu said the government could maintain the framework of the
foreign exchange controls while finding ways to ease them. The
controls would be used during emergency.
    Taiwan's reserves have resulted largely from its trade
surplus, which hit 15.6 billion dlrs in 1986 and 10.6 billion
in 1985. About 95 pct of the surplus was from Taiwan's trade
with the United States, according to official figures.
    But he said that while easing the controls would help
reduce the reserves, it would not do so substantially in a
short time.
    Economists and bankers said the new decision resulted from
growing pressure from the United States, Taiwan's largest
trading partner, which buys almost half the island's exports.
    Lu Ming-Jen, economic professor at Soochow University, told
Reuters: "The decision came a little bit late. But it was better
than never."
    Ko Fei-Lo, Vice President at First Commercial Bank, said
the government should rapidly relax its foreign exchange
controls and open its market wider to help balance trade with
its trading partners, especially the United States.
    "The liberalisation in both imports and foreign exchange
controls will not only help our trading partners, but also help
our own economic problems," he said.
    He said the mounting foreign exchange reserveshelped boost
Taiwan's money supply by 48.22 pct in the year to end-February.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10617>
A leading U.S. Banker said the dollar
was likely to fall another five to 10 pct this year and an
improvement in the huge American trade deficit would be only
temporary at current world exchange rate levels.
    Kurt Viermetz, Worldwide Treasurer of &lt;Morgan Guaranty
Trust Co>, told Arab currency traders meeting here that the
steady depreciation of the dollar had not gone far enough to
rein in U.S. Deficits on a lasting basis.
    Speaking at the 14th annual congress of the Interarab
Cambist Association, Viermetz said an agreement reached last
month among major industrial nations to steady the dollar
around current levels left many questions unanswered.
    "I cannot see any chance for a real turnaround (rise) in the
dollar," Viermetz said. "I believe there is room for a further
fall of five to 10 per cent in 1987."
    The United States, West Germany, Japan, France, Great
Britain and Canada -- G-6 -- agreed in Paris in late February
to stabilise major currencies around current levels.
    The accord came after months of transatlantic argument,
with Tokyo and Bonn claiming Washington's policy of talking the
dollar lower had made life impossible for West German and
Japanese exporters.
    The Paris accord also brought a pause to the continued
slide of the dollar engineered by a meeting in New York in
September 1985 when industrial nations agreed to depress the
value of the currency to help redress global trade imbalances.
    But Viermetz said Morgan Guaranty's economic models showed
that with no further change in exchange rates -- and continued
sluggish growth in West Germany and Japan -- the U.S. Trade
deficit would improve only temporarily.
    He said the deficit might fall to 145 billion dlrs this
year from 165 billion in 1986 and further improve to 120
billion in 1988 but by 1990, it would be back around 160
billion dlrs.
    "This is clearly unacceptable for the monetary authorities
and politicians in Washington," he said.
    Viermetz said it was only natural that markets should
attempt to test the credibility of the Paris accord, struck
when the dollar was trading at about 1.83 marks and 152.50 yen.
    Immediately before the historic 1985 New York agreement or
"Plaza Accord," the dollar had been trading at 2.84 marks and 240
yen.
    Viermetz said he believed major nations in Paris wanted to
see the dollar hold within a "loose range" of 1.75 to 1.90 marks
and 145 to 155 yen, with any attempt to push the U.S. Currency
lower being countered by central bank intervention.
    The dollar ended in New York yesterday at 147.15/25 yen --
its lowest level against the Japanese currency in roughly 40
years. It closed at 1.8160/70 marks.
    Viermetz also said he did not see the U.S. Federal funds
rate falling below six pct for fear of provoking an
uncontrolled fall in the dollar.
    But at the same time, worries about the international debt
crisis would mean there was little chance of a rise above 6-3/4
pct since this would increase loan costs to the third world.
    The Middle East foreign exchange conference brings together
more than 200 traders and bank treasury chiefs from the Arab
world and Arab banks in European and U.S. Financial centres.
    Formal discussions, which end today, have also centred on
the role of Arab banks in world financial markets, with bankers
urging them to adapt to a new global trend towards
securitisation of  business.
    Hikmat Nashashibi, President of the Arab Bankers
Association, said Arab banks have to shake off their old
mentality of commercial banking and concentrate more on
investment banking.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10618>
Lebanese central bank Vice Governor
Meguerditch Bouldikian called for the establishment of an Arab
fund to assist the Lebanese pound, which has lost more than 80
pct of its value against the dollar since January 1986.
    Bouldikian told an Arab exchange dealers conference the
bank would continue to take measures to defend the currency.
    But he said Lebanon needed foreign support for its
war-battered economy now more than ever before. "We expect a
common effort between the central bank and Arab central banks
and monetary authorities to create an Arab fund to support and
preserve the value of the currency when needed," he said.
    Twelve years of civil war have devastated productive
sectors of the Lebanese economy and created gaping trade and
budget deficits.
    Bouldikian said recent government measures had succeeded in
reducing demand for imports and increasing exports. "These are
encouraging factors, but the war has not ended yet," he said.
    "We believe that with a just political solution acceptable
to all sides, confidence will return and this will benefit the
Lebanese pound and Lebanon."
    In the meantime, he said the central bank had four main
goals:
    1) to use surplus liquidity to finance the budget deficit
    2) to increase the role of commercial banks and non-bank
financing institutions in financing the deficit
    3) to limit the transfer of Lebanese pounds into foreign
currency deposits
    4) to protect the financial health of commercial banks.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10622>
Chinese Vice-Premier Tian Jiyun said
plans to scrap the country's parallel currency, Foreign
Exchange Certificates (FECs), had been postponed due to
objections from foreign businessmen and others.
    But Tian told a news conference the Chinese government
still considered FECs unsatisfactory.
    Asked about the current state of plans to abolish the FECs,
Tian said: "We have decided to postpone the question. As to
whether it will be done in the future, it will be done
according to the evolution of the situation."
    He said many people, including foreign businessmen, had
raised objections to the plan to abolish the certificates, and
added: "It is rather complicated."
    The FECs were introduced in 1980 for use by foreigners in
China. But they now circulate widely among local residents and
there is a big black market in the currency, though it is
theoretically at par with the ordinary Chinese currency,
renminbi.
    Tian said the government still considered that the FECs had
"many demerits and negative influences."
    Bank of China President Wang Deyan told Reuters earlier
this month that he thought it unlikely that the certificates
would be scrapped this year.
    Western diplomats and economists have said the Chinese
authorities are having trouble finding a suitable alternative.
    Vice-Premier Yao Yilin announced at a similar press
conference last year that the FECs would be abolished, saying
the government had decided it was ideologically unacceptable to
have two currencies circulating in China at the same time.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10633>
Gulf Arab states must coordinate
economic policies more closely before moving towards their goal
of a unified currency system, the President of the Arab Bankers
Association said.
    Hikmat Nashashibi told a news conference at the end of an
Arab currency traders meeting: "We have to start with
coordination of fiscal policies as a prerequisite for a common
system of currencies ... There is quite a substantial way to go
yet."
    He said only then would a unified Gulf currency system be a
plausible project.
    The six nations of the Gulf Cooperation Council -- Saudi
Arabia, Kuwait, Bahrain, Oman, Qatar and the United Arab
Emirates --  have held a series of meetings this year to
examine linking their currencies to a single peg in a system
which bankers say could be modelled on the European Monetary
System (EMS).
    At present, five currencies are linked either officially or
in practice to the U.S. Dollar, while the Kuwaiti dinar is
pegged to a trade-weighted basket of currencies.
    A common currency system or EMS-style "grid" would, in
theory, foster regional trade by providing a basis for stable
exchange rates, but Nashashibi said inter-Arab trade is at a
very low ebb and capital flows between Gulf states remain
small. "Capital markets in the Arab world are still in their
infancy," he said.
    Nashashibi said lack of experience among Arab banks, a
paucity of financial instruments and a legal framework that
often does not recognise the western banking concept of
interest have hampered the growth of Arab markets.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10636>
Italy is to modify restrictions limiting
the amount of lira cash that can be brought in and out of the
country, the Foreign Trade Ministry said.
    A statement said Foreign Trade Minister Rino Formica has
signed a measure lifting currency regulations that currently
impose a 400,000 lire limit on the value of lira bank notes
that can be brought into Italy. It did not say when the new
measure would come into force.
    In future, there will be no limit to the amount of lira
bank notes both residents and non-residents can bring into
Italy.
    The statement said the 400,000 lire limit would remain for
Italian residents wishing to take cash out of the country, but
non-residents could re-export lira cash if they made
appropriate declarations at customs points.
    It said the lifting of the restrictions "reinforces the
international status of the lira and meets the requirements
expressed several times by foreign exchange dealers."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10638>
The Inter-Arab Cambist Association
(ICA) elected Abdullah al-Dakhil of Kuwait's Burgan Bank its
new chairman, succeeding Hani Ramadan of Beirut Riyad Bank for
a three-year term, ICA officials said
    The annual meeting elected three Vice-Chairmen -- Ezzedine
Saidane of Banque Internationale Arabe de Tunis, Mohammed Osman
of Societe Bancaire du Liban and Walid Nasouli of Morgan
Guaranty Trust Co of New York.
    Ibrahim Buhindi of the Saudi National Commercial Bank in
Bahrain and Imad Bata of Finance and Credit Corp of Jordan were
elected Secretary and Treasurer, respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10654>
The Bank of Japan has already purchased
more than one billion dlrs in intervention since the opening
and continues to buy the U.S. Currency, dealers said.
    The central bank was supporting the dollar against the yen
amid heavy selling pressure from investment trusts and
securities houses which had pushed the dollar as low as 144.75
yen earlier this morning, they said.
    The dollar recovered slightly from the intervention and was
trading around 145.00, they added.
    It had opened in Tokyo at 145.80 yen.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10659>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said he does not expect the dollar to remain unstable and fall
further.
    He told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament that
the Bank of Japan would continue to cooperate closely with
other major nations to stabilize exchange rates.
    The central bank has been keeping extremely careful watch
on exchange rate movements since last week, he said.
    He said the dollar would not continue to fall because of
underlying market concern about the rapid rise of the yen.
    Sumita said the currency market has been reacting to
overseas statements and to trade tension between Japan and the
U.S. Over semiconductors.
    The yen's tendency to rise will prevent Japan from
expanding domestic demand and undertaking necessary economic
restructuring, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10660>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said
that the dollar's drop today to 145 yen is partly attributable
to the perception inside and outside Japan that the country has
failed to fulfill its promise to expand domestic demand.
    He told a Lower House budget committee in Parliament that
it was natural for other nations to think that Japan is not
doing enough because of the delay in the passage of the 1987/88
budget.
    The budget has been delayed by opposition boycotts of
Parliament to protest government plans for a new sales tax.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10661>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said the central bank will carefully consider its monetary
policy in light of the recent sharp fall of the dollar.
    Asked if the Bank of Japan will consider a further cut in
its discount rate, he said he now thinks the bank will have to
carefully consider its future money policy.
    He told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament that
credit conditions have been eased by the five discount rate
cuts by Japan since the beginning of last year.
    Japan must now be especially careful about a flare-up in
inflation, with money supply growth accelerating, he said.
    Sumita said the central bank would continue to make a
judgement on monetary policies while watching consumer prices,
exchange rates and economic and financial conditions both in
and outside Japan.
    Asked if the September 1985 Plaza agreement was a failure
because the dollar had fallen too far, Sumita said he still
thought the pact was a good one in the sense that it had
corrected the overvaluation of the dollar. But the Plaza accord
did not set any target for the dollar's fall, he said.
    The dollar's steep fall stems from the market's belief that
the trade imbalance will continue to expand, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10684>
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone said
that Japan and other industrialized nations committed
themselves in Paris last month to stabilize the dollar above
150 yen.
    He told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament that
the six nations have taken measures, including market
intervention, to support the dollar above that level.
    Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told the same committee
that the six - Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And
West Germany - had intervened aggressively since the dollar
fell below 150 yen.
    Miyazawa said major nations are trying hard to stabilize
exchange rates.
    Asked if there had been any change in the fundamentals of
each nation since the February 22 Paris accord, he said he did
not think the fundamentals themselves had changed
substantially.
    But he said the market is sensitively looking at what is
happening in major nations. He did not elaborate.
    Miyazawa added that it was difficult to say why there has
been such speculative dollar selling in the market.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10689>
Japan is becoming dangerously isolated
again as the U.S. And Europe feel they have been cheated by
Japanese promises to switch from export to domestic-led growth,
officials and businessmen from around the world said.
    As the dollar today slipped to a record low below 145 yen,
making Japanese exporters and holders of dollar investments
grit their teeth harder, Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said
there was a perception Japan had reneged on its promise.
    The problem goes deep and centres on misunderstandings by
both sides over the key Maekawa report of April, last year.
    The document was prepared by a private committee formed by
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone and led by former Bank of
Japan head Haruo Maekawa. It recommended that to stop friction
due to its large trade surpluses, Japan must "make a historical
transformation in its traditional policies on economic
management and the nation's lifestyle. There can be no further
development for Japan without this transformation."
    Americans and Europeans took the report to heart and have
looked in vain for clear signs of this historic change. But the
Japanese remain doubtful about the short, or even medium term
prospects of totally transforming their economic habits.
    The bubble of frustration against what appears as Japanese
prevarication burst last week. The U.S. Said it intended to
raise tariffs of as much as 300 mln dlrs on Japanese exports to
the U.S. On the grounds Japan had abrogated a bilateral
semiconductor pact.
    British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher threatened to
block Japanese financial firms from London after the Japanese
placed what the British say are restrictive conditions on a bid
by British firm Cable and Wireless to join a domestic
telecommunications joint venture.
    On Friday, European currency dealers said European central
banks, annoyed at restrictive Japanese trade practises, might
leave Japan alone to intervene to staunch the rise of the yen.
    Eishiro Saito, head of top Japanese business group
Keidanren, spotted the dangers inherent in such contradictory
views last November when he visited the European Community.
"Related to this matter of (trade) imbalance, the point that I
found to be of great cause for alarm during this trip to Europe
was the excessive degree of hope placed by the Europeans in the
results of the Maekawa report," he said.
    "We explained that the process of restructuring the economy
away from its dependence on exports toward a balance between
domestic and external demand...Would take time," Saito said.
    Saito's words were ignored. In February, EC Industrial
Policy Director Heinrich von Moltke came to Japan and said "I
only know that your government, under the leadership of
Maekawa, points to restructuring your economy into a less
outward looking, more inward looking one. It is the Maekawa
report which has attracted the most attention in Europe."
    And Europeans and Americans want quick action. "A far better
answer than protectionism would be structural change within the
Japanese economy, the kind suggested by the Maekawa report. And
we hope to see changes occur in the near future," visiting
Chairman of General Motors Roger Smith said in March.
    Such expectations are now ingrained, which was partly the
fault of Nakasone, who heralded Maekawa's report as a sea of
change in Japanese affairs, said U.S. Officials.
    Months before the report was issued, U.S. And EC business
leaders met their Japanese colleagues to discuss the trade
problem.
    "We are more anxious than ever that the new approach of the
Maekawa committee does lead to speedy and effective action,"
said EC Industrial Union leader Lord Ray Pennock.
    "The important implication of the Maekawa report is that it
is finally looking to let Japanese enjoy the fruits of their
labour," said Philip Caldwell, Senior Managing Director of
Shearson Lehman Brothers.
    Contents of the report were leaded well ahead of issuance.
    Japanese officials say they are implementing the report as
fast as they can, said a European ambassador who has travelled
the country asking about this issue.
    He said People mentioned many things in line with the
spirit of the report, including restructuring of the coal and
steel industries.
    A major misunderstanding is that the private report was
government policy. Europeans are confused about this,
underlined by von Moltke's reference to the "leadership" of the
Maekawa report. Even so, Japanese officials point to last
September's government programme of new economic measures.
"Without endorsing the report as policy, officials point out
that the government has put its signature to a programme
designed to implement the report," the ambassador said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10696>
Remarks by Japan's Prime Minister
Yasuhiro Nakasone that last month's G-6 meeting agreed to
stabilize the dollar above 150 yen have come too late to
influence currency trading, dealers said.
    After Nakasone's statement the dollar rose to 146.40/50 yen
from an initial low of 144.20/40 and New York's Friday finish
of 147.15/25. But the rebound was largely on short-covering,
they said.
    "I think (Nakasone's) desperate," said a U.S. Bank foreign
exchange manager.
    Nakasone told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament
that Japan and other industrialized nations committed
themselves in Paris last month to stabilize the dollar above
150 yen.
    Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told the same committee
that the six - Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And
West Germany - had intervened aggressively since the dollar
fell below 150 yen.
    "His (Nakasone) remarks should have been made and should
have had a bigger influence when the dollar was still above 150
yen," said P.S. Tam of Morgan Guaranty Trust.
    Tam said the dollar has hit short-term chart targets  and
is likely to rebound. But he warned of another dip to below 145
yen.
    Dealers said the worsening trade relations between the U.S.
And Japan will continue to depress the dollar.
    The trade issue has now become a political issue since the
Reagan Administration is facing uproar in Congress over
th3pYgks in cutting the country's 169.8 billion dlr trade
deficit, they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10704>
Bahrain is introducing a new domestic
money market regime to provide dinar liquidity aid centred on
the island's newly launched treasury bill programme.
    The Bahrain Monetary Agency has issued a circular to all
commercial banks outlining a new policy from April 1 which
gives liquidity aid through sale and repurchase agreements in
treasury bills, or through discounting them.
    The circular, released officially to Reuters, said current
arrangements for providing liquidity aid will no longer be
valid except "in quite exceptional circumstances."
    Under the current system, the agency provides the island's
20 commercial banks with dinar liquidity by means of short-term
swaps against U.S. Dollars and, less frequently, by short-term
loans secured against government development bonds.
    "The agency considers that it is now appropriate to replace
these operations with short-term assistance based on Government
of Bahrain treasury bills," the circular to banks states.
    The agency said it will repurchase treasury bills with a
simultaneous agreement to resell them to the same bank at a
higher price which will reflect an interest charge.
    The agency said it envisages the repurchase agreements will
normally be for a period of seven days.
    Bahrain launched a weekly tender for two mln dinars of
91-day treasury bills in mid-December last year and has since
raised a total of 26 mln dinars through the programme.
    Bahrain's commercial banks are currently liquid and have
been making little use of the traditional dollar swaps offered
by the agency. But banking sources said the new regime from
April 1 will mean banks cannot afford not to hold treasury
bills in case they need funds from the central bank.
    Banking sources said more than half of the 20 banks hold
treasury bills, although the need by others to take up paper
could increase demand at weekly tenders and push down allotted
yields slightly.
    Last week's yield was six pct, although the programme had
started at the end of last year with rates as low as 5.60 pct.
    Banking sources said the cost of liquidity through
repurchase accords will not differ much from that on dollar
swaps. But a bank using dollars to obtain liquidity would
foresake interest on the U.S. Currency while the underlying
treasury bill investment is unaffected in a repurchase accord.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10710>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
liquidity surplus of around 100 mln stg in the money market
today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, exchequer
transactions will add some 985 mln stg to the system today
while a fall in note circulation and bankers' balances above
target will add around 360 mln stg and 110 mln stg
respectively.
    Partly offsetting these inflows, bills for repurchase by
the market will drain some 785 mln stg while bills maturing in
official hands and the treasury bill take-up will remove about
546 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10718>
The Indonesian rupiah has held steady
since its 31 pct devaluation against the dollar six months ago,
but has slipped against the mark and to a lesser extent against
the yen, according to central bank figures.
    In the past month, the rupiah has fallen five pct against
the yen. Today's middle rate per 100 yen was 1,129.78 against
1,075.20 at end-February and 1,058.6 at devaluation in
September.
    Bank Indonesia's quoted rate for the dollar, the main
currency for Indonesia's oil and gas exports, was 1,644.0
today, the same rate fixed at the time of devaluation.
    The rate for the West German mark was 913.28 today, a sharp
drop from September when it was 786.06.
    The British pound has risen to 2,657.93 against 2,429.83.
   The value of the rupiah is set daily against a basket of
currencies by the central bank.
    The rise in the value of the mark and the yen has hit
Indonesia by increasing its debt servicing levels. Its total
disbursed foreign debt is estimated by the World Bank at 37
billion dlrs.
    Japan is one of Indonesia's key trading partners, taking
half its oil exports.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10734>
The Philadelphia Stock Exchange (PHLX),
a leading trader of currency options, plans to extend its
trading hours to serve Australasian and Far Eastern markets,
exchange president Nicholas Giordano said.
    He told reporters the PHLX will open a new session between
1900 and 2300 hours U.S. EST from the beginning of the third
quarter this year.
    The PHLX is also opening an office in Hong Kong to serve
clients in the region and educate financial markets about the
advantages of currency options, Giordano said.
    Giordano was in Sydney to start an Asian-Pacific tour by
exchange executives promoting the hedging benefits of the
exchange-trade currency option market against existing
over-the-counter option trading during the local working day.
    Currency options pioneered by the PHLX in 1982 had become
an accepted means of hedging against foreign exchange risk and
had grown in popularity, he said.
    The PHLX now offered options in eight currencies, including
a new Australian dollar option, and traded an average 42,000
contracts daily with underlying open interest of more than 30
billion U.S. Dlrs.
    Giordano said the exchange had been impressed with the
performance of its Australian dollar contract, which since its
introduction last year had regularly topped the French franc as
the third most popular traded option, with up to 8,000
contracts traded daily.
    Having the Philadelphia exchange open during the
Asia-Pacific market day would open new hedging opportunities,
set a truer level for over-the-counter option trading, increase
arbitraging opportunities and give corporations and treasuries
access to a currency option market of much greater depth and
liquidity with the security of a clearing house, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10736>
Japanese Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa
expects the dollar to rebound soon, a Ministry spokesman said.
    He quoted Miyazawa as telling Japanese reporters that major
industrial nations are aggressively intervening in currency
markets worldwide to prevent a dollar free-fall.
    The minister believes that market forces will push the
dollar back up from its record low of 144.70 yen today,
according to the spokesman.
    Miyazawa told the Japanese reporters the U.S. Unit fell
because Japanese investors sold dollars to hedge currency risks
before the close of the 1986/87 fiscal year on March 31.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10749>
A Finance Ministry official said the
ministry has recently conducted a survey on foreign exchange
transactions by institutional investors but declined to say if
it was aimed at moderating their dollar sales.
    However, financial market sources said they had heard the
ministry has asked life insurance and securities firms to
refrain from selling dollars, but they were unable to confirm
this directly.
    Dealers said life insurance firms were not major sellers of
dollars in recent trading sessions because they had already
sold them to hedge risks.
    Dealers said securities houses and trust banks on the other
hand have aggressively sold the dollar.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10751>
The Bundesbank did not intervene as
the dollar was fixed lower at 1.8063 marks after 1.8231 on
Friday, dealers said.
    Business calmed down after a hectic start, with European
operators sidelined because of uncertainty about the short-term
direction of the dollar, dealers said. "At the moment, all the
action is taking place in New York and Tokyo," one said.
    The U.S. Currency traded within a 145 basis point range in
Europe, touching a low of 1.7940 and a high of 1.8085 marks.
But it remained within a narrow 40 basis point span around
1.8050 marks after the first hour of European trading.
    Comments by Japanese officials and Bank of Japan dollar
support had pushed it above 145 yen and 1.80 marks after
falling as low as 144.50 and 1.7860 respectively in Tokyo.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10755>
The Bank of England said it had not
operated in the money market during the morning session.
    Earlier, the Bank revised its forecast of the liquidity
position to flat from its original estimate of a 100 mln stg
surplus.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10756>
The gross size of the Asian dollar
market contracted to 197.2 billion U.S. Dlrs in January, down
3.4 billion dlrs from December, reflecting a decline in
interbank activity, the Monetary Authority of Singapore (MAS)
said in its latest monthly bulletin.
    The assets stood at 151.7 billion dlrs in January last
year.
    MAS said interbank lending fell in January to 140.9 billion
dlrs from 146.6 billion in December but rose from 102.0 billion
in january 1986 and interbank deposits to 154.0 billion against
159.4 and 117.1 billion, respectively.
    Loans to non-bank customers increased to 40.1 billion dlrs
in January from 38.7 billion in December and 36.9 billion in
January, 1986.
    Deposits of non-bank customers also increased in January to
34.9 billion from 33.8 billion a month ago and 27.7 billion a
year ago. REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10762>
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone said
that Japan and other industrialized nations committed
themselves in Paris last month to stabilize the dollar above
150 yen.
    He told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament that
the six nations have taken measures, including market
intervention, to support the dollar above that level.
    Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told the same committee
that the six - Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And
West Germany - had intervened aggressively since the dollar
fell below 150 yen.
    Miyazawa said major nations are trying hard to stabilize
exchange rates.
    Asked if there had been any change in the fundamentals of
each nation since the February 22 Paris accord, he said he did
not think the fundamentals themselves had changed
substantially.
    But he said the market is sensitively looking at what is
happening in major nations. He did not elaborate.
    Miyazawa added that it was difficult to say why there has
been such speculative dollar selling in the market.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10766>
Japanese Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa
expects the dollar to rebound soon, a Ministry spokesman said.
    He quoted Miyazawa as telling Japanese reporters that major
industrial nations are aggressively intervening in currency
markets worldwide to prevent a dollar free-fall.
    The minister believes that market forces will push the
dollar back up from its record low of 144.70 yen today,
according to the spokesman.
    Miyazawa told the Japanese reporters the U.S. Unit fell
because Japanese investors sold dollars to hedge currency risks
before the close of the 1986/87 fiscal year on March 31.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10769>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said he does not expect the dollar to remain unstable and fall
further.
    He told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament that
the Bank of Japan would continue to cooperate closely with
other major nations to stabilize exchange rates.
    The central bank has been keeping extremely careful watch
on exchange rate movements since last week, he said.
    He said the dollar would not continue to fall because of
underlying market concern about the rapid rise of the yen.
    Sumita said the currency market has been reacting to
overseas statements and to trade tension between Japan and the
U.S. over semiconductors.
    The yen's tendency to rise will prevent Japan from
expanding domestic demand and undertaking necessary economic
restructuring, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10770>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said
that the dollar's drop today to 145 yen is partly attributable
to the perception inside and outside Japan that the country has
failed to fulfill its promise to expand domestic demand.
    He told a Lower House budget committee in Parliament that
it was natural for other nations to think that Japan is not
doing enough because of the delay in the passage of the 1987/88
budget.
    The budget has been delayed by opposition boycotts of
Parliament to protest government plans for a new sales tax.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10771>
Japan is becoming dangerously isolated
again as the U.S. And Europe feel they have been cheated by
Japanese promises to switch from export to domestic-led growth,
officials and businessmen from around the world said.
    As the dollar today slipped to a record low below 145 yen,
making Japanese exporters and holders of dollar investments
grit their teeth harder, Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said
there was a perception Japan had reneged on its promise.
    The problem goes deep and centres on misunderstandings by
both sides over the key Maekawa report of April, last year.
    The document was prepared by a private committee formed by
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone and led by former Bank of
Japan head Haruo Maekawa. It recommended that to stop friction
due to its large trade surpluses, Japan must "make a historical
transformation in its traditional policies on economic
management and the nation's lifestyle. There can be no further
development for Japan without this transformation."
    Americans and Europeans took the report to heart and have
looked in vain for clear signs of this historic change. But the
Japanese remain doubtful about the short, or even medium term
prospects of totally transforming their economic habits.
    The bubble of frustration against what appears as Japanese
prevarication burst last week. The U.S. Said it intended to
raise tariffs of as much as 300 mln dlrs on Japanese exports to
the U.S. On the grounds Japan had abrogated a bilateral
semiconductor pact.
    British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher threatened to
block Japanese financial firms from London after the Japanese
placed what the British say are restrictive conditions on a bid
by British firm Cable and Wireless to join a domestic
telecommunications joint venture.
    On Friday, European currency dealers said European central
banks, annoyed at restrictive Japanese trade practises, might
leave Japan alone to intervene to staunch the rise of the yen.
    Eishiro Saito, head of top Japanese business group
Keidanren, spotted the dangers inherent in such contradictory
views last November when he visited the European Community.
"Related to this matter of (trade) imbalance, the point that I
found to be of great cause for alarm during this trip to Europe
was the excessive degree of hope placed by the Europeans in the
results of the Maekawa report," he said.
    "We explained that the process of restructuring the economy
away from its dependence on exports toward a balance between
domestic and external demand...Would take time," Saito said.
    Saito's words were ignored. In February, EC Industrial
Policy Director Heinrich von Moltke came to Japan and said "I
only know that your government, under the leadership of
Maekawa, points to restructuring your economy into a less
outward looking, more inward looking one. It is the Maekawa
report which has attracted the most attention in Europe."
    And Europeans and Americans want quick action. "A far better
answer than protectionism would be structural change within the
Japanese economy, the kind suggested by the Maekawa report. And
we hope to see changes occur in the near future," visiting
Chairman of General Motors Roger Smith said in March.
    Such expectations are now ingrained, which was partly the
fault of Nakasone, who heralded Maekawa's report as a sea of
change in Japanese affairs, said U.S. Officials.
    Months before the report was issued, U.S. And EC business
leaders met their Japanese colleagues to discuss the trade
problem.
    "We are more anxious than ever that the new approach of the
Maekawa committee does lead to speedy and effective action,"
said EC Industrial Union leader Lord Ray Pennock.
    "The important implication of the Maekawa report is that it
is finally looking to let Japanese enjoy the fruits of their
labour," said Philip Caldwell, Senior Managing Director of
Shearson Lehman Brothers.
    Contents of the report were leaded well ahead of issuance.
    Japanese officials say they are implementing the report as
fast as they can, said a European ambassador who has travelled
the country asking about this issue.
    He said People mentioned many things in line with the
spirit of the report, including restructuring of the coal and
steel industries.
    A major misunderstanding is that the private report was
government policy. Europeans are confused about this,
underlined by von Moltke's reference to the "leadership" of the
Maekawa report. Even so, Japanese officials point to last
September's government programme of new economic measures.
"Without endorsing the report as policy, officials point out
that the government has put its signature to a programme
designed to implement the report," the ambassador said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10773>
The Philadelphia Stock Exchange (PHLX),
a leading trader of currency options, plans to extend its
trading hours to serve Australasian and Far Eastern markets,
exchange president Nicholas Giordano said.
    He told reporters the PHLX will open a new session between
1900 and 2300 hours U.S. EST from the beginning of the third
quarter this year.
    The PHLX is also opening an office in Hong Kong to serve
clients in the region and educate financial markets about the
advantages of currency options, Giordano said.
    Giordano was in Sydney to start an Asian-Pacific tour by
exchange executives promoting the hedging benefits of the
exchange-trade currency option market against existing
over-the-counter option trading during the local working day.
    Currency options pioneered by the PHLX in 1982 had become
an accepted means of hedging against foreign exchange risk and
had grown in popularity, he said.
    The PHLX now offered options in eight currencies, including
a new Australian dollar option, and traded an average 42,000
contracts daily with underlying open interest of more than 30
billion U.S. Dlrs.
    Giordano said the exchange had been impressed with the
performance of its Australian dollar contract, which since its
introduction last year had regularly topped the French franc as
the third most popular traded option, with up to 8,000
contracts traded daily.
    Having the Philadelphia exchange open during the
Asia-Pacific market day would open new hedging opportunities,
set a truer level for over-the-counter option trading, increase
arbitraging opportunities and give corporations and treasuries
access to a currency option market of much greater depth and
liquidity with the security of a clearing house, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10774>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said the central bank will carefully consider its monetary
policy in light of the recent sharp fall of the dollar.
    Asked if the Bank of Japan will consider a further cut in
its discount rate, he said he now thinks the bank will have to
carefully consider its future money policy.
    He told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament that
credit conditions have been eased by the five discount rate
cuts by Japan since the beginning of last year.
    Japan must now be especially careful about a flare-up in
inflation, with money supply growth accelerating, he said.
    Sumita said the central bank would continue to make a
judgement on monetary policies while watching consumer prices,
exchange rates and economic and financial conditions both in
and outside Japan.
    Asked if the September 1985 Plaza agreement was a failure
because the dollar had fallen too far, Sumita said he still
thought the pact was a good one in the sense that it had
corrected the overvaluation of the dollar. But the Plaza accord
did not set any target for the dollar's fall, he said.
    The dollar's steep fall stems from the market's belief that
the trade imbalance will continue to expand, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10780>
In a bid to hasten Japan's promise
to speed up its economic growth and open markets to foreign
trade, top U.S. officials appear once again to have signaled
their tolerance of a lower dollar.
    Treasury Secretary James Baker and one of his top aides,
Assistant Secretary David Mulford, said last week there was no
target for the dollar, a statement that sent the yen soaring
against the dollar, despite massive central bank intervention.
    "That was no slip of the tongue," said one western monetary
official, who asked not to be identified.
    For now, the strategy appears to be working. Japanese
officials said late last week a package to bolster domestic
demand will be ready in early April. Until last week, there
were few indications the package would be ready anytime soon.
    The Reagan administration, facing an uproar in Congress
over the apparent lack of progress in cutting the 169.8 billion
dlr trade deficit, is learning now that to extract results from
Japan, dramatic action is required.
    Last week the White House imposed unprecedented tariffs on
certain Japanese electronic goods after Tokyo failed to adhere
to a semi-conductor pricing accord between the two countries.
    The shift in U.S. strategy, in part designed to appease
mounting Congressional anger over Japanese policies, comes just
two weeks before industrial nations reconvene here to review
the Paris agreement to stabilize currencies.
    And news that Japan earned a record 18 billion dlr trade
surplus in the first two months this year just underscored the
need for urgent action, in the view of U.S. officials.
    Nonetheless, U.S. officials see signs of improvement in the
deficit. "I'd be stunned if we were not going to derive some
benefits (from the lower dollar) soon," said one.
    In Paris, leading industrial nations agreed to cooperate
closely to foster currency stability within ranges reflecting
"underlying economic fundamentals" or economic reality.
    The agreement envisages those fundamentals to include Japan
and West Germany stimulating their economies and the United
States cutting its budget deficit.
    The three nations, joined by France, Britain and Canada,
agree these policies are essential to redress huge global trade
imbalances.
    But analysts say markets have signalled the underlying
fundamentals imply a lower dollar, rather than a stable one.
    Markets, in effect, are less confident than governments
that these measures -- including U.S. budget deficit cuts
agreed by Congress and the White House --will be carried out.
    Nonetheless, the dollar's sharp fall has not undermined 
cooperation. A U.S. economic policymaker said the accord was on
track and Tokyo and Bonn seem "to want more stimulative measures
which is what the Paris accord calls for."
    International monetary sources said exchange market
developments generally have not unsettled policymakers,
although Japan is an obvious exception. "Everybody feels it can
still be managed," one source said of market developments.
    But last week, the Bank of Japan spent an estimated five
billion dlrs intervening to halt the rise in the yen, and other
central banks about one billion dlrs.
    Another monetary source said Japan was upset with America's
half-hearted attempt to halt the falling dollar, flouting the
Paris accord outright.
    The source, close to the top levels of Japanese economic
policymaking, said Japan's understanding of the accord was that
the yen would be kept at around 154 to the dollar, the level it
stood at when the accord was struck.
    The source said Tokyo was extremely worried by Washington's
use of the exchange rate to change Japanese policies. It was a
"pointed reminder" to Japan to do something about the trade
issues, the source said of the dollar's fall against the yen.
    By departing last Sunday from the language of the Paris
accord -- that nations agreed to foster currency stability
around current levels -- Baker triggered a run on the dollar.
    Later in the week, Mulford too said there was no target for
the dollar and called on Japan and West Germany to live up to
their international responsibilities and stimulate growth.
    But U.S. officials said recent market developments will not
unravel the spirit of the Paris agreement.
    "There's a realisation now that you cannot leave things
alone, everyone agrees that the external (trade) imbalances
ought to be adjusted," one official said.
    "While no-one is going to cede national sovereignty, we
certainly seem to be moving towards much closer co-operation,"
another U.S. official said.
    The officials said the meeting here, where the six will be
joined by Italy, will be a status report.
    "Japan will have to explain what the state of their program
is and Germany will report on its plans. Maybe there's a need
to move faster," one source said.
    Mulford told Congress last week the Paris accord called, in
effect, for currency stability for several months. This would
buy time for Japan and West Germany to speed up their economic
growth and help bring down the U.S. trade deficit.
    His comments appeared to serve notice on other major
nations that Washington cannot wait too long for action to
reduce the gap between the Japanese and German trade surpluses
and the U.S. trade deficit.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10782>
A leading U.S. Banker said the dollar
was likely to fall another five to 10 pct this year and an
improvement in the huge American trade deficit would be only
temporary at current world exchange rate levels.
    Kurt Viermetz, worldwide treasurer of Morgan Guaranty Trust
Co, told Arab currency traders meeting here that the steady
depreciation of the dollar had not gone far enough to rein in
U.S. deficits on a lasting basis.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10796>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with assistance worth 129 mln stg in the
afternoon session. This compares with the Bank's forecast of a
shortage in the system today of around 100 mln stg.
    The central bank purchased 129 mln stg bank bills in band
one at 9-7/8 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10804>
The government is determined to ride out
the latest sharp rise of the yen without taking panic measures
because it expects the currency's appreciation to prove
temporary, senior officials said.
    "The market has already located a ceiling (for the yen) and
market forces are pushing the dollar back up a bit," one senior
Finance Ministry official said.
    He attributed the dollar's fall in recent days to special
factors, in particular, selling by Japanese investors ahead of
the March 31 end to their fiscal year.
    That selling largely came to an end this morning after
about one hour of trading here, the senior official said. "They
(the investors) became more or less quiet after 10 o'clock
(0100 GMT)," he said.
    After falling to a record low of 144.70 yen this morning,
the dollar edged back up in late trading to end at 146.20.
Dealers attributed the late rise to remarks by Prime Minister
Yasuhiro Nakasone that major nations had agreed to stabilise
the dollar above 150 yen.
    Several officials said they did not see any fundamental
reason for the dollar's recent sharp fall.
    One official even called the market's recent actions
irrational. If anything, the U.S. Decision to slap tariffs on
Japanese electronics goods should support the dollar against
the yen because it will cut Japanese exports to the U.S., He
said.
    As a result, several officials said they saw no reason to
alter the broad thrust of government policy agreed to at last
month's meeting of major nations in Paris.
    "We don't see any substantial reason to change our policy
stance," one senior official said.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10807>
Remarks by Japan's Prime Minister
Yasuhiro Nakasone that last month's G-6 meeting agreed to
stabilize the dollar above 150 yen have come too late to
influence currency trading, dealers said.
    After Nakasone's statement the dollar rose to 146.40/50 yen
from an initial low of 144.20/40 and New York's Friday finish
of 147.15/25. But the rebound was largely on short-covering,
they said.
    "I think (Nakasone's) desperate," said a U.S. Bank foreign
exchange manager.
    Nakasone told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament
that Japan and other industrialized nations committed
themselves in Paris last month to stabilize the dollar above
150 yen.
    Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told the same committee
that the six - Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And
West Germany - had intervened aggressively since the dollar
fell below 150 yen.
    "His (Nakasone) remarks should have been made and should
have had a bigger influence when the dollar was still above 150
yen," said P.S. Tam of Morgan Guaranty Trust.
    Tam said the dollar has hit short-term chart targets  and
is likely to rebound. But he warned of another dip to below 145
yen.
    Dealers said the worsening trade relations between the U.S.
And Japan will continue to depress the dollar.
    The trade issue has now become a political issue since the
Reagan Administration is facing uproar in Congress over
th3pYgks in cutting the country's 169.8 billion dlr trade
deficit, they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10808>
A Finance Ministry official said the
ministry has recently conducted a survey on foreign exchange
transactions by institutional investors but declined to say if
it was aimed at moderating their dollar sales.
    However, financial market sources said they had heard the
ministry has asked life insurance and securities firms to
refrain from selling dollars, but they were unable to confirm
this directly.
    Dealers said life insurance firms were not major sellers of
dollars in recent trading sessions because they had already
sold them to hedge risks.
    Dealers said securities houses and trust banks on the other
hand have aggressively sold the dollar.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10809>
The dollar's tumble to a record low of
144.70 yen in Tokyo today motivated some major Japanese
investors to lighten their U.S. Bond inventory further and is
expected to spur diversification into investment assets
including foreign and domestic shares, dealers said.
    The key U.S. 7-1/2 pct Treasury bond due 2016 fell to a low
of 96.08-12 in early Tokyo trade against the 98.05-06 New York
finish, then recovered to 96.20-22.
    Some trust bank pension fund acccounts and investment
trusts were seen selling several hundred million dollars on the
foreign exchange market here today, accentuating the unit's
tumble, securities house dealers said.
    They seem undecided on what to do with the fresh yen cash
positions resulting from their dollar sales today, and are
sidelined until the currency market stabilises and the interest
rates outlook clarifies, a Nikko Securities Co Ltd currency
trader said.
    The dollar's plunge and low yields on U.S. Bonds will
further promote diversification into other foreign investments,
as well as call back funds into the domestic bond and stock
markets from overseas bond markets, securities bond managers
said.
    They said major Japanese investors in the past two years
are estimated to have held 50 to 80 pct of their foreign
portfolios in U.S. Bonds but many have lightened their U.S.
Bond inventory to as low as 40 pct.
    Since late last year, Japanese investors, seeking
substantial liquidity and attractive yields, have used fresh
funds to buy mark and Canadian dollar bonds and, after the
Paris currency pact, actively bought French franc bonds and
gilts while gradually lightening U.S. Bond inventories, the
managers said.
    Dealers said funds tied up in foreign assets had flowed
into local bond and stock markets as well.
    The yield of the key 5.1 pct 89th bond dropped to a record
low of 4.080 pct today from the 4.140 Saturday finish and
compared with 4.25 pct on three-month certificates of deposit.
    The key bond has fluctuated less than five basis points for
more than a month here, suggesting most dealers could not
satisfy their needs for capital gains, dealers said.
    A market survey by Reuters showed some active accounts in
U.S. Treasuries are currently dealing on Tokyo's stock market.
The stock market's bullishness late last week was partly due to
funds transferred from U.S. Treasuries, dealers said.
    Japanese net purchases of foreign securities in the first
half of March fell an estimated one billion dlrs compared with
average monthly net purchases of 7.7 billion for the whole of
1986, Finance Ministry sources said.
    The steep fall is due to Japanese investors' cool attitude
towards U.S. Bonds, which had amounted to more than 80 pct of
total foreign securities purchased, securities houses managers
said.
    Foreign stock buying in March is expected to exceed the
record high of 1.5 billion dlrs seen in December, they said.
    "Diversification of foreign portfolios is underway and we
have bought bonds in currencies such as marks, the Canadian
dollar, the ECU and French franc," a fund manager at &lt;Yasuda
Trust and Banking Co Ltd> said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10864>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange two billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-3/8 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10913>
The Federal Reserve said it will enter
the U.S. Government securities market after the 1300 EST weekly
bill auction to purchase around 900 mln dlrs of Treasury bills
for customers, a spokesman said.
    He said the Fed will purchase bills with maturities from
May through September 10.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-3/8 pct when
the Fed announced the operation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11000>
U.K. Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel
Lawson said the meeting of six major industrial nations in
Paris last month agreed not to publish any bands in connection
with their pact to stabilise currencies.
    Questioned by a parliamentary select committee about why
the participating countries had not announced any bands, Lawson
replied, "we all agreed it would be much more sensible not to."
When asked whether that meant an informal joint currency float
with set ranges was arranged in Paris, Lawson said "I do not
want to reveal the precise nature of the agreement, so as not
to make it easy for" speculation against the accord.
    Lawson said the Paris accord presumed that individual
countries would take corrective action if their currency began
reacting significantly to domestic macroeconomic factors.
    But if such movements were due to extraneous factors,
Lawson said the other pact countries would come to its aid
through concerted intervention on the foreign exchanges.
    "It is clear that both Germany and Japan are having
difficulty adjusting to their very large exchange rate
appreciations and making their economies more domestically
oriented, just as it is taking time for the United States to
make its own economy more export oriented," Lawson said.
    In his oral evidence to Parliament's Select Treasury
Committee, Lawson repeated that he was happy with the pound's
current level, adding that "It is an objective ... To try to
keep it around that level."
    He said the perception of sterling on foreign exchanges had
changed since the steep drop in oil prices, largely because the
pound had weathered that period so successfully. "There has been
a reassessment of sterling's fundamentals," Lawson said.  He
disagreed with what he termed "the grossly exaggerated claim"
that real U.K. Interest rates were much higher than those of
other major industrialsed countries.
    Using as a reference the key three-month sterling interbank
rate as quoted in London, Lawson said Britain now had a real
interest rate level of 5.75 pct - the same as Japan did and
only a 0.75 percentaage point above the Group of Five average.
    Lawson confirmed that "over the medium and longer term, the
government's objective is zero inflation."
    He said the government's intention of its PSBR constant at
1.0 pct of GDP "is the modern equivalent of the balanced budget
doctrine."  He added that "to allow the debt/GDP ratio to remain
constant on anything other than zero inflation basis is simply
a recipe for accelerating inflation."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11059>
Treasury balances at the Federal
Reserve fell on March 27 to 2.424 billion dlrs from 2.508
billion dlrs on the previous business day, the Treasury said in
its latest budget statement.
    Balances in tax and loan note accounts fell to 9.706
billion dlrs from 10.786 billion dlrs on the same respective
days.
    The Treasury's operating cash balance totaled 12.131
billion dlrs on March 27 compared with 13.283 billion dlrs on
March 26.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11103>
The U.S. credit market ended under
extreme pressure as the dollar's continued slide on the
currency markets triggered an avalanche of U.S. securities
sales, pushing prices to 1987 lows, dealers and analysts said.
    "This was a bloodbath," said one money market economist.
"We've been trading in a state of total panic at times today,"
said another.
    Mirroring the dollar's fall to a 40-year low against the
yen, the key 7-1/2 pct 30-year Treasury bond price fell nearly
two points to close at 96-7/32, compared with 98-5/32 on
Friday. The corresponding yield jumped to 7.83 pct from 7.66.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11120>
Brazilian President Jose Sarney
announced a move which temporarily legalises the purchase of
U.S. dollars in the parallel currency market, aimed at
promoting imports of foreign goods.
    In a speech, Sarney justified his measure as a need to face
"current well known difficulties to obtain foreign loans for the
purchase of goods."
    The parallel market, although officially tolerated, is
technically illegal in Brazil. For the past year, the dollar in
the parallel market has sold at between 25 and 100 pct above
the official rate.
    Sarney's decision means Brazilian importers of machinery
and industrial equipment can buy dollar currency in the
parallel market without having to wait for an official order
from the Banco do Brasil's Foreign Trade Department (Cacex).
    Sarney also announced measures to boost exports in an
effort to strengthen the country's trade balance and alleviate
the risk of a reduction of foreign loans for this sector of the
economy.
    The president authorised the National Foreign Trade Council
(CONEX) to resume operating as the ruling body of Brazil's
trade policy, with participation of the private sector.
    The Council had been closed three years ago by the military
government of former President Joao Figueiredo.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11135>
Brazilian President Jose Sarney
announced a move which temporarily legalises the purchase of
U.S. Dollar currency in the parallel market, aimed at promoting
imports of foreign goods.
    In a speech, Sarney justified his measure as a need to face
"current well known difficulties to obtain foreign loans for the
purchase of goods."
    The parallel market, although tolerated, is technically
illegal. For the past year, the dollar in the parallel market
is being sold at 25 to 100 pct above the official rate.
    Sarney's decision means that Brazilian importers of
machinery and industrial equipment can buy dollar currency in
the parallel market without having to wait for the issuing of
an official order from the Banco do Brasil's Foreign Trade
Department (Cacex).
    Sarney also announced measures to boost exports in an
effort to strengthen the country's trade balance and alleviate
the risk of a reduction of foreign loans for this sector of the
economy.
    The president authorised the National Foreign Trade Council
(CONEX) to resume operating as the ruling body of Brazil's
trade policy, with participation of the private sector.
    The Council had been closed three years ago by the military
government of former President Joao Figueiredo.
    Tomorrow, Brazil was due to fulfill payment of 15 billion
dollars in short range credit lines, but its economic officials
have suggested a 60-day extension in the deadline in order to
seek a renegotiation with its creditors.
    Sarney told members of the Council that for Brazil it is a
must to recover its annual trade balance surplus to the 12
billion dollars average recorded in 1984 and 1985, and which
dropped sharply last year to 8 billion dollars.
    He attributed the poor performance of Brazil's trade
balance in 1986 to protectionist moves by industrialised
countries, the fall in the prices of basic goods and the crisis
faced by several of Brazil's Third World trade partners.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11193>
The Bank of England said it had invited
an early round of bill offers from the discount houses after
forecasting a very large shortage of around 1.75 billion stg in
the money market today.
 MORE
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11200>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with 1.143 billion mln stg assistance in
response to an early round of bill offers from the discount
houses.
    Earlier, the Bank forecast the system would face a very
large deficit today of around 1.75 billion stg.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright comprising
393 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct, 649 mln stg in band two
at 9-13/16 pct and 85 mln stg in band three at 9-3/4 pct.
    In addition it bought 16 mln stg of local authority bills
in band two at 9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11203>
Today's liberalised financial markets are
making it extremely difficult for Japan's monetary authorities
to prevent the yen's rise against the dollar, but they have
several options other than normal intervention, Bank of Japan
sources said.
    A senior central bank official said that such methods as
controlling foreign exchange deals and invoking currency swap
agreements with other central banks, which have not been
invoked since 1978, are all being considered.
    "But the time may not be ripe," he said.
    "In this era of financial liberalisation, it's almost
impossible to control the flow of capital in and out of Japan,"
said another senior bank official.
    But the first official said: "From a technical viewpoint,
the Bank of Japan could activate swap agreements immediately
after other central banks involved agreed to do so."
    A swap agreement, an exchange of currency between two
nations, allows both sides to acquire a ready source of the
other's currency in case of need.
    "If the Bank invokes such swaps, both parties would announce
the decision jointly," said the first official.
    The sources said they believed the limit of currency market
intervention may be being reached after they saw recent
concerted market action by central banks of major industrial
nations was increasingly ineffective in propping up the
battered dollar.
    But intervention is at least an option, they said. Further
easing of monetary policy will be very difficult with an
official discount rate already at a record low of 2.5 pct, they
said.
    Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita has repeatedly ruled
out another rate cut due to fears it could revive inflation.
    One bank official said he could not deny the possibilty of
the Bank of Japan activating currency swap agreements with the
U.S. And other central banks, if these banks continue
intervening to sell the yen in support of the dollar and run
out of their yen cash positions.
    "But we don't think they have become short of yen quite yet,"
he said.
    The bank has established a five billion dlr swap limit with
the U.S. Federal Reserve and another 2.5 billion mark and 200
billion yen limit with the West German and Swiss central banks,
according to the sources.
    Foreign exchange dealers estimate the Fed had sold two
billion dlrs worth of yen from its own account to support the
dollar in New York last week.
    The central bank sources also said Japan may arrange other
currency swap agreements with Britain and France if they find
it necessary, but added they are not actually talking with each
other towards that end.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11209>
South Korea's Finance Minister Chung
In-yong will visit U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker next
week to discuss U.S. Requests for an appreciation of South
Korea's won against the dollar, finance ministry officials
said.
    They said Chung would leave for Washington on Monday to
attend the International Monetary Fund's (IMF) Interim
Committee meeting and for talks with U.S. Officials on ways of
reducing Seoul's trade surplus with Washington.
    The dates for the Baker-Chung meeting have yet to be set.
    The IMF committee meeting, scheduled for April 9, is
expected to review the resolution reached by the six top
industrialised nations in Paris last month calling for newly
industrialised countries, such as South Korea and Taiwan, to
allow their currencies to rise.
    The official said Chung is expected to outline Seoul's
efforts to increase imports of U.S. Goods and to stress the
need for South Korea to maintain a trade surplus in the next
few years in order to cut foreign debts totalling some 44.5
billion dlrs.
    South Korea has ruled out a major revaluation of the won,
but is allowing its currency to appreciate slowly.
    Trade Minister Rha Woong-bae told the U.S. Chamber of
Commerce earlier this month a sudden won revaluation could
result in South Korea running a large trade deficit and being
forced to renege on its international debt repayments.
    The Bank of Korea, the central bank, today fixed the won at
a two-year high of 846.90. The won has gained 5.1 pct since the
beginning of 1986.
    South Korea's trade surplus with the U.S. Rose to 7.1
billion dlrs last year from 4.3 billion in 1985.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11212>
The Bundesbank declined to comment on
rumours in Tokyo that it was intervening heavily to support the
dollar, but dealers here said they had not seen the German
central bank in the market all morning.
    The dollar was quoted at around 1.8040 marks shortly after
midday in nervous but quiet trading, up from its 1.7975/85
opening.
    Spreads against the mark remained around 10 basis points,
with some banks quoting only five point spreads. Dealers said
spreads would widen and the dollar would move more sharply if
the Bundesbank did intervene.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11228>
The Bank of England said it provided the
market with a further 570 mln stg assistance during the morning
after revising its estimate of the liquidity shortage to 1.85
billion stg, before taking account of its early round of bill
purchases.
    Initially, the Bank put the likely shortage at some 1.75
billion and to help offset this gave early assistance of 1.143
billion.
    Its total help so far today amounts to 1.713 billion stg.
 MORE
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11234>
One or two large West German banks
effectively drained the domestic money market of liquidity at
the end of the month in order to achieve higher rates from
their overnight deposits, money dealers said.
    As a result, call money soared in active trading to around
the Lombard rate of five pct from 3.70/80 pct yesterday as
banks found themselves short of minimum reserve funds.
    Bundesbank figures showed that banks held an average daily
51 billion marks in interest-free minimum reserve assets at the
central bank over the first 29 days of the month.
    Though this was above the March requirement of 50.7
billion, actual holdings at the weekend were 44.2 billion.
    To meet the daily average, dealers said, banks must raise
holdings by two billion marks to 46.3 billion today and
tomorrow. But liquidity was tight in early business because
banks excessively took up the Bundesbank's offer for sale of
Treasury bills on Friday. This provides a rate of 3.50 pct for
three-day deposits and is an effective floor to the market.
    Though some liquidity, from bills bought on Thursday,
flowed back into the market today, the bulk would not return
until tomorrow, the start of the new month, dealers said.
    Dealers said the large banks, which they did not name,
commanded short-term money requirements of as much as five
billion marks or so.
    With a knowledge of their own needs until the end of the
month, the banks bought excessive amounts of treasury bills,
draining liquidity for three days. When other banks sought
funds, rates rose and large banks were able to place excess
funds on deposit at a considerably higher average return.
    One senior dealer said the Bundesbank, with advanced
knowledge of the market's needs, should have curtailed its
sales of treasury bills on Friday.
    Though dealers only late in the day learn of the total
minimum reserve holdings of the previous day, the Bundesbank
has an immediate overview of the situation and could anticipate
the strength of demand for funds the following day, he said.
    "(Bundesbank dealers) could easily have said we are not
selling any treasury bills or we're not selling them in this
amount," he said. "If the Bundesbank wants to finely steer the
market then they should avoid such excesses. Tomorrow it will
be different. Call money will fall back to 4.0 pct or so."
    But the Bundesbank would not approve of the sharp jump in
rates, given the delicate state of currency markets.
    International central banks have been at pains to prevent a
dollar fall against major currencies, including the mark.
Dealers said a rise in call money gives the mark a firmer
undertone, contributing to downward pressure on the dollar.
    "The whole tender policy is to have a call money of between
three and four pct. In that case the excesses as we have today
cannot be very popular," the senior dealer said.
    Dealers said the large banks probably achieved average
rates of return on their excess funds of between 3.75 pct or
four pct. This is a higher return than they would have earned
without the excessive draining through the treasury bill
mechanism.
    Because of the currency situation and the wage negotiations
between Germany's major employers and the unions, the
Bundesbank would be very unlikely to make any changes to
monetary policy at its council meeting on Thursday, they said.
    Bundesbank figures showed that banks fell back on the
Lombard emergency funding facility to draw down 1.5 billion
marks yesterday as rates began to tighten in late business.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11238>
The Bundesbank declined to comment on
rumours in Tokyo that it was intervening heavily to support the
dollar, but dealers here said they had not seen the German
central bank in the market all morning.
    The dollar was quoted at around 1.8040 marks shortly after
midday in nervous but quiet trading, up from its 1.7975/85
opening.
    Spreads against the mark remained around 10 basis points,
with some banks quoting only five point spreads. Dealers said
spreads would widen and the dollar would move more sharply if
the Bundesbank did intervene.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11244>
The Bank of Japan will sell tomorrow a
total of 800 billion yen worth of financing bills from its
holdings to help absorb a projected money market surplus of
1,700 billion yen, money traders said.
    Of the total, 300 billion yen will yield 3.8992 pct on
sales from money houses to banks and securities houses in a
23-day repurchase accord maturing on April 24.
    The remaining 500 billion yen will yield 3.8990 pct in a
31-day repurchase pact maturing on May 2, they said.
    The repurchase agreement yields compare with the 3.8750 pct
one-month commercial bill discount rate today and the 4.28/11
pct rate on one-month certificates of deposit.
    Tomorrow's surplus is attributable to excess bank holdings
from sales of yen to buy dollars and to huge cash amounts to be
redeposited at banks after the current financial year-end
today, the traders said.
    The operation will put the outstanding bill supply at about
3,200 billion yen.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11256>
The Bank of England said it had revised
its estimate of the deficit in the money market today up to a
record two billion stg, before taking account of its morning
operations, from 1.85 billion at midday.
    The Bank has provided the system with around 1.71 billion
stg assistance so far today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11263>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with a further 168 mln stg assistance in the
afternoon session. This takes the Bank's total help so far
today to 1.88 billion stg and compares with its estimate of a
record two billon stg shortage in the system.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright comprising
25 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct, 138 mln stg in band two at
9-13/16 pct and three mln stg in band three at 9-3/4 pct.
    It also bought two mln stg of treasury bills in band two at
9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11281>
South Korean Finance Minister Chung
In-yong will resist pressure for a currency revaluation to cut
South Korea's trade surplus with the United States when he
meets Treasury Secretary James Baker next week, Finance
Ministry officials said.
    They said Chung would leave Monday to attend the
International Monetary Fund's Interim Committee meeting and to
hold talks with Baker and other U.S. officials on ways to
reduce the surplus.
    The April 9 committee meeting is expected to review the
agreement by six industrialized nations in Paris last month
that newly-industrialized countries, such as South Korea and
Taiwan, should allow their currencies to increase in value.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11284>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with late assistance of around 215 mln stg.
This takes the bank's total help today to some 2.096 billion
stg and compares with its forecast of a two billion stg
shortage in the system today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11297>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
the agreement among the industrial countries reached in Paris
last month should foster stability of exchange rates at around
current levels.
    In testimony before the House Appropriations Committee,
Baker outlined many of the measures taken designed to achieve
more balanced growth and a reduction of trade imbalances during
the Paris meeting.
    "These measures should also foster greater stability of
exchange rates around current levels," he said.
    Baker reiterated that the ministers at the Paris meeting
agreed that their currencies were within ranges "broadly
consistent with underlying economic fundamentals and that
further substantial exchange rate shifts could damage growth
and adjustment prospects."
    He added: "In these circumstances, we agreed to cooperate
closely to foster stability of exchange rates around current
levels."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11322>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
that the agreement in Paris to cooperate in exchange rate
changes showed that the process of coordination agreed to at
the Tokyo summit was working.
    He told the House Appropriations Committee the meeting
"demonstrated that the process is working."
    He noted that the industrial surplus countries committed
themselves to strengthen their growth prospects while the
deficit countries agreed to reduce their domestic imbalances.

    Baker said that for its part, Japan announced a cut in its
discount rate to 2.5 pct and committed itself to prepare a
comprehensive economic program to stimulate domestic demand
after the Diet completes action on the current budget.
    He said the United States must also do its share pressing
for reductions in the federal budget deficit through spending
cuts.
    "And we must continue to oppose protectionist pressures,"
he added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11365>
Loans and advances from the Dutch
Central Bank to the commercial banks fell 1.01 billion guilders
to 9.5 billion guilders in the week ending March 30, the Bank's
weekly return showed.
    Dealers said payments by the Dutch state, partly in the
form of civil service wages, had outweighed payments to the
State, causing the money market deficit to ease.
    The Treasury's account with the Bank dropped 960 mln
guilders to 6.5 billion guilders.
    Liabilities in gold or foreign currency rose 200 mln to
11.9 billion guilders.
    Dealers said it was more likely that the alteration in this
item on the weekly return indicated normal commercial foreign
exchange business rather than intervention by the Central Bank.
     The Bank itself does not disclose information on
intervention.
    Seasonal variation brought bank notes in circulation up 190
mln guilders to 29.7 billion guilders.
    Total gold and currency reserves rose 173 mln guilders to
56.4 billion guilders.
    Call money and period rates were barely changed in the
week. Today all were traded at 5-3/8 to 5-1/2 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11430>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
the United States and the five other industrialized nations
signing the recent Paris Accord remain committed to fostering
the exchange rate at around current levels.
    But he declined to comment on what he believed to be an
appropriate level of the dollar in world markets.
    "I'm not going to comment on that because invariably the
exchange markets read either more or less into my remarks than
I might intend," he said in response to a question from the
House Appropriations Committee.
    Baker said the six nations participating in the Paris
meeting in February had "acknowledged that the currencies are
within ranges that are broadly consistent with the economic
fundamentals and we and the others as well remain prepared to
cooperate closely to foster stability in exchange rates around
those levels."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11447>
West German Economics Minister Martin
Bangemann urged a halt to the talking down of the dollar by
both official and private institutions in the U.S., Saying calm
was needed on the foreign exchanges.
    Speaking at the opening of the 40th Hanover Industry Fair,
Bangemann said radical changes in foreign exchange parities had
left their mark on exports and investments. He added that
without these external difficulties, West Germany's economy
would have grown by 3.5 pct last year instead of the 2.5 pct
reported.
    Bangemann said he could not deny that the economic climate
in West Germany had cooled, but he stressed the country was not
in a downtrend.
    The minister also criticised state subsidies, which he said
mainly favoured large companies and created a tax burden for
smaller and medium sized firms.
    Bangemann referred specifically to subsidies in the steel
industry, which he said had to be fought with all legal means
when they did not correspond to European Community guidelines
on grants.
    He added that in light of the declining demand for steel
capacities had to be adjusted, saying the Bonn government would
not successfully be able to stand in the way of any change in
this industry.
    Bangemann also spoke out against protectionism and called
for more competition, citing as an example the Federal Post
Office.
    The Post Office enjoys a monopoly in West Germany,
especially as far as deciding who is able to provide
telecommunications equipment.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11450>
Treasury Secretary James Baker told
the House Appropriations Committee the United States is still
pressing newly industrialized south Asian nations that have
tied their currencies to the dollar to let those currencies
strengthen against the dollar.
    "We have seen some strengthening of those currencies (but)
not as much as we would like," he said.
    "We have been somewhat disappointed in the results so far,
but we intend to continue these discussions," he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11551>
Treasury Secretary James Baker told
the House Appropriations Committee the United States is still
pressing newly industrialized south Asian nations that have
tied their currencies to the dollar to let those currencies
strengthen against the U.S. currency.
    "We have seen some strengthening of those currencies (but)
not as much as we would like," he said.
    "We have been somewhat disappointed in the results so far,
but we intend to continue these discussions," he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11734>
The surge in currency futures since
Friday on the heels of the Reagan administration's proposed
tariffs on Japanese imports is likely to be curtailed in the
coming week, financial analysts said.
    "The market is taking a breather now, and I would expect it
to last a little longer," said Craig Sloane, a currency analyst
with Smith Barney, Harris, Upham and Co.
    Profit-taking, which robbed the currency futures of some
momentum today, is likely to continue, he said.
    Central banks are likely to play a role in halting the
advance in currencies through intervention, the analysts said,
even though the dollar fell to a 40-year low against the
Japanese yen on Monday despite Bank of Japan intervention.
    Treasury Secretary James Baker's comments that the G-6
nations remain committed to the Paris accord, coupled with his
refusal to give any targets for exchange rates, provided a note
of stability to the market Tuesday, the analysts said.
    Furthermore, Merrill Lynch Economics analyst David Horner
said G-6 central banks haven't yet shown the full force of
their commitment to the Paris accord.
    "I'm among those who believe the G-6 have a plan behind the
scenes," Horner said.
    Horner said more forceful central bank intervention will
firm the dollar and cap the rise in currency futures.
    "Coordinated, punishing intervention" by the central banks
-- in contrast to the recent rolling intervention which has
only smoothed out the market -- is in the offing, according to
Horner.
    "I think we're near the top of the range in the Europeans
(currencies)," he said.
     On the other hand, the upside target for the yen, which
set a new contract high today at 0.006916 in the June contract,
is at 0.007050, Horner said.
    Still, other analysts believe currency futures have yet to
peak.
    "The basic trend in the currencies is higher," said Anne
Parker Mills, currency analyst with Shearson Lehman Brothers
Inc. "The market wants to take the dollar lower."
    Uncertainty over central bank action and nervousness over a
G-5 meeting next week in advance of a meeting of the
International Monetary Fund could make for choppy price
activity the remainder of the week, Mills said.
    In addition, although the market shrugged off relatively
healthy gains in February U.S. leading economic indicators and
factory orders Tuesday, economic data could play a larger role
in coming sessions, the analysts said.
    Friday's employment statistics in particular will be
closely watched, Sloane said, adding that a forecast rise of
250,000 in non-farm payroll jobs should underpin the dollar.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11753>
The complex task of wielding control
over monetary policy in an increasingly fast-moving global
economy could be aided by tying policy to commodity prices, the
newest member of the Federal Reserve Board says.
    Commodity prices are already considered by the Fed in the
making of monetary policy. But they would be given a much
greater role under an idea being floated by Governor Robert
Heller, who joined the board last August.
    He conceeds that much more study of the idea is needed, but
argues that such an arrangement, particularly if it were
adopted by other major industrial countries, could reduce the
volatility of exchange rates.
    Moreover, it could help stabilize of the prices of
commodities themselves, slowing changes in inflation.
    His idea, which many conservative economists find
appealing, has some backing among board members appointed in
recent years by President Reagan.
    It would complement the present system of opening or
closing the monetary screws based on the pattern of inflation,
key indicators such as unemployment, and the rise or fall of
the money supply. Changes in the money supply can lead to
changes in interest rates and affect economic activity
directly.
    Discussed on and off for a long time, the commodity concept
is part of a growing search for a system that anchors monetary
policy and widely-fluxtuating currency prices to a more solid
base.
    "What is needed is an anchor or reference point that can
serve as a guide for both domestic and international monetary
purposes," says Heller.
    In the past, this anchor was gold but the United States
went off the gold standard because the global economy had
vastly outstripped gold supplies.
    A return to the gold standard is generally dismissed out of
hand by most policymakers on the grounds that the largest
producers of gold are the Soviet Union and South Africa.
    The so-called fixed rate system, scuttled in the early
1970s, is still considered unworkable in the present world.
    But the current system of floating currencies in which
currencies can fluxtuate widely, adding vast pressures to the
monetary system, is also being widely questioned.
    Some have suggested that the system might benefit from a
formal approach that mandates intervention by countries when
currencies wander above or below agreed to levels but there are
major problems with this also.
    For one thing, there is justifiable concern that countries
might be relunctant to intervene if they felt it might be
detrimental to their own domestic economy.
    Moreover, some question whether concerted intervention can
make much of an inpact if the overall market does not agree
with the fundamental judgement.
    The poorest countries have called for a monetary conference
to work out a new system that, not surprisingly, helps them
cope with their overpowering debt problems.
    Treasury Secretary James Baker, the Reagan administration's
chief economic architect, has preferred to use the so-called
Group of Five industrial countries or sometimes, Seven, as a
forum to work out cooperative agreements on currency and other
economic matters.
   He appears convinced that officials from West Germany,
France, Britain, Japan, Italy and Canada talking quietly behind
closed doors can reached reasoned decisions away from public
posturing.
   The Heller approach, while extremely complex, could have a
profound impact on the system, ideally stabalizing prices and
international exchange rates.
    As envisioned by Heller, a basket of say, 30 major
commodities ranging from wheat to oil, would be put together
and prices would be measured on a regular basis.
    "In times of rising commodity prices, monetary policy might
be tightened and in times of falling commodity prices, montary
policy might be eased," he says.
    He notes that commodity prices are traded daily in auction
markets, and a commodity price index can be calculated on a
virtually continuous basis.
    Moreover, most commodity prices are produced, consumed and
traded on a world-wide basis, so "that an index has a relevance
for the entire world," he says.
    In addition, commodity prices are at the beginning of the
production chain and serve as an imput into virtually all
production processes.
    "Focusing on commodity prices as an early and sensitive
indicator of current and perhaps also future prices pressures,
the monetary authorities may take such an index into account in
making their monetary policy decisions," he says.
    However, he says that any major change in a basic commodity
such as occurred in oil during the 1970s because of action by
the OPEC cartel, would have to be discounted in such a system.
    He says the worst thing that could happen is to allow
monetary policy to spread a freakish increase in one commodity
to the rest of the system and to other commodities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11774>
The Bank of Japan intervened in the market
in the early afternoon, buying dollars around 147.30 yen and
continuing to buy them as high as 147.50 yen, dealers said.
    The Bank intervened just after the dollar started rising on
buying by securities houses at around 147.05 yen, and hoped to
accelerate the dollar's advance, they said.
    The dollar rose as high as 147.50 yen.
  REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11776>
The Bundesbank should take further
steps to reduce German interest rates to protect the mark from
further appreciation and to persuade investors to bring
long-term yields lower, Commerzbank AG &lt;CBKG.F> management
board chairman Walter Seipp said.
    But he told the bank's annual news conference this did not
mean a cut in leading interest rates, rather a reduction in
money market rates through bringing the allocation rates down
for Bundesbank securities repurchase agreements.
    "Leading interest rates are not the decisive rates," he said.
"The money market rates are the important ones."
    Seipp said the Bundesbank should move away from allocating
money market liquidity at a fixed 3.8 pct as it has in recent
tender allocations.
    An easier monetary policy would not mean a loss of
credibility for the Bundesbank in its containment of monetary
growth. A fall in short rates would make the public aware of
the high yields in bonds and lead to a longer-term capital
formation, braking the expansion of money supply.
    "Thus, you can have lower rates and also a normalisation of
monetary growth both at the same time," he added.
    Seipp said there were no grounds to paint too black a
picture of the German economy, since company profitability had
improved over recent years and domestic oriented firms were
profiting from cheaper imports because of the rise in the mark.
    Growth this year should be at least one pct, he said,
describing the downturn in production in the first months as a
false start, unrepresentative of the rest of the year.
    After an economic contraction in the first quarter, the
economy should show an uptrend in the last three. "We don't
believe that the economy has tipped over, but see it more as a
'growth dip,'" Seipp said.
    But Seipp also called for support for growth from fiscal
policy, saying the top rate of income and corporate tax should
be brought down to 49 pct. The current peak rate is 56 pct.
    The additional tax cuts brought forward to next January
were no substitute for support for growth.
    Seipp added the federal government should make "further
courageous steps to decrease the state's proportion of the
German economy and to increase its flexibility."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11783>
Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita said
the present foreign exchange market instability will not last
long as there is caution in the market regarding the rapid
decline of the U.S. Unit.
    He told reporters the major currency nations are determined
to continue their concerted intervention whenever necessary to
stave off speculative dollar selling in line with their
February 22 currency stability agreement in Paris.
    Sumita also said he did not see the recent dollar drop as
anything like a free-fall.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11794>
The Bank of England said it had invited
an early round of bill offers from the discount houses after
forecasting a shortage of around 1.2 billion stg in the money
market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills for
repurchase by the market will drain some 526 mln stg while
bills maturing in official hands and the take-up of treasury
bills will remove around 1.79 billion stg. A rise in note
circulation will take out a further 105 mln stg.
    Partly offsetting these outflows, exchequer transactions
will add around 1.01 billion stg and bankers' balances above
target some 185 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11798>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with early assistance of 689 mln stg in
response to an early round of bill offers from the discount
houses. This compares with the Bank's estimate that the system
would face a shortage of around 1.2 billion stg today.
    The central bank made outright purchases of bank bills
comprising 347 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct, 207 mln stg in
band two at 9-13/16 pct and 135 mln stg in band three at 9-3/4
pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11820>
Call money rates fell to 3.85/95 pct
from five pct yesterday in moderate trading as month end
tightness disappeared and operators took positions for April.
    Dealers said they expected rates to remain within a 3.70 to
four pct range this month. A minor tax payment period on behalf
of customers mid-month, the long Easter weekend and pension
payments were unlikely to tighten rates significantly.
    Next Wednesday, 14.9 billion marks are leaving the system
on the expiry of a securities repurchase pact. But dealers said
they expected the Bundesbank to fully replace the outflow with
a new tender at a fixed rate of 3.80 pct.
    Commerzbank AG's management board chairman Walter Seipp
called on the Bundesbank to reduce interest rates to protect
the mark through bringing the allocation rate for securities
repurchase agreements down.
    But dealers said the Bundesbank was unlikely to ease credit
policies at the moment. There was little domestic and foreign
pressure for lower rates and no signs of a change.
    Yesterday one or two large West German banks effectively
drained the domestic money market of liquidity in order to
achieve higher rates from their overnight deposits, dealers
said.
    Bundesbank figures showed banks held an average daily 50.7
billion marks in minimum reserves at the central bank over the
first 30 days of March, the exact requirement needed just one
day before the end of the month.
    Actual holdings on Monday were 42.0 billion marks.
    Because rates soared to the level of the Lombard emergency
funding rate yesterday, banks fell back on the loan facility to
draw down a high 5.3 billion marks in an attempt to meet
Bundesbank needs, the data showed.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11832>
The Bank of England said it had revised
its estimate of the shortage in the money market up to 1.3
billion stg from 1.2 billion before taking account of its early
operations.
    The Bank has provided 689 mln stg assistance so far today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11844>
Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita said
the present foreign exchange market instability will not last
long as there is caution in the market regarding the rapid
decline of the U.S. Unit.
    He told reporters the major currency nations are determined
to continue their concerted intervention whenever necessary to
stave off speculative dollar selling in line with their
February 22 currency stability agreement in Paris.
    Sumita also said he did not see the recent dollar drop as
anything like a free-fall.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11864>
The Bank of England said it has revised
its estimate of today's shortfall to around 1.25 billion stg
from 1.3 billion before taking account of 775 mln stg morning
assistance.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11944>
The Turkish Central Bank set a
lira/dollar rate for April 2 of 780.00/783.90 to the dollar,
down from the previous 777.00/780.89. The Bank also set a
lira/mark rate of 429.15/431.30 to the mark, up from the
previous 430.50/432.65.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11946>
The Federal Reserve is buying one
billion dlrs of Treasury bills for customer account for
delivery today, a spokesman for the bank said.
    Fed funds were trading at 6-3/16 pct at the time of the
purchase, which came several hours before the Fed normally
transacts business for its customers.
    Economists said the purchase was almost certainly related
to the investment of proceeds from recent central bank
intervention in the foreign exchanges.
    The Bank of Japan alone is estimated to have bought about
six billion dlrs in March in a bid to prop up the dollar.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11972>
The Bank of Finland said it has revised
the weightings in its currency basket with effect from today.
Weightings  match the respective country's share in Finland's
foreign trade.
    Weights in percentages compared with former weights.
    Dollar  9.0 (8.8)
    Sterling 14.3 (13.8)
    Swedish crown 20.4 (20.6)
    Norwegian crown 5.2 (5.2)
    Danish crown 5.2 (5.3)
    German mark 19.3 (19.6)
REUTER^M
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12121>
U.K. Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel
Lawson said he wanted sterling to stay roughly where it was,
specifying a rate of around 2.90 marks and 1.60 dlrs.
    He told the National Economic Development Council that the
recent Paris meeting of major industrialised nations had agreed
on the need for exchange rate stability. There was now a
"reasonable alignment of currencies" and the U.K. Government
intended to keep sterling at about its present level, he said.
    That meant around 2.90 marks, which is the single most
important rate to concentrate on, and 1.60 dlrs, Lawson said.
    His disclosure of two of the key targets for sterling was
highly unusual, foreign exchange market analysts said.
    In the past he has preferred to be less definite about the
Government's exchange rate policy, lest it give foreign
exchange markets set limits to test.
    Lawson told the committee, which is a tripartite forum of
government, unions and industry, that the pound would be kept
near its present level by a mixture of interest rates and
intervention in the foreign exchange markets.
    The pound finished trading here today at 1.6040/50 dlrs and
2.9210/45 marks.
    His disclosure of two of the key targets for sterling was
highly unusual, foreign exchange market analysts said.
    In the past he has preferred to be less definite about the
Government's exchange rate policy, lest it give foreign
exchange markets set limits to test.
    Lawson told the committee, which is a tripartite forum of
government, unions and industry, that the pound would be kept
near its present level by a mixture of interest rates and
intervention in the foreign exchange markets.
    The pound finished trading here today at 1.6040/50 dlrs and
2.9210/45 marks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12136>
The dollar's recent decline, despite
massive central bank purchases, is a forceful reminder that
official intervention in the foreign exchanges can work only if
it is well-timed to coincide with shifts in market fundamentals
or sentiment, dealers and analysts said.
    Central banks may succeed in slowing a trend, but, without
accompanying policy changes, they stand little chance of
reversing the direction of an ever-growing global market in
which more than 200 billion dlrs is traded every day, the
sources said.
    "Timing and psychology are the key to successful
intervention," said Jim O'Neill, a financial markets economist
with Marine Midland Banks Inc. The importance of complementary
changes in economic fundamentals was underlined yesterday when
a change in interest rates boosted the dollar, instantly
achieving what the central banks had tried in vain to do for a
week through open market intervention.
    After Citibank raised its prime rate by a quarter-point to
7-3/4 pct, the first change in the rate since last August, the
dollar started to advance and reached a high in Tokyo of 147.50
yen, up two yen from Tuesday's New York low.
    By contrast, monetary authorities spearheaded by the Bank
of Japan are estimated to have bought as much as 10 billion
dlrs in the last 10 days of March but could not prevent the
dollar from skidding through 150 yen and plumbing a 40-year low
Monday of 144.70 yen. Some experts worry the central banks have
lost more than just a temporary battle to prop up the dollar.
The market is wary of being caught wrong-footed by a central
bank foray, but is no longer mesmerized.
    "They've lost their credibility. The market feels it can
take on the central banks and win," said Michael Snow, head of
treasury operations at Union Bank of Switzerland in New York.
    The relative failure of recent intervention stands in sharp
contrast to the success that central banks scored when they
joined forces to drive the dollar down following the September
22, 1985, Plaza accord.
    Then, however, central banks had an easy time of it,
because the markets and the Treasuries of the major industrial
powers were agreed that the dollar needed to head lower to
redress massive worldwide trade imbalances.
    Now, there is no such consensus. The market is saying that
the dollar must fall further because the U.S. trade deficit is
showing little sign of improvement, while Japan is resisting in
a bid to protect its export industries.
    For its part, the United States is apparently content to
let the dollar fall gradually further and is paying little more
than lip service to the February Paris agreement of the Group
of Five plus Canada to foster stability, dealers say.
    Specifically, they said the Fed's dollar-buying
intervention has been half-hearted, designed more as a
political gesture to Japan than to strike fear into the
markets. "It's been pro-forma intervention," said Francoise
Soares-Kemp, chief corporate trader at Credit Lyonnais.
    Because of this discord and the market's momentum for a
lower dollar, analysts said intervention looks doomed to fail.
    "It's going to take a lot more than the central banks to
hold the dollar (at these levels)," said Snow, who predicts
another 10 to 15 pct depreciation.
    "There have to be structural changes that occur to make the
market stop selling dollars," added "Buying six billion dollars
in three weeks is not going to do it."
    Late last decade during the presidency of Jimmy Carter,
when the dollar was last under heavy speculative attack,
central banks sometimes intervened to the tune of six billion
dlrs in a single day but still failed to stop the dollar
falling to a record low of 1.70 marks, analysts said.
    Snow said purchases on that scale now are unlikely. "I
don't think anybody has the stomach for it, because they saw
the futility of it in the seventies."
    Indeed, because the market has grown in leaps and bound
since then, intervention on an even greater scale would
probably be needed to impress the market.
    Trading volume in London, New York and Tokyo alone last
year averaged nearly 188 billion dlrs a day, according to a
joint central bank study, about double the previous estimate
made just two years earlier by the Group of Thirty private
research group.
    There are signs that central banks, too, realize the
futility of swimming against the tide.
    Bank of Japan sources told Reuters in Tokyo earlier this
week that they believed the limits of currency market
intervention are perhaps being reached and that other methods
for bolstering the dollar, such as invoking currency swap
agreements with other central banks, are being considered.
    "In this era of financial liberalization, it's almost
impossible to control the flow of capital in and out of Japan,"
one senior official in Tokyo said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12145>
French Prime Minister Jacques Chirac
said that on financial issues, the United States and France had
"very close" views, and he said Treasury Secretary James Baker
was determined to support the February 22 Paris agreement on
stabilizing foreign exchange parities.
    "I was very reassured by the determination of Mr. Baker to
support this agreement," he said.
    He described the dollar's sharp fall against the yen at the
start of the week as a "passing incident" and added, "Everyone is
resolved to support the Paris accord."
    Questioned about his plan to help the world's poorest
countries, Chirac said he did not envisage any large-scale debt
write-offs.
    "I don't think we can talk of write-offs - even the poorest
countries have not asked for that," he said.
    Chirac said he wanted commercial banks to give third world
countries better terms in rescheduling their debts, and for the
International Monetary Fund to soften its conditions.
    "One cannot pity the banks - they bear a lot of
responsibility due to the encouragement they gave to these
countries to take on debts. Now the banks are complaining but I
do not weep for them."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12183>
The Federal Reserve bought about 550
mln dlrs of U.S. Treasury bills for a customer, a spokeswoman
said.
    She said the Fed bought bills maturing from May through
September 24 for regular delivery tomorrow.
    Federal funds were trading at 6-3/16 pct when the Fed
announced the operation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12396>
A world recession is unlikely this
year as fiscal and monetary policy in most industrialized
countries is supporting the economy, Deutsche Bank AG &lt;DBKG.F>
management board joint spokesman Alfred Herrhausen said.
    But growth rates will be smaller than last year, with 1.5
to 2.5 pct likely in most industrialized countries, he told a
news conference.
    Herrhausen said he was confident private consumption would
support economic growth in West Germany this year, with net
income increases turning into purchasing power as long as
inflation did not revive.
    Herrhausen said he did not expect interest rates to rise in
West Germany this year, but there was little room for further
falls. Rates in the U.S. were however rising, as evidenced by
the latest prime rate moves, but this rise would be moderate.
    Herrhausen said he did not expect any major narrowing of
the U.S. Trade and budget deficits in the next few months.
    One success of the Paris agreement in February to foster
currency stability was that U.S. Officials have stopped talking
down the dollar, he noted.
    The recent stability would last until markets decided to
test the resolve of central banks, he said.
    He noted that central banks had spent some 10 billion dlrs
this week to stabilize the dollar against the yen in the first
such test.
    "A massive attack on the mark, which could come if we get
bad news out of the U.S., Would require a much higher
intervention amount, raising the danger of inflation," he said.
    Turning to the international debt problem, Herrhausen said
Brazil's unilateral debt moratorium had surprised banks.
    But the move showed that a real solution to debt problems
was only possible with the involvement of all parties.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12406>
Money market rates rates showed a harder
edge after news U.K. Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson
has set a target for the pound against the mark and dollar, to
be maintained by a mixture of interest rates and intervention
in the foreign exchange markets.
    Dealers said the market was surprised by the Chancellor's
disclosure of sterling target rates, around 2.90 marks and 1.60
dlrs, and nervous over the implications for domestic interest
rates, further reducing the propects for a near term cut in
U.K. Bank base rates. The key three months interbank sterling
rate gained 1/16 point at 10 9-7/8 pct.
    The pound opened three basis points lower at 71.3 in trade
weighted terms, at around 1.59 dlrs and 2.91 marks.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12410>
The Bank of France is to inject liquidity
against first category paper at a tender this afternoon, a Bank
spokesman said.
    Money market sources were divided as to whether they
thought the Bank of France would use the occasion to cut its
intervention rate, which has stood at 7 3/4 pct since it was
cut from eight pct on March 9.
    Some thought a rate cut unlikely given foreign exchange
turbulence and the U.S. Prime rate rise to 7 3/4 pct, while
others still counted on a 1/4 point cut by the Bank of France.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12413>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
shortage of around 800 mln stg in the money market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills for
repurchase by the market will drain some 664 mln stg while
bills maturing in official hands and the take-up of treasury
bills will take out around 508 mln stg and a rise in note
circulation some 45 mln stg.
    Partly offsetting these outflows, exchequer transactions
and bankers' balances above target will add some 380 mln stg
and 35 mln stg to the system respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12416>
Taiwan said its foreign reserves suffered
about 3.4 billion U.S. Dlrs in exchange rate losses from July
1986 to February 1987 as a result of the rise of the Taiwan
dollar against the U.S. Currency.
    Yu Chien-ming, head of the government statistics
department, told parliament yesterday he expected the losses to
increase as the Taiwan dollar continues to strengthen.
    The Taiwan dollar, which opened at 34.24 to the U.S. Dollar
today, has risen about 16 pct against the U.S. Unit since
September 1985. Some bankers expect it to rise to 33 by June
and to 32 by the end of this year.
    Taiwan's foreign exchange reserves now total 53 billion
dlrs. At end-February they were 52.1 billion dlrs, the world's
third largest after West Germany and Japan.
    Yu said the interest earned from the reserves totalled
about 1.68 billion U.S. Dlrs from July 1986 to February 1987.
The reserves are managed by the central bank and deposited at
about 170 leading banks in the U.S., Japan, Britain, Canada and
Singapore.
    About 75 pct of the reserves are in the form of cash,
mostly in U.S. Dollars. The rest are in government treasury
bills, certificates of deposit and bonds.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12418>
Interest rates on the London money market
were slightly firmer on news U.K. Chancellor of the Exchequer
Nigel Lawson had stated target rates for sterling against the
dollar and mark, dealers said.
    They said this had come as a surprise and expected the
targets, 2.90 marks and 1.60 dlrs, to be promptly tested in the
foreign exchange markets. Sterling opened 0.3 points lower in
trade weighted terms at 71.3.
    Dealers noted the chancellor said he would achieve his
goals on sterling by a combination of intervention in currency
markets and interest rates.
    Operators feel the foreign exchanges are likely to test
sterling on the downside and that this seems to make a fall in
U.K. Base lending rates even less likely in the near term,
dealers said.
    The feeling remains in the market, however, that
fundamental factors have not really changed and that a rise in
U.K. Interest rates is not very likely. The market is expected
to continue at around these levels, reflecting the current 10
pct base rate level, for some time.
    The key three months interbank rate was 1/16 point firmer
at 10 9-7/8 pct.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12422>
The Finance Ministry has asked trust banks
to moderate their dollar selling, trust banking sources said.
    A Ministry official told Reuters earlier this week the
Ministry had recently surveyed foreign exchange transactions by
institutional investors, but he declined to say whether this
was aimed at moderating the dollar sales.
    Dealers said institutional investors were reluctant to sell
dollars aggressively today partly because of the Ministry
monitoring.
    One senior trust bank source said that while sympathizing
with the Ministry position, the trust banks had to conduct
their foreign exchange operations according to the dictates of
the market.
    A Bank of Japan official said the central bank approved of
the survey as long it was not used too forcefully.
    But another official denied local press reports that the
central bank itself had asked investors to moderate their
dollar sales. "We are not legally authorized to do that," he
said.
    A Bank of Japan official also said the central bank will
renew its call on financial institutions to moderate excessive
loans for the purpose of land and securities investment as such
investments threaten to cause inflation.
    Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita had previously
expressed concern about excessive investment in land and
securities resulting partly from eased credit conditions.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12437>
The Finance Ministry has asked commercial
banks to moderate their dollar sales, JiJi News Agency
reported, quoting financial sources.
    Finance Ministry officials were unavailable for comment.
The report also could not be confirmed by several bank dealers.
    Earlier, Japanese trust banking sources said the Ministry
had asked them to moderate their dollar sales.
    A Ministry official said earlier this week the ministry had
recently surveyed currency transactions by investors, but
declined to say whether this aimed at reducing their dollar
sales.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12447>
Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel
Lawson's remarks yesterday suggesting there are precise
exchange rate targets for the pound undermined sterling,
dashing hopes for an early cut in U.K. Base rates, analysts
said.
    But the market's reaction, testing exchange rate levels
indicated by Lawson, was probably overdone and the longer term
outlook for sterling remained bullish, they agreed.
    In an apparent break with the previous policy of secrecy,
Lawson told a National Economic Development Council meeting he
was comfortable with sterling exchange rates around current
levels, specifying rates of around 1.90 marks and 1.60 dlrs.
    Lawson added the U.K. Government intended to keep sterling
at about present levels, using currency intervention and
interest rates to achieve this.
    The February 22 Paris agreement of the Group of Five and
Canada to stabilise exchange rates is widely believed to
include target ranges, but all participants to the meeting had
so far refused to specify these.
    Markets were quick to react to the statement, chopping
about one U.S. Cent and over one pfennig off the pound to match
the levels mentioned by Lawson.
    But most analysts polled said they did not believe Lawson's
statement signalled a change in U.K. Policy.
    Keith Skeoch, chief economist at stockbrokers James Capel
and Co, said, "the remarks have been blown out of proportion.
Lawson is paying now for a little bit of a slip of the tongue."
    Barclays de Zoete Wedd economist Mark Brett said, "there is
nothing great and fantastic in the Chancellor's statement."
    He said he did not believe the rates indicated by the
Chancellor were precise targets, but merely represented central
rates around which sterling would be allowed to fluctuate,
perhaps by as much as 10 pct.
    "It would be insane to pinpoint an exchange rate ahead of an
election ... I don't believe Lawson is mad enough to tie
himself to a fixed rate," Brett said.
    Currency markets were keen for official statements to
clarify the scope of the Paris accord and reactivate currency
trading. This mood easily led to over-reaction, analysts said.
    "Making similar statements when the market is high strung
and ready to bounce is perhaps a mistake," one senior dealer
with a U.S. Bank said.
    Capel's Skeoch said, "it gives the foreign exchange markets
something to shoot at."
    "It is obvious that the government, as a member of the Group
of Six, has agreed exchange rate bands. But they are not cut in
stone, they can change with time," Skeoch said.
    Brett said, "we think the 2.90 marks level is a central
rate. Give or take 10 pfennigs and all is fine."
    Not all analysts played down the significance of the
remarks, however. Chris Dunn, economist at Royal Bank of
Canada, said the remarks may signal a decisive move to insulate
sterling from the fortunes of the dollar.
    Although about two-thirds of Britain's trade is conducted
with European countries, sterling has traditionally shadowed
the dollar rather than the mark, analysts noted.
    "Britain must decide whether it wants to follow the U.S. Or
throw in its lot with Europe," Dunn said.
    "It suggests that while the U.K. Is not actually applying to
join the European Monetary System, it is seeking protection by
shadowing it ... The Bundesbank has made it clear that it wants
the U.K. To clarify its position relative to the mark," he said.
    Analysts said sterling's dip on currency markets following
Lawson's remarks made an early half-point cut in U.K. Base
rates from current 10 pct levels unlikely in the short term.
    "Over the next three weeks, a cut is out, unless we get some
extremely good economic indicators," Capel's Skeoch said.
    Base rates have been cut twice by one-half point in March,
the last after the March 17 budget presentation, and analysts
had been expecting another half point cut shortly afterwards.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12453>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with 345 mln stg help in the morning session.
This compares with its forecast of a shortage of around 800 mln
stg in the system today.
    The central bank made outright purchases of bank bills
comprising 58 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct, 227 mln stg in
band two at 9-13/16 pct, 56 mln stg in band three at 9-3/4 pct
and four mln stg in band four at 9-11/16 pct.
    Dealers noted that this was the first time bills in band
four, which have a maturity of between two and three months,
have been dealt in the market since mid-February.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12456>
The Bundesbank left credit policies
unchanged after today's regular meeting of its council, a
spokesman said in answer to enquiries.
    The West German discount rate remains at 3.0 pct, and the
Lombard emergency financing rate at 5.0 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12470>
The Bank of Japan intervened just after
the Tokyo market opened, buying dollars at around 147.65 yen,
dealers said.
    They were unsure of the amount of the central bank's
purchasing, but it seemed to prevent the dollar from weakening
against the yen amid bearish sentiment for the U.S. Currency,
they said.
    The dollar opened at 147.65 yen against 147.20/30 in New
York and 146.90 at the close here yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12471>
The Bundesbank left credit policies
unchanged after today's regular meeting of its council, a
spokesman said in answer to enquiries.
    The West German discount rate remains at 3.0 pct, and the
Lombard emergency financing rate at 5.0 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12494>
The Bank of England said it had given the
money market a further 152 mln stg assistance in the afternoon
session.
    This takes the Bank's total help so far today to 497 mln
stg and compares with its forecast of a shortage in the system
of around 700 mln stg which it earlier revised down from 800
mln.
    The central bank made outright purchases of bank bills
comprising 34 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct, 39 mln stg in
band two at 9-13/16 pct, 51 mln stg in band three at 9-3/4 pct
and 28 mln stg in band four at 9-11/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12501>
The Bank of France said it left its
intervention rate unchanged at 7-3/4 pct when it injected funds
to the market against first category paper in todays money
market intervention tender.
    Money market dealers had earlier expressed mixed views on a
possible quarter point cut.
    The rate was last adjusted on March 9, when it was reduced
to 7-3/4 pct from the eight pct rate set in January.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12522>
Turkey's Central Bank set a lira/dollar
rate for April 3 of 782.50/786.41 to the dollar, down from
780.00/783.90. It set a lira/D-mark rate of 428.30/430.44 to
the mark, up from 429.15/431.30.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12523>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with around 40 mln stg late assistance. This
takes the Bank's total help today to some 537 mln stg and
compares with its estimate of a 700 mln stg shortage.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12554>
The Dutch central bank announced new
12-day special advances at an unchanged rate of 5.3 pct to
cover money market tightness for the period April 3 to 15.
     The amount will be set at tender on April 3 between 0700
and 0730 hours GMT.
    The new facility replaces the current 4.2 billion guilders
of nine-day advances which expire tomorrow.
    Money market dealers said the rate for the new advances was
in line with expectations. They added they expect the Bank to
allocate between 4.0 and 4.5 billion guilders.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12741>
The Duth Central bank said it accepted
bids totalling 4.086 billion guilders at tender for the new
twelve-day special advances at an unchanged 5.3 pct.
    Bids up to 30 mln guilders were met in full, amounts above
at 40 pct.
    The new advances, covering the period April 3 to 15,
replace the current 4.2 billion guilder nine-day facility at
5.3 pct, which expires today.
    Money market dealers said the total amount allocated was in
line with expectations and would be sufficient to cover the
money market shortage for the duration of the facility.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12745>
The Bank of England said it has forecast
a shortage of around 700 mln stg in the system today.
    Among the main factors, maturing assistance and take-up of
treasury bills will drain 546 mln stg, bills for repurchase by
the market 76 mln, a rise in note circulation 310 mln and
bankers balances below target 105 mln.
    The outflow will be partly offset by 340 mln stg exchequer
transactions.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12780>
The Bundesbank did not intervene as
the dollar was fixed lower at 1.8162 marks after 1.8270
yesterday, dealers said.
    The dollar firmed slightly from its opening 1.8135/45 marks
in very quiet pre-weekend trading and dealers said they
expected business to remain thin this afternoon.
    "Trading is at an absolute nil, nobody wants to get involved
ahead of next week's meetings," one dealer with a U.S. Bank
said, referring to the Group of Seven industrial nations and
the International Monetary Fund meetings in Washington.
    Dealers saw the dollar staying at current levels but
possibly rising above 1.83 marks on any supporting remarks
emerging from the meetings. "But the dollar's medium-term
direction is soft," one dealer said.
    The dollar could well come under renewed pressure after the
international forums as attention returned to the U.S. And the
U.K.'s trade dispute with Japan, dealers said.
    Cross currency trading was also subdued though sterling's
rise above 1.60 dlrs helped it to firm against the mark. It was
fixed higher at 2.924 marks after yesterday's 2.910.
    The pound was seen staying between 2.90 and 2.93 marks for
the next days, dealers said.
    Eurodollar deposit rates were steady from this morning,
with six month funds unchanged at midpoint 6-11/16 pct. Six
month euromarks stayed at midpoint 3-7/8 pct.
    The Swiss franc firmed to 119.86 marks per 100 at the fix
from 119.71 yesterday and the yen rose to 1.244 marks per 100
from 1.243.
    The French franc was little changed at 30.050 marks per 100
after 30.055 yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12785>
The Bank of England said it has revised
its estimate of today's shortfall to 750 mln stg from 700 mln.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12789>
The Bank of England said it has operated
in the money market this morning, purchasing 170 mln stg bank
bills. This compares with the Bank's revised estimate of a 750
mln stg shortfall. In band two the Bank bought 72 mln stg at
9-13/16 pct, in band three 52 mln at 9-3/4 pct and in band four
46 mln at 9-11/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12791>
West German Finance Minister Gerhard
Stoltenberg said the currency agreement reached in Paris in
February had been successful and would be continued.
    Stoltenberg told journalists before he attends next week's
International Monetary Fund meeting in Washington that: "The ...
Strategy to stabilise currencies around current levels has
proven its worth and will also determine future developments."
    Stoltenberg declined to comment specifically on what he
would consider to be an undervalued dollar but said a dollar
around 1.80 marks created problems for West Germany's exports.
    Stoltenberg said studies by international organisations had
made it clear that especially in the U.S. And in Japan major
efforts remained necessary to support adjustments in foreign
trade balances via necessary corrections to economic policy.
    "No-one would benefit if, after years of over-valuation, the
U.S. Dollar fell into the other extreme, that is, strong
under-valuation," he said.
    Stoltenberg said West Germany had a keen interest in a
swift agreement between the U.S. And Japan concerning the
current trade dispute over semi-conductors.
    Asked whether he believed the markets would test the Paris
currency accord, Stoltenberg did not comment specifically but
noted that much of what had been discussed in Paris had not
been published.
    The Paris declaration did not state the levels at which
central banks of the major industrialised countries would
intervene.
    Stoltenberg said that everything had been carefully
considered. He said he had nothing further to add.
    Stoltenberg also appeared to suggest that West Germany was
now no longer under any pressure from the U.S. Government to
stimulate its economy.
    He declined to respond specifically to a question on this
subject but said, "You must attach particular importance to the
consensus which was reached in Paris."
    The minister nevertheless added that he would make clear
during his trip to Washington that West Germany's nominal trade
figures gave a false impression about actual trade flows.
    Stoltenberg noted that in 1986 Bonn's exports fell by a
nominal two pct while its nominal imports fell by 10.7 pct.
West Germany's imports dropped largely because of foreign
currency developments and the cheaper price of oil and led to a
record trade surplus last year.
    However, Stoltenberg said that in real terms West Germany's
exports by volume had increased by 1.5 pct while real imports
had risen by a much stronger 6.2 pct.
    In this way West Germany had made its contribution to
economic stability, Stoltenberg added.
    Stoltenberg noted the government expected imports to rise
by a real four to five pct in 1987 with exports stagnating.
    He said it was too early to revise official forecasts for
West Germany's economic growth this year. The government has
forecast an unchanged 2.5 pct rise in Gross National Product.
    The Kiel Institute, a leading research body, is still
expecting growth of three pct but some other research
institutes have revised forecasts down to below two pct.
Stoltenberg said the wide range of predictions showed how many
imponderables had to be taken into account and said no drastic
changes in official forecasts were needed.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12795>
The Finance Ministry has asked Japanese
commercial banks to moderate their dollar sales, bank dealers
said.
    They said the Ministry had telephoned city and long-term
banks earlier this week to make the request.
    One dealer said this was the first time the Ministry had
made such a request to commercial banks.
    Finance Ministry officials were unavailable for immediate
comment. Dealers said the Ministry has already asked
institutional investors to reduce their sales of the dollar.
   REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12801>
West German net currency reserves rose
by 200 mln marks in the fourth week of March to 82.2 billion,
following a rise of 300 mln marks in the previous week, the
Bundesbank said.
    Non-currency reserves were unchanged at about 2.5 billion
marks, bringing net monetary reserves to 84.7 billion.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12806>
The departure of James Baker's
closest aide, Deputy Treasury Secretary Richard Darman, will
not change the course of Washington's domestic and
international economic policies, U.S. officials said.
    Darman, who has worked alongside Baker for six years, was
widely credited with helping him mastermind initiatives on
currency management and international economic cooperation.
    U.S. Officials said Darman also played a key role in
shepherding President Reagan's sweeping tax reform plan through
the U.S. Congress.
    But they flatly dismissed suggestions that his departure,
to the investment banking firm of Shearson Lehman Brothers,
signaled the Baker team was breaking up, or that the Treasury
Secretary himself might leave soon.
    "It really does not mean that, he took the opportunity as it
came up," one official said.
    Another commented, "Baker will miss him, but he's not going
to stand in his way."
    There has been widespread speculation since last autumn
that Darman sought a Wall Street job.
    Officials said Darman felt the passage of tax reform late
last year marked an appropriate moment to bow out.
    Baker acknowledged Darman would be sorely missed.
    "Dick Darman has contributed mightily to the success of this
administration over the past six years and his departure
represents a substantial loss," he said.
    U.S. Officials admitted Darman's absence would be an
undoubted blow to Baker, who has relied on him for policy
advice, both at the White House and, in Reagan's second term,
at the Treasury. One aide once described Darman as
"indispensable" to Baker.
    Baker is widely thought to want a more stable currency
system and Darman is generally credited by officials of other
nations as Baker's leading theorist on this issue, favouring
target zones to limit currency fluctuations.
    Earlier this year, monetary sources said the U.S. Treasury
unsuccessfully sounded out allies on a target zone system.
    But a U.S. Official disputed the assessment that, with
Darman gone, Baker would abandon international initiatives.
    Baker's work as head of Reagan's Economic Policy Council,
spearheading trade policy, and his skills in negotiating with
the Democrat-controlled Congress will go on as before.
    Darman's strength was not as an economist, but as a
political strategist "and that's Baker's strength too," the
official said.
    There were already indications that Baker, who throughout
his time in government has relied on a closely-knit circle of
advisers, has moved swiftly to find a successor.
    One possibility is that Baker might turn to George Gould,
who holds the number three Treasury position of
Under-Secretary.
    Gould, another close confidante, has known Baker for years.
    Before joining the Treasury in November 1985, Gould was a
partner at the Wall Steet firm of Wertheim and Co and formerly
headed Donaldson, Lufkin and Jenrette Securities Corp.
    The Darman announcement came on the eve of the semi-annual
meetings of the International Monetary Fund and the World Bank,
where many policies Darman helped shape will be debated.
    He helped Baker devise the September, 1985 Plaza Agreement,
when the United States, Japan, West Germany, France and Britain
curbed the dollar's strength. The pact was a major turning
point in U.S. Policy, ending a period of disdain for economic
cooperation and intervention in currency markets.
    Darman also worked on some other Baker initiatives, like
the Tokyo Summit agreement to intensify coordination of
economic policies among the leading industrial countries and
the recent Paris Agreement to stabilise currencies and
stimulate global growth.
    These policies are collectively aimed at redressing the
huge gap between Japan and West Germany's trade surpluses and
the United State's massive trade deficit.
    That policy goal still remains a prime objective of the
Reagan Administration and will not change with Darman's
departure.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12812>
The Bank of England said it has revised
its estimate of today's shortfall to 800 mln stg from 750 mln,
before taking account of 170 mln stg morning assistance.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12815>
European Community finance ministers
and central bankers meet in Belgium this weekend to discuss
strengthening Europe's joint currency float amid continuing
worries about turbulence on foreign exchanges.
    Belgian Finance Minister Mark Eyskens, who will host the
informal talks, told Reuters the ministers and central bank
chiefs would discuss the situation on currency markets in the
light of the February agreement among leading industrialised
countries to stabilise exchange rates around present levels.
    In an interview, Eyskens said he felt the Paris accord
between the United States, Japan, West Germany, France, Britain
and Canada had proved itself "more or less workable."
    But doubts over its effectiveness and durability have been
growing since fears of a trade war between the United States
and Japan over computer microchips pushed the dollar to a
record low against the surging yen early this week.
    The talks, at the Belgian resort of Knokke, are being held
to coordinate the EC's positions on monetary issues and Third
World debt ahead of the Spring meetings of the International
Monetary Fund and World Bank in Washington next week.
    The EC gathering begins tonight with a dinner but the main
discussions will take place tomorrow.
    Continued international currency turbulence could undermine
plans for reinforcing the European Monetary System, the joint
float holding eight EC currencies within narrow fluctuation
bands, which will feature high on the weekend agenda.
    Eyskens has repeatedly said that Europe needs a period of
calm on world currency markets, and in particular a more stable
dollar, before it can set about strengthening the EMS to make
it more resilient against exchange rate swings.
    The EMS has been taking a battering over the last year as
the falling dollar has sent funds surging into the dominant EMS
currency, the West German mark, forcing ministers to undertake
two major realignments of parities within nine months.
    In the interview, Eyskens made clear he was hoping for a
wide-ranging discussion on the future of the eight-year-old EMS
on the basis of proposals for bolstering it drawn up by the
EC's Monetary Committee and the Committee of Central Bank
Governors.
    The committees were asked to come up with the proposals
after the last reshuffle of EMS exchange rates in January.
    Eyskens repeated calls for the European Currency Unit, the
fledgling EC currency at the core of the system, to take over
the mark's dominant role in the EMS - a proposal that has met
with a cool response in West Germany.
    He said EC Commission President Jacques Delors would report
to the meeting on problems raised by plans to liberalise
capital movements fully within the 12-nation bloc by 1992, such
as the need for harmonising taxes and banking controls.
    Eyskens said liberalisation of capital movements without
strengthening the EMS would be an element of destabilisation in
the Community. 
    He said the crucial issue in the debate was whether member
states were willing to push further towards the EC's goal of
monetary integration on the basis of an EMS that included
management of exchange rates by some kind of common
institution, instead of by national central banks as at
present.
    Plans for the creation of such an institution, foreseen by
the EMS's founding fathers, have been thwarted by the
reluctance of some countries, notably West Germany, to gove up
their sovereignty in the monetary field.
    EMS development has also been held up by Britain's refusal
so far to join the system's core exchange rate mechanism.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12819>
The Bank of England said it has operated
in the money market this afternoon, buying back bills totalling
347 mln stg. This brings the total help so far today to 517 mln
stg and compares with the Bank's revised estimate of an 800 mln
stg shortfall.
    The central bank purchased in band one 20 mln stg at 9-7/8
pct, in band two 254 mln at 9-13/16 pct, in band three 66 mln
at 9-3/4 pct and in band four seven mln stg at 9-11/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12840>
The Bank of England said it has provided
around 205 mln stg late assistance to the market, bringing the
total help today to 722 mln which compares with the Bank's
revised deficit forecast of 800 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12842>
West German Finance Minister Gerhard
Stoltenberg said the currency agreement reached in Paris in
February had been successful and would be continued.
    Stoltenberg told journalists before he attends next week's
International Monetary Fund meeting in Washington that: "The ...
Strategy to stabilise currencies around current levels has
proven its worth and will also determine future developments."
    Stoltenberg declined to comment specifically on what he
would consider to be an undervalued dollar but said a dollar
around 1.80 marks created problems for West Germany's exports.
    He said studies by international organisations had made it
clear that especially in the U.S. And in Japan major efforts
remained necessary to support adjustments in foreign trade
balances via necessary corrections to economic policy.
    "No-one would benefit if, after years of over-valuation, the
U.S. Dollar fell into the other extreme, that is, strong
under-valuation," he said.
    Stoltenberg said West Germany had a keen interest in a
swift agreement between the U.S. And Japan concerning the
current trade dispute over semi-conductors.
    Asked whether he believed the markets would test the Paris
currency accord, Stoltenberg did not comment specifically but
noted that much of what had been discussed in Paris had not
been published.
    The Paris declaration did not state the levels at which
central banks of the major industrialised countries would
intervene. Stoltenberg said that everything had been carefully
considered. He said he had nothing further to add.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12877>
Turkey's Central Bank set a lira/dollar
rate for April 6 of 781.95/785.86 to the dollar, up from
782.50/786.41. It set a lira/D-mark rate of 430.15/432.30 to
the mark, down from 428.30/430.44.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12923>
The Federal Reserve is expected to take
no reserve-management action in the U.S. Government securities
market during its usual intervention period, economists said.
    They said that, if the Fed does act, it will likely add
temporary reserves indirectly by arranging one to 1.5 billion
dlrs of customer repurchase agreements.
    Federal funds, which averaged 6.14 pct yesterday, opened at
5-15/16 pct and remained there in early trading. Analysts
believe this probably is about where the Fed wants the funds
rate to be.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13053>
A steep drop in goods-producing jobs
detracted from U.S. March non-farm payroll employment and makes
it unlikely that the Federal Reserve will tighten monetary
policy to defend the dollar, economists said.
    U.S. March non-farm payroll employment rose 164,000, less
than the gain of 220,000 to 290,000 the financial markets
expected. Manufacturing employment fell 25,000, compared with
February's 50,000 gain, while March construction employment
dropped 45,000 after being unchanged in February.
    "The momentum of industrial activity is tapering off as we
end the first quarter," said Stephen Roach of Morgan Stanley
and Co Inc. "This sets the stage for more sluggish growth in
the second and third quarters."
    "The Fed will view this as a caution flag on the economy,"
he said. "They will not ease as long the dollar is weak, but
clearly they can't tighten."
    David Wyss of Data Resources Inc said that the downward
revision in February non-farm payroll employment to 236,000
from 337,000 means that employment gains in the first quarter
were weaker than expected.
    While Wyss left his first-quarter forecast of real U.S.
gross national product growth at 3.5 pct, he said the March
jobs data suggested a downward revision in his second-quarter
growth forecast to 2.5 pct from 2.8 pct.
    Bill Sullivan of Dean Witter Reynolds Inc said the average
monthly gain in non-farm jobs in the first quarter was only
237,000, compared with 254,000 in the fourth quarter of 1986.
    "There's momentum in first quarter labor force activity, 
but less than assumed," he said. "Gains in goods-producing jobs
were subdued at best. This rules out any possibilty of the Fed
tightening for exchange-related purposes."
    In March, the average workweek fell back to its January
level of 34.8 hours from 35.0 hours in February. Manufacturing
hours also fell back to their January level, totalling 40.9
hours in March compared with 41.2 hours in February.
    The Commerce Department noted that loss of manufacturing
jobs in March was concentrated in automobile, electrical and 
electronic manufacturing.
    Robert Brusca of Nikko Securities International said that a
13,000 decline in auto manufacturing employment accounted for
nearly half of the total drop in manufacturing jobs.
    Economists said that a build-up in auto inventories
resulting from a steep drop in sales has finally caught up with
the labor force and may point to slower growth ahead.
    Most expect an increase in inventories of as much as five
pct to offset a steep four to five pct drop in final sales in
the first-quarter GNP accounts.
    Roach said he expects first quarter U.S. GNP to rise two
pct, to be followed by a gain of 1.0-1.5 pct at best in the
second and third quarters. He said the March drop in industrial
activity "is a reasonable response in light of the inordinate
contribution inventory accumulation made to GNP."
    Economists said the employment data also suggest weak gains
in industrial production and personal income for March.
They expect only marginal gains, if not small declines, for
these indicators, compared with a February increases of 0.5 pct
in industrial production and 0.9 pct in personal income.
    Steve Slifer of Lehman Government Securities said the drop
in March construction employment may also signal a drop in
March housing starts, which rose 2.6 pct in February to 1.851
million units at an annual rate from 1.804 million units in
January.
    The rate of unemployment fell to 6.6 pct, its lowest level
since March 1980, from 6.7 pct in February. But Wyss pointed
out that this resulted from a drop in the labor force, which 
fell to 119.2 mln in March from 119.35 mln in February.
    "This just means that there were fewer people looking for
work, so the drop in unemployment doesn't mean much," he said.
    He said the latest employment report will not concern the
Fed because it does points to GNP growth in the first half of
2.5-3.0 pct, but "it does suggest they can't afford to tighten
to quickly either."
    The statistical factors used to smooth out seasonal
fluctuations in the jobs data may have understated March labor
force gains, just as seasonal factors probably overstated them
in January and February, Slifer said, but are consistent with
his forecast of 1.8 pct first quarter GNP growth.
    Economic growth remains sluggish, but Silfer does not think
that the Federal Open Market Committee changed policy at their
meeting this week. "At some point they will be more inclined to
ease," he said. For the time being, however, the March
employment report "increases the likelihood they won't tighten,
regardless of the dollar."

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13243>
British Chancellor of the
Exchequer Nigel Lawson said the next U.K. Election was not the
only element standing in the way of full British membership of
the European Monetary System (EMS).
    But he added that arguments against joining had weakened.
    Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher, widely believed to be the
strongest government opponent of full EMS membership, has made
clear she does not expect to consider joining until after the
next UK election, due by mid-1988 at the latest.
    But Lawson, in answer to a question, told reporters after
an informal European Community finance ministers' meeting here
that other factors apart from the upcoming election stood in
the way of full membership.
    In addition to the question of the exchange rates at which
Britain should enter the EMS's core exchange rate mechanism,
there was also the impact of sterling membership on the system
to be considered, he said.
    British entry would change the EMS from a monopolar system
based on the West German mark to a bipolar mark-sterling
system, he noted. "We have to make sure it would work."
    But Lawson added that some of the considerations that had
made it difficult for Britain to join in the past now posed
less of a problem.
    As an example he cited sterling's role as a petrocurrency,
which he said was diminishing. "That argument has clearly
weakened," he said.
    Lawson restated that the government was keeping the
question of membership under review.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13244>
European Community (EC)
finance ministers and central bankers agreed on the need for
greater cooperation to strengthen the European Monetary System
(EMS) against international market turbulence, officials said.
    "There was a general will to reinforce the European Monetary
System, with all that implies," Belgian Finance Minister Mark
Eyskens said yesterday after hosting a one-day session of
informal talks at this Belgian coastal resort.
    The gathering was the first such discussion since the
second major realignment of EMS parities within nine months in
January.
    The system has come under severe strain as funds have
flowed out of the slumping dollar and into the dominant EMS
currency, the West German mark, sending it soaring against
weaker currencies in the system.
    But Eyskens said February's agreement between leading
western industrialised nations to stabilise exchange rates at
around current levels was working and this would allow the EC
to speed up its efforts to boost the internal stability of the
EMS.
    He told a news conference yesterday's meeting agreed on the
need for closer coordination among EMS member governments of
interest rate policies and of interest rate differentials
between different countries.
    They also agreed they needed better coordination of
exchange market intervention to hold currencies stable, both
when they reached their fixed EMS limits and within their
agreed margins.
    But Eyskens said this coordination raised a whole range of
technical problems and ministers would discuss these further in
Luxembourg in June on the basis of proposals from the EC's
Monetary Committee and Committee of Central Bank Governors.
    He said the EC needed a set of indicators of economic
convergence betwen Community countries and it was important
that interest rates fulfilled this role together with exchange
rates and inflation rates.
    The Belgian minister, whose country presently holds the
presidency of the community, made clear the meeting had not
produced any agreement to move radically forward in developing
the EMS towards the EC's long term goal of economic and
monetary integration.
    "We have committed ourselves to reestablishing the normal
functioning of the system," Eyskens said.
    Eyskens has repeatedly stressed that he believes the EMS
has to be reinforced if the EC's plans to liberalise all
movements of capital across national borders by 1992 are to go
ahead.
    EC executive Commission President Jacques Delors told the
meeting the authority would put forward proposals for a final
phase of capital market liberalisation in October that would
include safeguard clauses for member countries for which the
move would create difficulties.
    Eyskens said the ministers and central bankers also
discussed the need to "dedramatise" realignments of EMS parities
by letting high-ranking monetary officials carry them out by
telephone rather than calling a meeting of finance ministers.
    However, West German sources said Bonn Finance Minister
Gerhard Stoltenberg was unenthusiastic about the idea.
    British Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson told
journalists that one of the technical issues raised by greater
coordination of exchange market intervention was the question
of which currencies should be used to intervene and held in
central bank reserves.
    He said several EMS member countries believed the EMS would
work better if central banks held each other's currencies -- an
issue of particular importance regarding West Germany since the
Bundesbank holds only dollars in its foreign exchange reserves.
    He said the debate on dedramatising EMS realignments
reflected a general feeling among participants that the way the
January reshuffle had been conducted was unsatisfactory.
   The realignment was marked by acrimony between France and
West Germany, with each side blaming the other for strains in
the system that forced the parity overhaul.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13245>
The Zambian currency further depreciated
yesterday at the second auction since the introduction of a
two-tier foreign exchange system last month.
    The (central) Bank of Zambia said the kwacha was pegged at
16.99 to the dollar, compared to last week"s rate of 15 to the
dollar.
    The bank, which offered six mln dlrs at the auction,
reported demand for 13.4 mln dlrs. At the previous auction, the
government offered eight mln dlrs.
    Last month the government set a fixed exchange rate of nine
kwacha per dollar, subject to adjustment against a basket of
five currencies, for certain official transactions.
    It also introduced a new weekly foreign exchange auction
only for parastatal organisations and the private sector, where
the exchange rate is allowed to float in accordance with market
demand.
    The new auction system is designed to be more restrictive
than the previous one, suspended in January after the central
bank fell 10 weeks in arrears to successful bidders.
    Under the new system, no bidder, except the the state oil
company Zimoil and the national airline Zambia Airways, is
allowed to bid for more than five pct of the foreign exchange
on offer.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13261>
U.S. Bond trading is likely to remain
cautious in the near term with a possible downward price bias
as market participants focus on trends in the dollar, the
economy and Federal Reserve policy, economists said.
    Most expect the economy to continue showing modest gains,
that the dollar has more room to fall and that the Fed will
keep policy essentially steady, perhaps for several months.
    Until trends are clearer, "the market can only attempt to to
establish and hold a new trading range at higher interest
rates," said economists at Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.
    Merrill Lynch economists Raymond Stone and Ward McCarthy
said that while the fundamentals generally bode for a healthy
investment climate, the market will have no confidence in this
environment until there is illumination of and confidence in
U.S. Dollar/trade policy.
    Salomon Brothers' Henry Kaufman said the bond market,
highly sensitized to dollar movements, could be encouraged if
currency markets seem to be stabilizing or if U.S. And overseas
economic growth is perceived as slowing sharply.
    "The crucial question, however, is how soon either of these
developments is likely to occur," Kaufman said.
    "Market uncertainties and the erosion of portfolio manager
confidence could continue portfolio selling pressure a while
longer," said Philip Braverman, chief economist at Irving
Securities Corp.
    However, Braverman said that, "from a longer term
perspective, current (bond) prices provide a buying
opportunity."
    Despite a nearly one-point bond price rebound Friday on
unexpectedly weak March employment data, key 30-year Treasury
bonds lost 2-1/4 points in price for the week as a whole and
Thursday's 7.93 pct closing yield was a 1987 high.
    Braverman said historical evidence suggests that a long
bond yield in the 7.93 pct area provides a basis for optimism.
Bonds closed at 7.86 pct on Friday.
    The Irving economist noted that three times last year, in a
similar "paroxysm of pessimism," the key bonds reached a similar
closing yield high. Within three to six weeks in each instance,
however, Braverman said bond prices recovered to bring the
yield down sharply by 63 to 82 basis points.
    Mitchell Held of Smith Barney, Harris Upham and Co Inc said
that many portfolio managers now believe yields could approach
nine pct by midyear, which he considers unlikely.
    Held said that, since late 1986, Smith Barney analysts have
spoken about the risk that interest rates could move higher and
they continue to believe that an upward bias is likely to
persist over the next few months.
    Held said that in conversations with portfolio managers
last week there appeared to be increasing belief that the rate
rise had just begun and that yields could approach nine pct by
midyear. Naturally, that would mean a sharp bond price fall.
    "Yields could rise further over the next few months, but the
rise should be less than the 65 basis point rise we've seen
since the start of the year," Held said.
    Most expect Fed policy to be neutral for bonds near term.
    "The Fed is currently frozen into a fixed stance," said
economists at Aubrey G. Lanston and Co Inc.
    They said the Fed cannot tighten policy and push up
interest rates as might be appropriate to stabilize the dollar
and head off renewed inflationary psychology. That might harm
the fragile U.S. Economic expansion.
    The Lanston economists said, "The Fed cannot ease its policy
stance to both foster more rapid economic growth and calm
domestic and Third World debt jitters without the threat of
causing a further decline in the dollar."
    Minutes of February's Federal Open Market Committee (FOMC)
meeting released Friday showed that while the FOMC left policy
unchanged it was more inclined to firm rather than ease policy
later if conditions in the economy, foreign exchange or credit
markets warranted a policy shift.
    However, economists generally believe that continued fairly
sluggish U.S. Economic growth and the financial strains on U.S.
Banks resulting from their problem loans to developing
countries rule out any Fed policy firming.
    There is broad agreement among economists that the FOMC at
last Tuesday's meeting also left Fed policy unchanged.
    This week's U.S. Economic data are expected to have little
impact. February consumer instalment credit numbers are due on
Wednesday, with March producer price data out Friday.
    There may be mild relief in some quarters that the U.S.
Purchasing Managers Composite Index, a closely-watched economic
indicator, rose only to 53.9 pct in March from 51.9 pct. A
Friday rumor had put the number far higher. The index's first
quarter average also was 53.9 pct, translating into real GNP
growth of about three pct if continued through 1987.
    Federal funds traded at 5-15/16 pct late Friday and are
expected to open about there today with no Fed action seen.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13270>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told a
parliamentary committee he expects major nations to reafffirm
the currency pact they struck in Paris when they meet this week
in Washington, political sources said.
    The Minister also was quoted as saying he expects major
nations to take coordinated action to ensure exchange rate
stability.
    Finance Ministry officials were unavailable for immediate
comment. In Paris on February 22, six nations - Britain,
Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And West Germany - pledged to
cooperate to hold their currencies stable.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13315>
The Bank of Japan intervened in early
afternoon Tokyo trading to support the dollar against active
selling by institutional investors and speculative selling by
overseas operators, dealers said.
    The central bank had also bought dollars against the yen in
morning trade.
    The dollar traded around 145.20/30 yen when trading began
in the afternoon here and weakened only slightly, the dealers
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13404>
The Bundesbank set a new tender for a
28-day securities repurchase agreement, offering banks
liquidity aid at a fixed bid rate of 3.80 pct, a central bank
spokesman said.
    Banks must make their bids by 1400 GMT today. Funds will be
allocated by 0900 GMT tomorrow and credited to accounts later
in the day. Banks must repurchase securities pledged on May 6.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13512>
The Bundesbank did not intervene as
the dollar was fixed lower at 1.8218 marks after 1.8243
yesterday, dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13524>
The Bank of Japan bought a small amount of
dollars at around 145.95 yen shortly after the Tokyo market
opened, dealers said.
    But the dollar then fell on speculative selling by trading
houses, they said.
    The dollar had opened here at 145.95 yen against 145.85/90
yen in New York and 146.00 yen at the close here yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13530>
The Bank of Japan will sell tomorrow a
total of 800 billion yen worth of financing bills from its
holdings to help absorb a projected money market surplus of
1,300 billion yen, money traders said.
    Of the total, 400 billion yen will yield 3.8502 pct on
sales from money houses to banks and securities houses in a
41-day repurchase accord maturing on May 19.
    Another 400 billion yen will yield 3.7991 pct in a 20-day
repurchase pact maturing on April 28, they said.
    The repurchase agreement yields compare with the 3.8125 pct
one-month, and 3.7500 pct three-week commercial bill discount
rates today.
    Tomorrow's surplus is attributable to government tax
allocations to local governments and public entities.
    The operation will put outstanding bill supply at about
4,300 billion yen, they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13531>
The Bundesbank did not intervene as
the dollar was fixed lower at 1.8218 marks after 1.8243
yesterday, dealers said.
    Dealers said dollar trading was very quiet over the
European morning, with operators made wary by today's meeting
of the Group of Five finance ministers and central bank chiefs
ahead of the full IMF/World Bank session in Washington.
    It was undermined by remarks from U.S. Council of Economic
Advisers Chairman Beryl Sprinkel who told Iowa bankers the U.S.
Had no objective regarding the value of the dollar.
    Sprinkel also called the reference to stabilizing exchange
rates at about current levels, made at the Paris meeting on
February 22, a "vague statement," casting doubt on operators'
assumptions that a secret target level had been set.
    Sprinkel added that if West Germany and Japan made progress
to stimulate their economies as the Paris agreement envisaged,
"there would not be the necessity of significant declines in the
dollar."
    One dealer for a U.S.-based bank noted the dollar tended
easier after the remarks. "They were obviously regarded as being
negative. And if the market starts regarding anything that
comes out negatively then it means that the underlying
sentiment is negative," he said.
    Some early selling pressure softened the dollar's
undertone.
    Most operators overlooked intervention by the Bank of Japan
to support the dollar against selling in favour of the yen by
institutional investors and overseas operators, dealers said.
    After the strong focus on the dollar/yen rate in recent
weeks up to the end of the Japanese financial year on March 31,
interest and activity was likely to switch, dealers said.
    "We can start to look at a point in time where the interest
shifts away from dollar/yen and more into dollar/mark and the
other European currencies," the U.S. Bank dealer said.
    Despite the softer undertone, traders would remain wary of
taking significant new positions during the Washington
meetings, dealers said. Aside from the G-5 session today,
Bundesbank President Karl Otto Poehl is due to meet the German
Affairs group on international monetary issues later.
    The mark gained some strength from news the Bundesbank set
a new securities repurchase tender to add money market
liquidity at a fixed 3.80 pct, unchanged from those over the
last several weeks. Some expectation had been growing that it
might cut the rate or move to a minimum interest rate tender,
signalling a desire for a slight easing in credit policy.
    Bundesbank central bank council member Lothar Mueller said
the Bundesbank had not given up its focus on money supply. A
monetary policy which took into account exchange rates and
capital flows could not be confused with an exchange-rate
oriented policy, he said, contradicting some growing sentiment.
    Sterling eased a touch to 2.950 marks at the fixing from
2.957. The yen's unabated strength, despite the intervention,
brought it up to 1.2555 marks per 100 from yesterday's 1.2480.
    The Swiss franc rose to a fix of 120.515 marks per 100 from
120.180. The French franc eased to 30.055 marks per 100 after
30.060, Belgian franc was little changed at 4.829 marks per
100.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13544>
The Bank of Japan intervened in early
afternoon Tokyo trading to support the dollar against active
selling by institutional investors and speculative selling by
overseas operators, dealers said.
    The central bank had also bought dollars against the yen in
morning trade.
    The dollar traded around 145.20/30 yen when trading began
in the afternoon here and weakened only slightly, the dealers
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13552>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with 224 mln stg help in the morning session.
This compares with the Bank's forecast of a shortage in the
system today of around 850 mln stg which it earlier revised up
from 800 mln.
    The central bank bought bank bills comprising 27 mln stg in
band one at 9-7/8 pct, 21 mln stg in band two at 9-13/16 pct
and 171 mln stg in band three at 9-3/4 pct.
    It also purchased three mln stg of treasury bills and two
mln stg of local authority bills in band three at 9-3/4 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13660>
Egypt's Central Bak left the dollar rate
for Commercial banks for April 8 unchanged at 1.353/67 pounds.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13739>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with a further 284 mln stg assistance in the
afternoon session.
    This takes the bank's total help so far today to 508 mln
stg and compares with its revised estimate of a 900 mln stg
shortage in the system which it earlier revised up from 850
mln.
    The central bank made outright purchases of bank bills
comprising 100 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct, 56 mln stg in
band two at 9-13/16 pct, 112 mln stg in band three at 9-3/4 pct
and 16 mln stg in band four at 9-11/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13869>
Shifts in domestic economic policy,
not a further fall in the dollar or trade restrictions, are the
key to reducing imbalances in trade and payments, Dutch Finance
Miniister H. Onno Ruding said.
    Ruding told a meeting of the World Trade Forum here that
protectionism would naturally lead to retaliation and aggravate
the problems of heavily indebted developing countries.
    "The main contribution towards resolving the still enourmous
U.S. trade deficit is not repeat not a further fall in the
dollar, is not still more protectionism in your country."
    "No, it is - like in other countries - changes in domestic
economic and financial policies," Ruding said.
    Ruding said he was less worried about a crisis of the
weakening dollar than he was in January before the Paris accord
to stabilize foreign exchange rates.
    He said the highest priority should be given to policy
changes in the United States, especially reducing the budget
deficit and encouraging domestic savings.
    But he said other countries, such as Japan and West
Germany, also needed to take greater steps toward reducing
their trade surpluses.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13903>
Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul
Volcker said a further large drop in the value of the dollar
could be counterproductive for world economic growth.
    Testifying before the Senate Banking Committee, Volcker
said that Europe and Japan were slowing exports and that growth
in those countries was also decreasing.
    "In that kind of situation, further sizeable depreciation
of the dollar could well be counterproductive," he said.
    Domestic expansion in foreign industrial countries has not
been enough to offset the effects of slower exports, Volcker
said.
    On the value of the dollar, Volcker said he could not say
whether it should be higher or lower to restore balance in
trade.
    "What we do know is that a substantial exchange rate
adjustment has already been made," he said.
    "That adjustment should be large enough, in a context of a
growing world economy and fiscal restraint in the United
States, to support the widespread expectations of a narrowing
in the real trade deficit in the period ahead," he said.
    Volcker said U.S. exports were now growing substantially
while import growth should slow.
    Volcker said that to improve the trade deficit with a
minimum of inflationary pressure, the United States would have
to slow its spending growth.
    It would also have to achieve a better balance between
investment and domestic savings if it wants to be able to
dispense with foreign capital.
    "The constructive way to work in the needed direction would
be to reduce our budget deficit, year by year, paving the way
for improvements in our trade accounts," he said.
    Relying on depreciation of the dollar alone would risk
renewed inflation, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13919>
The Turkish Central Bank set a
Lira/Dollar rate for April 8 of 784.50/788.42 to the Dollar,
down from the previous 784.35/788.27.
    The Bank also set a Lira/Mark rate of 430.60/432.75 to the
Mark, down from the previous 429.35/431.50.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13949>
Bundesbank council member Lothar
Mueller said the bank has not given up its money supply policy
and that restraining money supply growth does not always mean
pushing up interest rates.
    Mueller said in an article for the Boersen Zeitung
financial daily that a monetary policy which took into account
exchange rate expectations and capital flows could not be
confused with an exchange rate oriented policy.
    The article followed international press speculation that
the Bundesbank had abandoned money supply targetting in favour
of an exchange rate policy.
    Mueller, a member of the Bundesbank council in his position
as president of the regional state central bank in Bavaria,
noted that the Bundesbank's decision in January to cut leading
interest rates amid continuing strong monetary growth had led
some people to think it was dropping monetary targetting.
    "Simply to ignore the external economic context would be
risky and dangerous for monetary policy," he explained.
    Mueller said the cuts in official interest rates had put an
end to interest rate speculation. The Bundesbank could now
assume that upward pressure on the mark would ease and currency
inflows slow down.
    Lower money market rates, achieved by widening short and
long term interest rate differentials, also encouraged
investors to re-invest funds parked in liquid accounts, Mueller
said.
    The measures therefore aimed clearly at bringing monetary
growth back onto the desired path, he said.
    "Finally, of course, and there is no need to keep this
quiet, the cut in interest rates was also in line with the
changed economic situation of the last few months," he added.
    "All in all, the Bundesbank in no way abandoned its money
supply policy with the January discount rate cut, despite
suppositions to the contrary," Mueller said.
    "Keeping money supply developments in check is not always
synonymous with raising interest rates, especially when
excessive liquidity due to inflows from abroad, rather than
growth in bank credits, is the cause of rising monetary
holdings of non-banks," Mueller said.
    Now that West Germany no longer ran large external deficits
other concepts were needed for monetary policy.
    Mueller said it would be both difficult and dangerous for
monetary policy to pursue a specific mark/dollar exchange rate.
    In any case, the exchange rate partly depends on U.S.
Currency and budgetary policy and the U.S. Economy, he said.
    But an exchange rate orientation would also mean the end of
a strict stability policy because both interest rates and
liquidity would be affected by required currency intervention
and could no longer be steered autonomously by the Bundesbank.
    Even interest rates are not in the centre of the
Bundesbank's considerations, but reflect competition and other
market conditions, Mueller said.
    A cut in bank liquidity will not directly influence central
bank money stock, the Bundesbank's main money supply indicator.
    This does not reflect banking liquidity, but the liquidity
of industry and households which cannot be directly reached
with the Bundesbank's instruments, Mueller said.
    The less dependent non-banks are on bank credits, the
harder it is to steer money supply. This has increasingly been
the case recently, because non-banks have received considerable
sums from current account surpluses and capital imports.
    "If the Bundesbank had tried to brake the money supply rise
with higher interest rates, as would have been appropriate if
credit was growing excessively, it would not only have missed
its target but probably even set off further inflows," he said.
    Mueller said growth in money supply was still too high.
    In the last three months money stock grew at an annual rate
of seven pct, down from 10 pct in the previous quarter.
    The growth curve has therefore come closer to the three to
six pct 1987 target corridor for central bank money stock
growth, pointing to the success of the current policy, he said.
    But high monetary stocks can be a warning sign and there
should be no change in priorities. "Monetary policy must be
first and foremost stability policy and successful stability
policy is money supply policy -- nothing else," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13950>
Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul
Volcker said international policymakers should make improving
the stability of exchange rates a major priority.
    In testimony before a Senate Banking subcommittee, Volcker
said he does not have any specific proposals for improving
exchange rate stability, but thought it was worthy goal.
    "I do think we ought to be thinking about and working toward
greater exchange rate stability," Volcker said. "I think that the
objective of greater exchange rate stability ought to loom
larger among our various policy priorities."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13958>
This week's Group of Seven (G-7) meeting in
Washington provides an opportunity to verify an accord reached
at the Tokyo summit last May to include Italy and Canada in
Group of Five (G-5) talks on management of the international
monetary system and related issues, the Italian Treasury said.
    It said in a statement the G-7 meeting, which Italy plans
to attend, will provide a forum for considering the Tokyo
accord in the light of events in Paris in February this year.
    On February 22, Italy boycotted a meeting in Paris of its
G-7 partners - the United States, Japan, West Germany, France,
Britain and Canada - after being excluded from an earlier
session of talks involving G-5 members.
    Today's statement from the Italian Treasury said-
    "Nobody denies the existence of G-5 but we should like it to
be remembered that the Tokyo accords provided for the
enlargement of the group to Italy and Canada whenever "the
management or the improvement of the international monetary
economic policy measures are to be discussed or dealt with.'"
    Italy refused to attend the Paris G-7 meeting on the
grounds that G-5, grouping the United States, Japan, West
Germany, France and Britain, had reduced Italy's role to rubber
stamping agreements already taken.
    The Italian Treasury said today that Italy was "certain that
this time incidents would not occur."
    But it said it would be opportune to look in depth at the
role and the procedures of G-7 in relation to those of G-5.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13988>
Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul
Volcker said the performance of the dollar in exchange markets
could be a factor in the U.S. central bank's decisions on
monetary policy.
    "The performance of the dollar in the exchange market might
become a factor bearing on our provision of reserves," Volcker
said in testimony to the Senate Banking Committee.
    He said that fiscal policy changes in the United States,
Germany and Japan would be more important that intervention to
instill confidence in current exchange rate levels.
                      
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13994>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
intervene in the government securities market to supply
temporary reserves indirectly via customer repurchase
agreements, economists said.
    They said the Fed is expected to execute anywhere from
1.5-2.0 billion dlrs of customer repos to offset seasonal
pressures on bank reserves.
    Federal funds, which averaged 6.20 pct yesterday, opened at
6-1/8 pct and remained there in early trading.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14055>
Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul
Volcker said a restrictive monetary policy would be damaging to
investment and that a better course would be to restrain
spending.
    "A restrictive monetary policy would hit investment. You
don't want to put interest rates up unless you have to," Volcker
told the Senate Banking Committee.
    "That is not a constructive way to proceed," he said.
    Volcker said that given a choice between squeezing the
budget deficit or squeezing investment, he would favor
squeezing the budget deficit.
    In response to a question about banks, Volcker said he
would be pleased if Congress decided to give banks a tax
writeoff as an incentive for them to take greater reserves
against loans to debtor countries.
    "If you give a tax writeoff for reserving against loans,
then we will see more reserving and that would make me happy,"
Volcker told Committee Chairman Sen William Proxmire (D-Wisc).
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14178>
The Federal Reserve entered the
government securities market to arrange two-day repurchase
agreements for system account, a spokeswoman for the New York
Fed said.
    Fed funds were trading at 6-1/8 pct at the time of the
direct injection of temporary reserves, dealers said.
    Most economists had expected a less aggressive injection of
reserves via customer repurchase agreements.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14207>
Loans and advances from the Dutch
Central Bank to the commercial banks rose by 1.2 billion
guilders to 10.7 billion in the week up to and including April
6, the Bank's weekly return showed.
    Paper discounted with the Bank also rose, by 477 mln
guilders to 916 mln.
    These rises were balanced by a 1.6 billion guilders rise in
the Treasury's account at the Bank, made up mainly of
repayments on housing loans by local authorities.  The
Treasury's account stood at 8.1 billion guilders, the weekly
return showed.
    The Bank's gold and currency reserves rose by 484 mln to
56.89 billion guilders, while the value of non-gold holdings
rose by 140 mln guilders, analysts said.
    They added that the rise in the reserves was merely the
result of commercial currency transactions by the Bank.
    Call money and period tariffs were only fractionally
changed this week and were seen sustaining their stable levels
since no dramatic changes in the money market debt, currently
around 10.25 billion guilders, are expected.
    Today call money traded between 5-3/8 to 5-1/2 pct and
period tariffs all between 5-5/16 to 5-7/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14757>
Japan will seek to strengthen the
Paris accord on currency stability at the meeting of the group
of seven leading industrial nations tomorrow, Japanese
officials said.
    However, the officials travelling with Japanese Finance
Minister Kiichi Miyazawa and who asked not to be identified,
would not provide any details of how they wanted the accord,
which was signed by the six leading industrial democracies in
February, to be strengthened.
    Currency target zones, or reference ranges, will not be
discussed at the G-7 meeting which is scheduled for tomorrow,
the Japanese officials said.
    The meeting, which is being held in conjunction with this
week's International Monetary Fund/World Bank sessions, will
reaffirm the currency pact and there is no need for changing 
the language used in the Paris accord, the officials said.
    Miyazawa met with U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker early
in this afternoon and discussed the dollar/yen exchange rates,
officials said, but they declined to disclosed the details of
that discussion.
    The Japanese officials also declined to detail what
Miyazawa and Baker discussed on the subject of greater joint
intervention in currency markets to stabilize the dollar or on
independent American intervention.
    The officials said such a money market action to stabilize
the dollar is not only for the benefit of Japan, which is
suffering from a sharp appreciation in its currency, but also
for the benefit of the United States as well.
    As to U.S. urgings for Japan to take steps to boost its
domestic demand to reduce its trade surplus, Japan will explain
economic measures to the G-7, the officials said.
    However, Miyazawa failed to outline the size of the
Japanese economic package in his meeting with Baker today
because the Japanese 1987/88 budget has not been authorized by
the Diet, or parliament, despite the new fiscal year which
started April one, the officials said.
    Japan's ruling liberal democratic party revealed its own
economic package today calling for more than 5,000 billion yen
in additional spending.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14767>
News of an agreement among G-5 and G-7
finance ministers meeting in Washington this week will be key
to the direction of currency futures at the International
Monetary Market, but any such agreement will need to go beyond
the Paris accord to stem the recent rise in futures, financial
analysts said.
    "If they (the finance ministers) give the market something
really new to look at -- that is, some package that goes beyond
the Paris agreement -- you could have a real boost in the
dollar," said Shearson Lehman Brothers analyst Anne Mills.
    On the other hand, "anything neutral would tend to be
bearish for the dollar," Mills said.
    Traders and analysts agree a simple reaffirmation of the
Paris accord will not be enough to halt the decline in the
dollar, nor will central bank intervention.
    "A lot of people are looking for a reason to buy currencies
and sell the dollar," said one trader for a large retail firm
on the floor of the IMM.
    "If there is no concrete resolution, they will be looking
to sell the dollar, possibly down to the 1.80 mark level," he
said.
    Technically, most currency futures are poised for another
rise, said Smith Barney Harris Upham analyst Craig Sloane.
    Sloane noted that June yen futures set a new contract high
on Tuesday and closed at its best level ever, while June
sterling set a new contract high on Monday.
    "Everything seems to be coming to a head right now and you
don't need much to get things rolling," Sloane said.
    In particular, the June Canadian dollar, for which Sloane
recently put out a buy recommendation, has hovered in a range
between 0.7600 and 0.7660 in recent weeks, forming a triangle
on the charts from which it may soon break out on the upside.
    A close above the contract high of 0.7665 would signal a
breakout, Sloane said, and would likely mean the nearby
Canadian dollar contract would extend its advance to near the
0.7800 level. June Canadian dollar closed at 0.7656 Tuesday.
    Mills noted, however, that interest rate differentials
between Canadian securities and U.S. securities have narrowed
dramatically recently, with yields on 10-year Canadian bonds
only about 80 basis points above U.S. 10-year notes.
    What has helped the Canadian currency, she noted, is an
increasing proportion of foreign funds flowing into the
Canadian equity market, particularly from Japanese investors.
    Other analysts, however, said currency futures may be near
the top of their long-term rally.
    "Something will be done at the (G-5 and G-7) meeting to
calm people," said David Horner of Merrill Lynch Economics.
    The Paris accord has pretty much fixed where major European
currencies will trade, Horner said.
    But sterling futures may still make another run for new
highs, up to 1.6300 to 1.6500 dlr in the June contract, on the
positive atmosphere that will prevail before British elections
and possibly another interest rate cut, Horner said. The June
British pound closed at 1.6080 on Tuesday.
    Horner said that new boundaries for the trading range of
the yen are likely to come out of the G-5 and G-7 meetings.
    The most likely range will be a bottom for the dollar
between 140 to 142 yen per dollar and a top near 150 to 152
yen, Horner said. In yen futures, the bottom of the dollar's
range would be equivalent to 0.007100 to 0.007150 in the June
contract. June yen closed at 0.006913 on Tuesday.
    If such a range does emerge from the meetings, "we will
have one more rally in the yen," Horner said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14770>
Bundesbank President Karl Otto Poehl
said a weaker dollar would be risky and a further appreciation
of the mark would damage prospects for sustained West German
economic growth.
    In a speech to the Institute of Contempory German Affairs
here, Poehl said "It would be an extremely risky policy to aim
for a further substantial decline in the value of the dollar to
correct the trade deficit."
    He said the United States could face a vicious circle of
depreciation, inflation and more depreciation if it took that
route.
    Poehl noted West Germany had already taken steps to meet
U.S. Demands for greater stimulation of its domestic economy,
accelerating tax cuts, cutting interest rates and tolerating
above-target money supply growth.
    He said he would have been happy to have brought forward
five billion marks of tax cuts now planned for January 1988 to
the beginning of this year, but he said the government faced
political constraints getting such measures through the upper
house of the West German parliament.
    But there were also limits to the impact West Germany could
accept on exports from a rising mark, he said.
    Poehl said West Germany relied on exports for about
one-third of its gross national product, so a substantial
erosion of export markets could not be offset by increasing
demand at home.
    "A further appreciation of the mark could even be an
obstacle to further growth," he said.
    Poehl said the Bundesbank had tolerated rapid money supply
growth last year because the country enjoyed low inflation and
because external factors, including low oil prices and
favourable terms of trade, had given some extra leeway.
    But Poehl said West Germany now faced a difficult dilemma
over monetary policy.
    The underlying rate of inflation was now two pct, not the
reported negative inflation rates last year, and West Germany
was affected more than before by exchange rate developments.
    "For the time being, we will have to focus our policy more
on the external side, and we can live with a more expansionary
money supply. But we must be very careful," he said.
    He said he shared some of the U.S. Concern about Japan's
trade surpluses, which affected European countries as well as
the United States.
    Poehl welcomed the so-called Louvre accord of monetary
officials of major industrialized countries, saying the
importance of the February 22 agreement to stabilize exchange
rates had been underestimated.
    All partners had agreed that the dollar was at about the
right level, and that further changes would damage growth, he
said.
    "This was a remarkable change in attitude, especially on the
part of our American colleagues," he said.
    But he said there was still a danger that the correction of
the dollar's value could overshoot.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14779>
The Bank of Japan bought a small amount of
dollars shortly after the opening at around 145.30 yen, dealers
said.
    The central bank intervened as a medium-sized trading house
sold dollars, putting pressure on the U.S. Currency, they said.
    The dollar was also supported by a major electrical
consumer goods company, which was a speculative dollar buyer at
around 145.25 yen, they added.
    The dollar opened at 145.33 yen against 145.60/70 in New
York and 145.25 at the close here yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14785>
THE BANK OF KOREA SAID IT FIXED THE
MIDRATE OF THE WON AT 844.30 TO THE DOLLAR, ITS HIGHEST LEVEL
SINCE FEBRUARY 26, 1985, WHEN IT WAS 843.90.
    THE WON WAS SET at 845.50 YESTERDAY.
    THE WON HAS RISEN 2.03 PCT AGAINST THE DOLLAR SO FAR THIS
YEAR, AFTER RISING 3.34 PCT IN 1986.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2022>
The Bank of England said it had given the
money market 206 mln stg of assistance this afternoon and
offered the discount houses borrowing facilities to take out
the rest of the 1.10 billion stg shortage, revised down from an
initial 1.15 billion estimate.
    It made no alteration to its established dealing rates,
buying 95 mln stg of band one bank bills at 10-7/8 pct and 111
mln of band two bank bills at 10-13/16 pct. This brings the
Bank's total assistance so far today to 243 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2025>
Responsibility for the appreciation of
the Taiwan dollar and the South Korean Won lies soley with
those countries, said U.S. trade representative Clayton Yeutter
    Speaking to the Asia Society, Yeutter said that it is in
those countries' own long-term interest to raise the value of
their currencies against the dollar.
    Yeutter was responding to a question about what the U.S.
could do to encourage appreciation of those currencies against
the dollar in order to reduce the large U.S. trade deficits
with Taiwain and Korea.
    "An undervalued currency will help those countries' exports
in the short term, but in the long run they have to be
concerned about how they are perceived in the international
business community," Yeutter said.
    For Taiwan, Yeutter said that with its per capita trade
surplus with the U.S., much larger than that of Japan's, and
with huge foreign exchange reserves, it was difficult to defend
the high import tarrifs and other barriers that prevail in that
country.
    He also said that the south Korean Won should begin to move
to reflect underlying economic fundamentals, "otherwise in two
or three years' time, Korea will be in the same situation that
prevails in Taiwan."
    Turning to the U.S. deficit with Japan of more than 50
billion dlrs, Yeutter said that this situation was not
sustainable.
    "Something must give soon. If not, there is a great threat
of U.S. legislative action to counteract that trend," Yeutter
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2190>
Commerce Dept. undersecretary of
economic affairs Robert Ortner said that he believed the dollar
at  current levels was fairly priced against most European
currencies.
    In a wide ranging address sponsored by the Export-Import
Bank, Ortner, the bank's senior economist also said he believed
that the yen was undervalued and could go up by 10 or 15 pct.
    "I do not regard the dollar as undervalued at this point
against the yen," he said.
    On the other hand, Ortner said that he thought that "the yen
is still a little bit undervalued," and "could go up another 10
or 15 pct."
    In addition, Ortner, who said he was speaking personally,
said he thought that the dollar against most European
currencies was "fairly priced."
    Ortner said his analysis of the various exchange rate
values was based on such economic particulars as wage rate
differentiations.
    Ortner said there had been little impact on U.S. trade
deficit by the decline of the dollar because at the time of the
Plaza Accord, the dollar was extremely overvalued and that the
first 15 pct decline had little impact.
    He said there were indications now that the trade deficit
was beginning to level off.
    Turning to Brazil and Mexico, Ortner made it clear that it
would be almost impossible for those countries to earn enough
foreign exchange to pay the service on their debts.  He said
the best way to deal with this was to use the policies outlined
in Treasury Secretary James Baker's debt initiative.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2286>
A Treasury Department spokesman
refused comment on statements by Robert Ortner, undersecretary
of economic affairs for the Commerce Department, that the
Japanese yen was undervalued.
    Ortner, senior economist at the Commerce Department, told
an Export-Import Bank conference "the yen is still a little bit
undervalued," and "could go up another 10 or 15 pct."
    Asked for reaction, a Treasury spokesman said officials
were aware of Ortner's comments but had no intention of making
any comment on them.
    Ortner, who stressed he was expressing personal views, said
he thought the U.S. dollar was "fairly priced"
against most European currencies and added "I do not regard the
dollar as undervalued at this point against the yen," he said.
    But the yen should go up 10 or 15 pct in value, Ortner
said, because it is undervalued against the dollar.
    The United States and major trade allies West Germany,
France, Britain, Japan and Canada met recently in Paris to
discuss maintaining stability in international currency values.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2352>
A reduction of the U.S. federal budget
deficit will be needed to help eliminate the nation's huge
trade deficit, U.S. trade representative Clayton Yeutter said.
    Speaking to the New York Chamber of Commerce and Industry,
Yeutter said "Capital and trade flows are clearly
inter-releated now.
    "Unless we get the budget deficit down, we will not get the
trade deficit down."
    He did not elaborate on his views of the linkages between
the two deficits.
    Private analysts have said that the financing of large U.S.
budget deficits requires heavy capital inflows from overseas
investors through purchases of U.S. Treasury and, to a lesser
extent, other U.S. securities as well.
    "We'll make some progress in reducing the 170 billion dlr
trade deficit in 1987, but there's still a long way to go,"
Yeutter said.
    He said the problem must be approached on many fronts and
focus most strongly on U.S. and overseas fiscal and monetary
policies to foster economic growth, U.S. competitiveness and
the establishment of a "level playing field" for trade.
    The U.S. trade representative said the Federal Reserve
under Chairman Paul Volcker has done its part to improve the
trade situation by getting interest rates down.
    On the fiscal side, Yeutter said "the budget deficit is
still our biggest problem" and there has not been enough
progress toward reducing that deficit.
    In the international area, he said that "our major trading
partners could still do more to stimulate domestic growth."
Commenting on Japan, which is running around a 80 billion dlr
trade surplus with the United States, Yeutter said "Japan is
just not doing the job on the import side."
    Yeutter declined to comment on statements relating to the
dollar made earlier today by Commerce Dept undersecretary of
Economic Affairs Robert Ortner.
    In a Washington address to an Export-Import Bank sponsored
meeting, Ortner said he believed the dollar at current levels
was fairly priced against most European currencies, but that
the yen is 10 or 15 pct undervalued.
    "The market will determine the dollar's proper value in the
end," Yeutter said. However, he added that, if the U.S. and
other nations do not take the necessary steps to cut the U.S.
trade deficit, "the dollar will be the equalizer."
    Yeutter said there is no quick fix to the trade problem and
any resort to such tactics as protectionist trade legislation
or trade restrictions poses real dangers.
    He said "there's relatively little that Congress can do to
legislate a solution to the trade problem."
    Protectionist legislation will only provoke retaliation by
U.S. trading partners, Yeutter said.
    "There is no doubt in my mind about the willingness of our
trading partners to retaliate against unfair trade
legislation," Yeutter said, adding that policy flexibility is
essential in solving international trade problems.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2354>
The highly visible drama involving the
yen's sharp rise against the U.S. Dollar is obscuring the fact
that the Japanese currency has hardly budged against major
European currencies, thus creating a new set of exchange rate
distortions, Japanese and European research officials said.
    The officials, looking beneath the rhetoric of statements
by the Group of Five (G-5) industrial nations, told Reuters the
currency movements of the past two years are also creating a
fundamentally new world trade picture, which is throwing up new
trade tensions and imbalances.
    Trade figures show that the new currency alignments are
already changing the Japan-U.S. Trade axis into a Japan-
European Community (EC) axis, to the discomfort of Europe.
    In many ways, not least in terms of rare international
cooperation, the September, 1985 New York Plaza pact between
the U.S., Japan, West Germany, Britain and France to cut down
the value of the dollar was a historic one.
    But it is the underlying peaks and troughs of the major
currency movements which lay bare the real picture, in which
the Plaza pact appears as an event of prime importance, but not
necessarily central significance, the officials said.
    The officials said that when the Plaza agreement took
place, the dollar was already on its way down. The agreement
simply helped it on its way. Senior EC financial expert in
Tokyo Tomas de Hora has watched the movements closely.
    "You have to look at the dollar's peak compared with now,
and that was well before Plaza," he said.
    On February 25, 1985, the dollar peaked against the yen at
263.15 yen. On September 20, the Friday before Plaza, it was
242. Since then, despite massive Bank of Japan intervention and
periodic market frights about further G-5 concerted action, the
dollar trend has been down, down, down.
    Yet the ECU is now around 173.4 yen. The historical cross
rates for sterling and the mark tell much the same story. The
European currencies are moving back up against the yen.
    The close relationship between exchange rates and trade
flows makes it difficult to see which is driving which, but
undoubtedly the trade equation between the big three is
changing. In 1986, Japanese imports and exports with the EC
both grew by around 50 pct in dollar terms, five pct in yen.
This gave Japan a 16 billion dlr trade surplus.
    Last January, Japanese exports to the EC totalled half of
of sales to the U.S, against about a third in recent years.
    Trade with the U.S in 1986 rose 23 pct for exports and 12
pct for imports in dollar terms, but fell 13 pct for exports
and 21 pct for imports in yen terms.
    "The basic meaning for Europe is that Japanese firms have a
tremendous interest in exporting to Europe, where every unit
sold maximises profits in yen terms, which is what is important
to them. Suddenly, instead of the U.S., It is Europe that is
laying the golden egg," said de Hora.
    The EC is worried. EC business also had a remarkable year
in Japanese sales, but this can be explained partly due to its
start from a small base, compared with total Japan-U.S. Trade.
    The Japanese think EC firms are now more competitive than
U.S. Firms, a factor which is aggravating the exchange rate
imbalance, and which will cause problems.
    "This currency alignment between Japan and the EC is
reflecting the excellent performance of the EC countries. But
therefore, Japanese goods may keep their price competitive
edge," said Azusa Hayashi, Director of the First International
Economic Affairs Division of the Foreign Ministry. "If you want
my objective view, I don't expect a drastic improvement in our
trade imbalance. Last year, we asked for moderation in exports,
and this year we may have to do so again," he said.
 REUTER...
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2406>
Finance Minister Michael Wilson said
large inflows of capital into Canada, principally into the
country's bond market, is a major reason behind the sharp
recovery in the Canadian dollar.
    He said the inflow of funds, mainly from Japan, Europe and
the United States, is the result of "confidence in the
direction this country is going in."
    "That is the reason why the (Canadian) dollar today is
higher than 75 cts (U.S.) compared to this time last year (when
it was) a little over 69 cts," Wilson told the House of Commons
daily question period.
    Figures released this week show foreigners purchased a
record 23.1 billion dlrs of Canadian bonds in 1986, more than
double the previous year, with Japan investing a record 9.5
billion dlrs in the market.
    Wilson was responding to opposition party questions about a
possible loss of jobs from the rise in Canadian investment
abroad. Canadian investment, including the buying of foreign
companies, stocks and bonds, rose to 12.53 billion dlrs from
6.19 billion dlrs in 1985.
    The minister said the flow of funds from abroad would
generate many new jobs in Canada.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2452>
The U.S. Treasury repeated a White
House statement that only President Reagan and Treasury
Secretary James Baker are authorized to speak on the dollar.
    A Department spokesman was commenting on remarks by
Commerce Department Under-Secretary Robert Ortner that the yen
was undervalued 10 or 15 pct against the dollar but European
currencies were fairly priced against the U.S. currency.
    "As Larry Speakes said on January 14 this year, only two
people in this administration are authorized to speak on the
dollar and that is the president and the secretary of the
treasury," the spokesman told Reuters.
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2565>
The Bank of England said it had revised
its estimate of the shortage in the money market back to its
initial forecast of 550 mln stg.
    At midsession the central bank changed the shortfall to 500
mln and provided assistance worth 96 mln stg through bank bill
purchases in bands one and two at established dealing rates.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2576>
The Bank of England said it provided
assistance worth 350 mln stg during the afternoon session which
takes total help so far today to 446 mln stg against a shortage
estimated at around 550 mln stg.
    The central bank purchased outright bank bills comprising
120 mln stg in band one at 10-7/8 pct and 227 mln stg in band
two at 10-13/16 pct. It also bought treasury bills worth one
mln stg in band one and two mln stg in band two at the same
rates of interest as bank bills.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2601>
The Dutch central bank announced new
eleven-day special advances at an unchanged 5.3 pct to aid
money market liquidity, covering the period March 9 to 20.
    The amount will be set at tender on Monday March 9 between
0800 and 0830 GMT. The new facility will replace the current
4.8 billion guilders of seven-day advances expiring Monday.
    Money dealers estimated today's money market shortage at 11
to 11.25 billion guilders, barely changed from yesterday.
    They said call money was still relatively high at 6-1/8 to
6-1/4 pct as a result of the tight set of bids accepted by the
Bank for the previous seven-day facility.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2626>
The Federal Reserve is unlikely to
operate in the U.S. government securities market during its
usual intervention period this morning, economists said.
    Fed funds opened comfortably at 5-15/16 pct and remained at
that level. Yesterday Fed funds averaged 5.99 pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2633>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
there has been no change in U.S. policy on the value of the
dollar.
    Baker, when asked if the policy was changed in view of
comments yesterday by a senior Commerce Department official who
said he thought the Japanese yen was undervalued against the
dollar by 10 to 15 pct, replied, "No."
    Yesterday Robert Ortner, Undersecretary of Commerce for
Economic Affairs, said he thought the yen was undervalued but
said that was his personal view.
    This remark caused the dollar to drop as it appeared to
conflict with a recent agreement in Paris by the United States
and five other industrial nations that currency rates were at
about the right level to reflect underlying economic
conditions.
    Baker, who spoke earlier to the National Newspaper
Association, declined to elaborate on his statement about U.S.
policy.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2683>
The Federal Reserve entered the
government securities market to arrange one billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a spokesman for the New York
Fed said.
    Fed funds were trading at 5-15/16 pct at the time of the
indirect injection of temporary reserves, dealers said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2697>
The French primary bond market is showing
signs of renewed effervescence after several weeks of lethargy
and the trend is expected to continue if hopes of imminent
interest rate cuts are fulfilled, market operators said.
    The Bank of France is generally expected to give a signal
to the market, possibly at the beginning of next week, by
announcing a quarter point cut in its intervention rate, which
has stood at eight pct since January 2, or in its seven-day
repurchase rate, set at 8-3/4 pct since January 5.
    The central bank's averaged-out day to day call money rate,
the reference rate for interbank money market operators, which
reached 8-3/4 pct on February 18 has fallen to 7-3/4 pct this
week, dealers noted.
    The Bank of France's "open market" policy to regulate the
money markets since December has been based on a floor and
ceiling of rates within the limits of its intervention and
seven day repurchase rates.
    For the moment the sentiment is of "wait and see" on rate
cuts, but there are now more optimists than pessimists among
market operators, a dealer for a major French bank said.
    Dealers said there is abundant liquidity on the bond
market, noting that this week's monthly Treasury tap issue of
11.87 billion francs had a good reception and was fairly easily
absorbed.
    The Treasury had set an upper limit on the issue of 12
billion francs and was likely to continue to try and sell as
much paper as it could over coming months to meet its borrowing
needs for this year of around 150 billion, one banker said.
    Dealers said there was no difficulty in placing liquidity
in the primary market at the moment despite competition from
the surge in investments on the Paris stock exchange.
    There has been a flood of large bond issues, but with
formulas well adapted to market conditions and investor demand
- with warrants or a mix of fixed and floating-rates - which
have been snapped up, and with generally broadly negative fees.
    Dealers pointed to the recent Caisse d'Aide a l'Equipement
des Collectivites Locales (CAECL) 8.90 pct two billion franc
bond with warrants exchangeable for floating-rate bonds issued
over 13 years and 80 days at 97.04 pct with payment date March
9, which was today quoted at -0.90 to -1.10 pct.
    Even classic fixed-rate issues, after being neglected since
the end of last year, are finding buyers, one banker said.
    Dealers said that now the question was to see how the terms
of imminent operations would be set, with great market interest
focussed on the likely three next issues.
    These will include an expected four to five billion franc
issue for Electricite de France, to be followed by a bond of
around one billion francs for Auxiliaire du Credit Foncier, a
subsidiary of the banking group Credit Foncier de France, and a
new issue by tender from the mortgage agency Caisse de
Refinancement Hypothecaire.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2765>
Total futures and options turnover on the
London International Financial Futures Exchange (LIFFE) fell
slightly during February, although daily average Eurodollar
volume set a new record, LIFFE said today.
    Total futures and options turnover last month was 822,378
contracts, down from January's 881,778, but sharply above the
comparative February 1986 figure of 463,146 lots, it said.
    Eurodollar turnover during February was 140,417 lots,
against January's 100,941 and the year ago figure of 81,648.
The daily average was a record 7,020 lots, up four pct from the
previous record, set in March 1985.
    February trading encompassed a new daily record of 66,087
contracts on the 19th of the month, exceeding the previous
record of 61,398, which had been set on February 6, LIFFE said.
    FT-SE 100 index futures volume was sharply higher during
February, with 22,109 contracts trading, against January's
15,279 and the year-ago level of 8,181.
    Open interest also set new records last month in
Eurodollars at 29,372 contracts, in FT-SE 100 at 4,898 and in
short sterling interest rate futures at 19,846 lots.
    Key futures volumes as detailed by LIFFE were:
                 Feb'87   Jan'87    Feb'86
 Long gilt      424,865  525,354   134,420
 Eurodollar     140,417  100,941    81,648
 Short sterling  94,720   87,619    67,640
 T-bond          84,694   87,980   133,766
 FT-SE           22,109   15,279     8,181
 Currencies       2,799    2,112     7,737
 Short gilt          74       85     6,516
    Key options volumes as detailed by LIFFE were:
              Feb'87    Jan'87     Feb'86
 Long gilt     44,640    54,329     ----
 Eurodollar     3,580     1,720     2,844
 T-bond         1,737     3,479     ----
 Sterling       1,466     2,223    18,191
 FT-SE          1,277       657     ----
 Total options 52,700    62,408    23,238
    (Long gilt, T-bond and FT-SE index options were not trading
in February 1986).
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2966>
The yield on 30-day bankers security
deposit accounts issued this week by the Saudi Arabian Monetary
Agency (SAMA) fell to 5.84073 pct from 6.21950 last Saturday,
bankers said.
    SAMA increased the offer price on the 900 mln riyal issue
to 99.51563 from 99.48438. One-month interbank riyal deposits
were quoted today at 6-1/4, six pct.
    SAMA offers a total of 1.9 billion riyals each week in 30,
91 and 180-day paper to banks in the Kingdom.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2993>
The Asian dollar market continued to
expand in December with total assets and liabilities rising to
200.60 billion U.S. Dlrs from 188.54 billion in November and
155.37 billion in December 1985, the Monetary Authority of
Singapore said.
    It said the increase came mainly from interbank activity,
with interbank lending rising to 146.61 billion dlrs in
December from 134.76 billion in November and 104.93 billion in
December 1985.
    Interbank deposits increased to 158.52 billion dlrs against
147.95 billion and 120.03 billion, respectively.
    Loans to non-bank customers increased in December to 38.74
billion dlrs from 38.64 billion in November and 37.44 billion
in December 1985.
    Deposits by non-bank customers rose to 33.81 billion dlrs
against 33.60 billion and 28.02 billion.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2996>
The Dutch central bank said it has
accepted bids totalling 6.5 billion guilders at tender for new
eleven-day special advances at 5.3 pct covering the period
March 9 to 20 aimed at relieving money market tightness.
    Subscriptions to 500 mln guilders were met in full, amounts
above 500 mln at 35 pct.
    The new facility replaces old seven-day advances worth 4.8
billion guilders at the same rate.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3001>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
shortage of around 250 mln stg in the money market today.
    Among the factors affecting liquidity, it said bills
maturing in official hands and the treasury bill take-up would
drain around 1.02 billion stg while below target bankers'
balances would take out a further 140 mln.
    Against this, a fall in the note circulation would add 345
mln stg and the net effect of exchequer transactions would be
an inflow of some 545 mln stg, the Bank added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3002>
The Bank of France said it invited offers
of first category paper today for a money market intervention
tender.
    Money market dealers said conditions seemed right for the
Bank to cut its intervention rate at the tender by a quarter
percentage point to 7-3/4 pct from eight, reflecting an easing
in call money rate last week, and the French franc's steadiness
on foreign exchange markets since the February 22 currency
stabilisation accord here by the Group of Five and Canada.
    Intervention rate was last raised to eight pct from 7-1/4
on January 2. Call money today was quoted at 7-11/16 7-3/4 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3020>
Bundesbank president Karl Otto Poehl
told a closed investment symposium that West Germany could cut
leading interest rates again if the United States makes a
similar move, banking sources said.
    The sources were reporting Poehl's remarks at a symposium
in Duesseldorf last week organised by Deutsche Bank Ag. Press
representatives were not invited.
    The sources, speaking separately, said Poehl told about 200
bankers in reply to questions that a cut in U.S. Interest rates
would give room for a matching measure in Germany.
    "It was a definite hint at lower German interest rates," said
one banker who attended the symposium.
    A Bundesbank spokesman said the central bank would have no
comment on the reported remarks, made at the private meeting.
    But, according to a second source, who also declined to be
identified, Poehl's comments were seen by bankers present as a
direct pointer to further moves by the central bank to defend
German industry from an additional revaluation of the mark.
    "He said if the Americans drop their interest rates then the
Bundesbank would also drop them. He said that quite clearly,"
the second source said.
    In reply to questions, Poehl also said the half-point cut
in the discount and Lombard rates on January 22 came after the
U.S. Had signalled it would be prepared to attend a meeting to
discuss the level of the dollar on condition Germany made such
a move in advance, the sources said.
    Asked if American authorities could have been persuaded, by
cuts in German rates, to come to the bargaining table as early
as last September, one of the sources quoted Poehl as saying,
"No, they wouldn't have been. We checked that."
    The Paris meeting of the Group of Six industrial nations
took place exactly one month after the German cut in rates.
    Poehl emphasised in his comments the very close talks
between central banks before and after the G-6 meeting, saying
that financial markets had not fully realised the significance
of the Paris session and the U.S. Agreement to stem further
falls in the value of the dollar, the sources said.
    For the first time all participants at the summit agreed
that a further fall in the dollar would be harmful for all
world economies, including the U.S., Poehl had said.
    The sources said the tone of Poehl's comments boosted
growing sentiment that the dollar would be stabilised around
current levels by international central bank cooperation.
    One source said Poehl's remarks also underlined the fact
that the Bundesbank was now more prepared to be accommodative
in monetary policy in order to prevent a further slowdown in
West Germany's economic growth.
    Poehl and other Bundesbank officials have in the past
stressed that the German central bank had no direct
responsibility for growth and was solely concerned with
combatting inflation.
    This led, for instance, to the introduction of a tighter
monetary stance from the beginning of December until the
half-point cut in rates in late January.
    The sources quoted Poehl as saying that the current
overshooting of the German monetary target would not directly
respark inflation. The Bundesbank was not obliged to react
immediately whenever such overshooting occurs.
    Latest data for central bank money stock, the Bundesbank's
main measure of money supply, showed the measure was growing at
7-1/2 pct in January, outside its three to six pct 1987 target.
    Share prices rose in very active trading today, with
dealers reporting that Poehl's remarks, coupled with a bullish
outlook on stock prices from Deutsche at the same symposium,
brought in strong bargain hunting at current low levels.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3031>
West Germany takes "very seriously" the
recent undertaking by major industrial countries to promote
exchange rate stability around current levels, Finance Ministry
State Secretary Hans Tietmeyer said.
    Talking to journalists before a meeting of European
Community Economy and Finance Ministers here, Tietmeyer
declined to say whether the February 22 Paris accord by the
Group of Five countries plus Canada included secret agreements
for stabilising currencies.
    But he noted the official communique said the participants
agreed to cooperate closely to foster stability of exchange
rates around current levels. "We're taking this sentence very
seriously," he said.
    Tietmeyer remarked that the dollar had hardly moved against
the mark since the meeting.
    He said a slowdown in West German economic growth had been
caused by sharp exchange rate swings and that the Paris
agreement should help in this respect.
    Economics Ministry State Secretary Otto Schlecht said the
Bonn government saw no current need for measures to bolster the
economy but was paying close attention to the slower growth and
had not ruled out "appropriate and timely" action if necessary.
    Schlecht and Tietmeyer were speaking ahead of a discussion
by the EC ministers of the latest EC Commission report on the
economic situation in the 12-nation bloc.
    The Commission has sharply revised down expected German
gross national product growth this year to two pct from 3.2 pct
predicted last autumn and says Bonn has the most room of any EC
country to stimulate economic activity.
    Schlecht said the upturn in West Germany's economy slowed
in the fourth quarter of last year and the first quarter of
1987. But he said there was no cumulative downwards trend in
view that would make quick remedial action necessary.
    He said a number of favourable indicators such as high
level of investment and a good climate for consumption meant a
recovery could be expected, while exports would pick up
slightly during the course of the year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3044>
The Bank of England said it provided the
market with further assistance during the afternoon, buying
bills worth 166 mln stg at the lower rates introduced this
morning.
    It bought 45 mln stg of local authority bills plus 27 mln
stg of bank bills in band one at 10-3/8 pct together with 94
mln stg of band two bank bills at 10-5/16 pct.
    The bank also revised its estimate of the market shortage
up to 300 mln stg from 250 mln this morning. It has given total
assistance of 213 mln stg today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3065>
The 24 nations of the Organisation for
Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD), hampered by
sluggish industrial output and trade, face slower economic
growth, and their joint balance of payments will swing into
deficit in 1987, the Economist Intelligence Unit (EIU ) said.
    The EIU said in its World Trade Forecast it revised OECD
economic growth downwards to 2.5 pct this year, compared with a
2.8 pct growth forecast in December.
    It said the new areas of weakness are West Germany and the
smaller European countries it influences, and Japan, hardest
hit by currency appreciation this year.
    The independent research organisation cut its 1987 growth
rate forecasts for West Germany to 2.2 pct from 3.2 pct in
December and to 2.3 pct from three pct for Japan.
    It said it expected the OECD to post a current account
deficit of some 13 billion dlrs in both 1987 and 1988, due in
large part to a 1.50 dlrs a barrel rise in 1987 oil prices.
    It said the U.S. Current account deficit looked likely to
fall even more slowly than forecast, to 125 billion dlrs in
1987 and 115 billion in 1988 from 130 billion in 1986.
    It said it expected West Germany to post a 31 billion dlr
payments surplus and Japan a 76 billion dlr surplus this year.
    The EIU said it saw oil prices dropping to around 16.50
dlrs a barrel by end-1987 and 15.50 dlrs in 1988 from about 18
dlrs last year, as adherence to OPEC output policy becomes
increasingly ragged.
    It said the dollar is poised to resume its decline in
foreign exchange markets, and will lose a further 13 pct on its
trade-weighted index this year and five pct in 1988 after last
year's 18.4 pct drop.
    The average mark/dollar rate is put at 1.80 marks this year
and 1.70 in 1988 while the yen/dollar rate is expected to break
through the 150 yen barrier with an average value of 150 yen in
1987 and 146 yen in 1988, it said.
    "This is not a crash scenario but the dollar's steeper angle
of descent increases the risk of ending with a fireball rather
than a three-point landing," the EIU said.
    "Talking will not stop the dollar's slide for long and the
February meeting (of finance ministers of the Group of Five and
Canada) produced scant promise of either a decisive shift to
more expansive policies in West Germany and Japan, or a tighter
U.S. Fiscal policy," it said.
    It said the key to the dollar's fortunes was the
willingness of Japanese institutions to buy U.S. Government
assets despite prospects of sustaining a currency loss.
    "Thus far they have been willing," the EIC said, adding that
if Japan was deterred from buying U.S. Bonds the dollar would
collapse.
    To contain such a currency crisis, dollar interest rates
would have to soar, bringing recession and a Third World debt
crisis, it said.
    On trade, the EIU said prospects for 1987 look "increasingly
sick."
    Import growth, forecast in December at 4.5 pct, is now seen
slowing down to around 3.8 pct in 1987 with a recovery only to
4.2 pct in 1988, it said.
    The weakness of the West German economy is the biggest
single factor, with import growth there expected to feature a
sluggish 3.5 pct growth in 1987 against the 6.5 pct forecast in
December, the EIU said.
    On the export side, it said it saw weak demand in West
Germany affecting export prospects elsewhere in Europe, while
Japan's exports in 1987 would remain flat and sales by U.S.
Exporters would respond only marginally to a lower, more
competitively-priced dollar.
    It said in most of Europe and in Japan, raw materials and
oil will cost less in domestic currency in 1987 than in 1986.
    However, rates of inflation will edge up in 1988 to over
the current OECD average of three pct. Non-oil commodity prices
will show a modest dollar price increase in 1988 for the first
time since 1984, the EIU said.
    After a rise of 18 pct in 1986, the dollar price of
internationally traded manufactures will go up by 8.5 pct in
1987 and by five pct in 1988, it said.
    It said OECD industrial production would rise by only 1.6
pct in 1987 after a weak 1.5 pct increase in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3067>
The Bank of England said it provided the
market with unspecified late assistance worth 15 mln stg.
    It has given the market total assistance of 228 mln stg
today compared with a liquidity shortage it estimated at a
revised 300 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3068>
The Bank of France said it cut its money
market intervention rate to 7-3/4 pct from eight pct when it
injected money against first category paper.
    The bank also cut its seven-day repossession rate to 8-1/2
pct from 8-3/4 pct.
    The intervention rate has stood at eight pct since it was
raised from 7-1/4 pct on January 2 as the French franc came
under pressure ahead of the EMS realignment on January 11.
    The bank said the purchase, effective tomorrow, is for five
pct of private paper and fixed rate Treasury bills maturing
between March 25 and June 25 and of other Treasury bills
maturing between March 25, 1987 and March 25, 1989.
    The rate cut had been expected since the bank announced a
money market intervention tender earlier today.
    Money market dealers said conditions seemed right for a
quarter percentage point cut, reflecting an easing in the call
money rate last week, and the French franc's steadiness on
foreign exchange markets since the February 22 currency
stabilisation accord here by the Group of Five and Canada.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3076>
The Turkish Central Bank set a
Lira/Dollar rate for March 10 of 773.05/776.92 to the Dollar,
down from the previous 769.60/773.45.
    The Bank also set a Lira/Mark rate of 417.20/419.29 to the
Mark, up from the previous 419.15/421.25.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3121>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
intervene in the government securities market to add temporary
reserves via customer repurchase agreements, economists said.
    Most economists said the Fed will add 1.5 to two billion
dlrs of temporary reserves via customer repurchase agreements,
but some said there is a slim chance the Fed will inject
permanent reserves via three-day system repurchase agreements.
    Federal funds opened at 6-1/16 pct and firmed to 6-1/8 pct
in early trading. Funds averaged six pct on Friday.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3137>
A half point cut in base lending rates
was announced by the big four clearing banks today after the
Bank of England finally endorsed such a move following weeks of
downward pressure, dealers said.
    During its routine intervention in the market, the bank
trimmed the rates at which it deals with the discount houses by
half a point and National Westminster led the other clearing
banks in reducing its base rate to 10-1/2 pct from 11 pct.
    The timing of the Bank of England move took operators by
surprise after its recent action seemingly designed to dampen
hopes of a base rate cut ahead of the U.K. Budget on March 17.
       For some time, fundamentals have
led the market to push for a one point cut in base lending
rates to 10 pct but the central bank has declined to follow
wholesale money market rates down.
    Although political considerations -- the government's wish
to see a fall in base rates coincide with the Budget -- had
been suggested by operators last week as reasons for the Bank's
delaying action, worries about the real strength of sterling
and perhaps about the market's reaction to the content of the
Budget may have been behind the central bank's caution, dealers
said.
    In the event, sterling continued firm after the rate cut,
leaving the market still looking for another half point fall.
    Consequently, rates in the money market eased during the
day, one-month interbank sterling shedding 5/16 point to
10-9/16 7/16 and three-months trading 1/16 point down at
10-5/16 3/16 pct. Sterling cd's were similarly down between
5/16 point in one month and 1/8 point in one year.
    Overnight interbank money for tomorrow was indicated at
around 11 pct, almost a point below the levels ruling at the
end of last week. Today, overnight touched a high of some
11-3/4 pct after the Bank took out 228 mln stg of an estimated
300 mln stg shortage.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3164>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange 2.5 billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-3/16 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3222>
The Bank of Zambia has paid out foreign
exchange arrears from three auctions conducted last year, a
bank spokesman said.
    "We have now cleared three auctions and are left with only
four, worth eight mln dlrs," the spokesman said without
specifying the amount paid out.
    The bank had not paid foreign exchange to private firms
since it suspended the weekly auctions on January 28.
    It has said the auctions were suspended because it planned
to introduce a modified system after talks with the World Bank
and the International Monetary Fund.
    President Kenneth Kaunda announced last month that the
auction would be retained for allocating foreign exchange to
approved private sector bidders, but would not be used to
determine the kwacha's exchange rate.
    Last week, he said the auction had run into trouble because
of a shortage of foreign exchange.
    The government has fixed the exchange rate at nine kwacha
per dollar, effectively revaluing the kwacha by 67.7 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3267>
USX Corp chairman David Roderick called
for a lower value for the U.S. dollar against other currencies
to help speed a correction in the U.S. trade deficit, which
last year reached 170 billion dlrs.
    In remarks prepared for a speech before the Economic Club
of Detroit, Roderick said, "There should be total resolve that
the dollar versus other major currencies, as well as the
currencies of other nations having a substantial trade surplus
with us, must continue to decline so that the correction in our
trade deficit starts on the road to recovery."
    Roderick said the U.S. should be understanding of the
"economic pain" our trading partners experience as a result of
a falling dollar.
    But, he added, "As painful as the correction may be to our
trading partners, it is less painful than leaving the problem
uncorrected because that would lead us into an inevitable,
lengthy and steep world recession."
    Roderick said between February 1985 and December 1986 the
dollar fell by more than 40 pct in real terms against major
industrial currencies and by 30 to 35 pct against a broader
group of currencies of nearly all developing nations.
    At the end of 1986, he said, the value of foreign assets in
the U.S. exceeded the value of U.S. assets abroad by 240
billion dlrs, compared to five years ago when the U.S. had a
surplus in assets of 141 billion. A company spokesman said the
data were provided by economic consultants to USX.
    The primary reason for the trade imbalance was the 70 pct
rise of the dollar between 1980 and 1985, although other
factors were involved, Roderick said. But it is wrong, he said,
"to attribute the massive trade deficit to a fundmental
deterioration of U.S. productivity or of American product
quality."
    These areas need to be improved but they are not the root
cause of the trade gap problem, Roderick said. He urged
American manufacturers to become more competitive so they can
compete in global markets.
    In the speech, the USX chairman also called for changes in
securities laws to curb what he called abuses by corporate
raiders and speculators.
    Among his proposals, which he presented to the Senate
Banking Committee in testimony last week, were a requirement
that raiders give 24-hour notice for every one pct of stock
they acquire in a company.
    Roderick proposed that tender offers must be made for all
cash to all stockholders on equal terms and that raiders be
required to have financing in place before a tender is made.
    Further, raiders should be required to make an all-cash
tender offer once they acquire 10 pct of a target company's
stock, he said. And payment of greenmail, or a preferential
price by a target company to buy back a raider's stake, should
be prohibited under the revised laws.
    Roderick said changes were necessary to curb abuses but
that he did not want laws that would hurt the financial markets
or discourage "fair price to all" takeovers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3292>
Central bankers said they
were generally satisfied with the response to the Paris accord
two weeks ago to stabilize currencies at around current levels.
    Speaking after a meeting at the Bank for International
Settlements (BIS), which reviewed the agreement, they also
welcomed interest rates cuts in France and today's drop in
British rates.  One top official said the rate cuts would help
to stimulate growth generally in Europe and welcomed that
countries other than West Germany were seen to be helping
sustain the economy. 
    The central bankers, who spoke on the condition they not be
named, said the meeting of governors from the Group of 10
countries also heard a report from Michel Camdessus, the new
managing director of the International Monetary Fund, on the
IMF's latest assessment of the debt crisis. In particular, they
discussed Brazil's debt moratorium.
    But there was no sense of urgency, they said, and Brazil
had made no appeal for bridging loans from the BIS or central
banks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3338>
The dollar will decline over the next
two to three years, but this is unlikely to result in a
complete reduction of the U.S. current account deficit, said
Anthony Solomon, chairman of S.G. Warburg (USA) Inc and former
president of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York.
    In a presentation to the Japan Society, Solomon said
without elaboration that he expects a "significant decline in
the dollar," within the next three years.
    "The dollar will fall more, but the current account deficit
will stop being reduced when it reaches its structural core,"
he said.
    Solomon described the structural core as about one-half of
the current 150 billion dlr annual deficit. He cited several
factors which will prevent an elimination of the deficit.
    For one thing, it is unlikely that there will be any new
investment in those manufacturing industries that shrank when
the dollar was at uncompetitive levels, he said.
    In addition, he said that the U.S. has an increased
propensity to import in order to satisify consumer tastes.
    Solomon forecast inflation at 4.5 pct by year-end, but said
it could be kept below five pct in the medium-term if oil
prices are stable and commodity values remain low.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3411>
A confidential World Bank report on the
Peruvian economy has said the government's strategy does not
offer good prospects for medium and long-term growth and is
likely to lead to an early renewal of inflationary pressure.
    The report, published today by the economic monthly, The
Peru Report, said the success of president Alan Garcia's
government in stimulating output last year to achieve a growth
in gross domestic product of over eight pct "represents gains in
the short term at the expense of the long."
    Government officials had no immediate comment on the
report, which advised a reduction in the overall size of the
public investment program and greater emphasis on the
preservation of Peru's export potential.
    The report said that although the government had succeeded
in cutting inflation from 250 pct a year in the first half of
1985 to under 70 pct, its stabilisation and reactivation
program was encountering rising difficulties.
    "An early renewal of inflationary pressures, linked to
monetary expansion, exchange rate devaluation and an easing of
price controls, appears not improbable," it added.
    The world bank report said the government's policies had
reduced inflation and short-term increases in consumption at
the apparent cost of price distortions, overvaluation of the
currency, balance of payments disequilibrium, reserve losses,
and sharply diminished creditworthiness.
    It said unless the government took action quickly to fix a
competitive exchange rate and control the public sector
deficit, "the higher the probability will be that the government
will eventually have to resort to drastic curtailment of
domestic demand and either sharp devaluation or still further
controls on imports in order to stem inflation and support the
balance of payments."
    It said the bank would place more emphasis on the
preservation of peru's export potential, external links and
overall economic efficiency.
    The government's incentive policies towards the mining and
petroleum sectors, among its main traditional exports,
suggested that it did not accord high priority to their
economic viability, it added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3421>
U.S. authorities intervened in the
foreign exchange market to support the dollar on one occasion
during the period between the start of November 1986 and the
end of January, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York said in a
report.
    The Fed's quarterly review of foreign exchange operations
said that the U.S. bought 50 mln dlrs through the sale of yen
on January 28. This operation was coordinated with the Japanese
monetary authorities and was funded equally by the Fed and the
U.S. Treasury.
    The Fed's intervention was on the morning after president
Reagan's State of the Union message and was "in a manner
consistent with the joint statement" made by U.S. Treasury
secretary James Baker and Japanese finance minister Kiichi
Miyazawa after their January 21 consultations.
    At that meeting, the two reaffirmed their willingness to
cooperate on exchange rate issues.
    The Fed's report did not say at what level the intervention
occurred. But on January 28, the dollar closed at 151.50/60 yen
after dipping as low as 150.40 yen earlier in the session. It
had closed at 151.05/15 yen the previous day.
    The dollar had plumbed a post-World War II low of 149.98
yen on January 19 and reached a seven-year low of 1.7675 marks
on January 28. It ended that day at 1.7820/30 marks.
    The Fed noted that, after trading steadily throughout
November and the first half of December, the dollar moved
sharply lower until the end of January.
    It closed the three-month review period down more than 11
pct against the mark and most other Continental currencies and
seven pct lower against the yen and sterling. It had fallen
four pct against the Canadian dollar.
    During the final days of January, pressure on the dollar
subsided. Reports of the U.S.-Japanese intervention operation
and talk of an upcoming meeting of the major industrial
countries encouraged expectations for broader cooperation on
exchange rate and economic policy matters, the Fed said.
    Moreover, doubts had developed about the course of U.S.
interest rates. The dollar's swift fall had raised questions
about whether the Fed would let short-term rates ease.
    Thus the dollar firmed to close the period at 1.8320 marks
and 153.70 yen. According to the Fed's trade-weighted index, it
had declined nine pct since the beginning of the period.
    The dollar had risen as high as 2.08 marks and 165 yen in
early November.
    The Fed last intervened in the foreign exchange market on
November 7, 1985 when it bought a total of 102.2 mln dlrs worth
of marks and yen.
    The Fed's action followed the September 1985 Plaza
agreement between the five major industrial nations under which
they agreed to promote an orderly decline of the dollar.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3433>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said the
Paris currency accord has contributed to the stability of
exchange rates.
    Miyazawa told a press conference the agreement reached last
month in Paris by six major industrial nations to cooperate in
bringing about currency stability has prevented speculative
concerns from being active in money centres.
    The decision in Paris is being understood by the market, he
said. The yen-dollar exchange rate has been moving in a narrow
range since finance ministers of Britain, Canada, France,
Japan, the U.S. And West Germany reached the accord.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3435>
The Reserve Bank said at 1230 local time
it was offering to buy short-dated government securities in the
short-term money market.
    The bank's action followed its purchase of short-dated
government stock and six-day repurchase agreements earlier in
the session.
    Money market traders said the move was aimed at easing cash
market interest rates which had risen on demand for funds to
meet PAYE tax and treasury note settlement commitments.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3442>
People throughout China can now open
foreign exchange accounts at the Bank of China, the official
Shenzhen Economic Zone Daily said.
    Previously only residents of Guangdong and Fujian provinces
could do this.
    The paper also said the minimum for opening a fixed deposit
account had been cut to 50 yuan equivalent, from 150 yuan. The
minimum for a current account is 20 yuan equivalent.
    The paper said depositors could now withdraw all or part of
their account, subject to a branch's reserves, instead of only
a fixed amount as previously.
    The paper said deposits may now be opened in French francs
as well as the already available U.S. Dollar, Hong Kong dollar,
sterling, yen and marks.
    Bank of China branches in Hainan island also accept
deposits in Singapore dollars, and those in Wenzhou, Zhejiang
province, accept deposits in Dutch guilders, the paper said.
    It gave no further details.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3461>
Hungary is to devalue the forint by an
average of eight pct against Western currencies, the official
news agency MTI said.
    MTI did not say when the devaluation would become
effective, but it expected new rates to be announced later
today.
    Hungary devalued the forint by a similar amount last
September 23. Western bankers say the forint is more
realistically valued than currencies of Hungary's COMECON
allies.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3482>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
liquidity shortage of around 300 mln stg in the market today.
    Among the main factors, the Bank said bills maturing in
official hands and the treasury bill take-up would drain 483
mln stg from the system while below target bankers' balances
and a rise in the note circulation would take out 50 mln and
100 mln stg respectively.
    Partially offsetting these, exchequer transactions would
add around 355 mln stg, the Bank added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3483>
The Belgian National Bank bought
foreign currencies against francs on the open market in the
week ended March 9, a Bank spokesman said.
    In line with central bank policy he declined to give any
details of the amount bought.
    The foreign currency purchased was used by the Treasury to
repay foreign debt and did not affect the Bank's foreign
exchange reserves. They slipped 394 mln francs to 37.33
billion, mostly due to sales of dollars for Special Drawing
Rights, the spokesman said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3493>
A tight money market has pushed
interest rates on three to six month time deposits to between
15 and 18 pct from 13 to 15 pct a month ago, bankers said.
    March is usually a tight month for the money market because
of tax payments and banks' need to attract funds for their
year-end accounts on March 31.
    This year the situation has been made worse by December's
rush to buy dollars by companies and businessmen who feared
imposition of exchange controls. Much of that outflow has yet
to be converted back into rupiah.
    "A lot of small money has come back in, but the big money is
holding out until after April," one U.S. Banker said.
    The tight money policy of Bank Indonesia, the central bank,
is helping to keep rates high.
    Short-term lending rates now average 25 pct a year, with no
prospect they will be lowered soon, the bankers said.
    Central Bank governor Arifin Siregar said earlier this week
that Indonesia could look forward to better economic prospects
in 1987/88, but added the "speculators" who led a run on the
rupiah late last year could again pose problems.
    Indonesia holds general elections on April 23, the first in
five years, and most businessmen expect no new government
economic packages or incentives before then.
    "Some people are nervous about what the government will do
after the election," one banker said. "They normally try to do
things before the IGGI (Inter-Governmental Group on Indonesia)
meeting (in June) to prove they are doing something about the
economy to show they deserve a couple of billion dollars."
    The IGGI, which groups 14 industrialised donor countries
and four agencies, gave Indonesia 2.5 billion dlrs in soft
loans and grants last year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3514>
Call money eased to 3.75/80 pct from
3.80/85 yesterday following a net injection of 6.7 billion
marks at a rate of 3.80 pct in fresh funds from this week's
securities repurchase agreement, dealers said.
    But rates were expected to rise toward the end of the week.
    A major tax payment period by banks on behalf of customers,
payments for the federal railways loan stock and repayments of
mark liabilities incurred by foreign central banks with the
Bundesbank in the framework of the European Monetary System
(EMS) are likely to significantly burden the system. Banks
built up minimum reserves today, ahead of the expected outflow.
    The Bundesbank credited banks with a gross 15.2 billion
marks, but some 8.5 billion left the system at the same time as
an earlier securities repurchase pact matured.
    Dealers estimated the EMS related outflow as high as six
billion marks.
    The Bundesbank declined to comment, but a spokesman said
yesterday although the funds now due may be allowed to roll
over, the possibility that other central banks may choose to
redeem them meant a net infusion was needed.
    Dealers forecast tax payments of 25 and 30 billion marks,
but much of it is expected to burden the system only next week.
    Banks' minimum reserve holdings at the Bundesbank totalled
53.6 billion marks on Monday, averaging 54.0 billion over the
first nine days of March.
    Dealers said although the figure was well above an expected
requirement of around 51 billion marks, the expected outflow of
funds was so large that banks might find it difficult to meet
the requirement toward the end of March.
    No securities repurchase agreement is expiring next week,
but dealers said the Bundesbank could offer fresh liquidity if
conditions significantly tighten. "The Bundesbank wants to keep
rates around 3.80 pct," one dealer said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3526>
Hungary is to devalue the forint by an
average of eight pct against Western currencies, the official
news agency MTI said.
    MTI did not say when the devaluation would become
effective, but it expected new rates to be announced later
today.
    Hungary devalued the forint by a similar amount last
September 23. Western bankers say the forint is more
realistically valued than currencies of Hungary's COMECON
allies.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3532>
Japan cannot bear a further rise of the
yen, Foreign Minister Tadashi Kuranari said.
    "A further stronger yen would be a misfortune for Japan and
the Japanese people would not be able to bear such a burden," he
told reporters.
    The minister said he wants to tell U.S. Political leaders
of the sacrifices Japan is making to cut its trade surplus.
    Kuranari was widely expected to fly to Washington tomorrow
for talks focussing on trade. But departure remains uncertain
because of the continuing parliamentary boycott by opposition
parties protesting plans for a new sales tax.
    If the boycott is lifted tomorrow, Kuranari would probably
have to remain in Japan to attend parliamentary discussions on
the government's 1987/88 budget, Japanese officials said.
    Kuranari said both the U.S. And Japan should approach the
trade imbalance in a calm, unemotional manner.
    But, he added, "If the issue of rice is to be raised...I
would mention the feelings of the Japanese people."
    Japanese politicians have said repeatedly the country
cannot bow to U.S. Pressure to liberalize rice imports because
the issue is too sensitive.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3533>
The Bank of England said it did not
operate in the money market during the morning.
    Initially, the bank forecast a liqudity shortage of some
300 mln stg for the market today.
    Overnight interbank sterling traded at the 11-1/4 1/8 pct
level for most of the morning while period rates have eased on
the strength of sterling, dealers said. At 1200 gmt, sterling's
trade-weighted index was up 0.6 at 72.7.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3535>
Interest in the currency futures market
has shifted to the soaring British pound and the potentially
explosive Canadian dollar, and away from the dull Continental
and Japanese currencies, analysts said.
    The June pound, which added 6.3 cents over the past
week-and-a-half to reach a new contract high of 1.5930 to the
dollar on Monday, has spawned a new-found speculative boom.
    "Brokers have to push their clients somewhere...and
technically, the pound is in the best shape," PaineWebber
analyst Jason Gillard said.
    "We've tried to take a bullish approach to the pound, and
we're going to stay with that, there's no reason to change,"
Smith Barney analyst Craig Sloane said.
    Many traders took on long pound/short West German mark
futures positions, although some of those cross-trades were
liquidated yesterday, Sloane said.
     The fundamental keys to the pound's rise have been
relatively high U.K. interest rates and a vague optimism
surrounding the British economy, analysts said.
    "Money seems to be chasing yields," William Byers, of Bear
Stearns, said of the 10-1/2 pct U.K. base lending rate.
    Many analysts are skeptical about further gains in the
pound, on the inference that the Bank of England will seek to
relieve upward pressure on the currency by pushing down
interest rates after the nation's budget is released March 17.
    The budget itself could have an impact, depending on how
well it is received, but analysts say relative interest rates
and oil income remain the main influences on the currency.
    However, the market may be able to absorb lower U.K.
interest rates, as it has done when other countries have cut
their discount rates, and extend the pound's rally, Sloane
said.
    The Canadian dollar has not been rising like the pound, but
Sloane and other analysts cautiously predicted a big move soon.
    The sideways price pattern in the June contract, with
smaller and smaller price ranges, has formed a "bull flag" on
price charts, technically-oriented analysts said.
    "It makes for an explosive type of situation that often
leads to a breakout," in this case to the upside, Sloane said.
    Byers agreed there was potential for the June Canadian
dollar to rally above the 77.00 cent level from the most recent
close at 74.80 cents to the U.S. dollar.
    "At this stage of the game I'd call the market long-term
positive, but for the technical burden of proof you need a
close above (the previous contract high of) 75.25," Byers said.
    As to the traditionally more active currencies, stability
was the catchword and reluctance the watchword among analysts.
    Sloane said it was important that June Swiss francs and
June German marks held above support at 0.6400 and 0.5400,
respectively, closing at 0.6438 and 0.5430.
    Yesterday's rebound showed the market was still very
respectful of the Paris accord, and the threat of central bank
intervention by the G-5 nations plus Canada.
    "We may still probe to see what the parameters are," Byers
said, "but people are very reluctant because they don't know
where the central banks will be (to intervene)."
    Gillard said the mark could drop to a previous price
consolidation area around 0.5250 based on the profoundly
sluggish West German economy, but that he would be a buyer at
that level.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3554>
Sight deposits of commercial banks at
the Swiss National Bank fell 2.88 billion Swiss francs in the
first 10 days of March to 7.65 billion, the National Bank said.
    Foreign exchange reserves rose 3.30 billion francs to 33.94
billion.
    Sight deposits are a major indicator of money market
liquidity in Switzerland.
    The National Bank said banks paid back 5.5 billion francs
of central bank credit taken out at the end of February for the
end-month liquidity requirement.
    This drain was offset in part by new currency swaps, which
had the effect of increasing the National Bank's foreign
exchange holdings.
    Bank notes in circulation fell 309.1 mln francs to 24.49
billion, and other deposits on call -- basically government
funds -- rose 1.06 billion to 2.10 billion.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3584>
The Bank of England said it gave the
money market assistance worth 106 mln stg this afternoon,
buying bank bills at the rates established on Monday.
    The Bank bought 11 mln stg of band one bills at 10-3/8 pct
and 95 mln stg of band two paper at 10-5/16 pct. This is the
first time that it has intervened today.
    The Bank has revised its estimate of the liquidity shortage
in the market down to 250 mln stg from 300 mln initially.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3593>
National Bank of Hungary first
vice-president Janos Fekete said he hoped a planned eight pct
devaluation of the forint will spur exports and redress last
year's severe trade deficit with the West.
    Fekete told Reuters in an interview Hungary must achieve at
least equilibrium on its hard currency trade.
    "It is useful to have a devaluation," he said. "There is now a
real push to our exports and a bit of a curb to our imports."
    The official news agency MTI said today Hungary would
devalue by eight pct and it expected the new rates to be
announced later today. Fekete said the rates would come into
effect tomorrow.
    He said one reason for the devaluation was that Hungary had
a higher rate of inflation over the past two years than its
main partners (around eight pct in 1985 and between five and
5.5 pct in 1986).
    This was partly an after-effect of action Hungary took to
prevent inflation from soaring during the oil price shocks of
the 1970s, he added.
    Hungary devalued by a similar amount last September and by
between three and four pct early last year.
    But the country's hard currency trade balance nevertheless
fell into a deficit of 539.4 mln dlrs from a surplus of 295.3
mln in 1986 and 1.2 billion in 1985.
    Fekete said Hungary was hoping for a hard currency trade
surplus of between 200 and 300 mln dlrs this year, but that a
more likely outcome would be closer to equilibrium on total
hard currency trade of around 10 billion dlrs.
    One Western commercial attache here said: "Devaluation of
itself will not change anything. It will only be useful if they
also make efforts to restructure industry and improve the
quality of their export goods."
    Fekete said he hoped to raise credits on good terms this
year to invest in restructuring industry.
    It would be his role to persuade international banks to
cooperate in this process. He noted Hungary had been given an
AA rating enabling it to raise money on the Japanese Samurai
bond market.
    Hungary's net hard currency debt soared to 7.79 billion
dlrs last year from 5.01 billion in 1985, partly because of a
current account deficit of 1.42 billion dlrs and partly because
the fall in the dollar increased the dollar value of debt
denominated in marks or yen.
    He said he feared net debt would also rise slightly this
year, but he was in favour of borrowing for the purpose of
modernisation.
    "I am for credits to invest for that purpose," he said. "I am
against credits for consumption." He forecast gross domestic
product growth of two pct this year, from one pct in 1986.
   Fekete said Hungary would continue to restructure its debt
profile by prepaying high interest shorter and medium term
loans with cheaper long term money for which it was looking
more and more to the fixed interest rate bond market, where he
considered rates to be low.
    Hard currency foreign exchange reserves would stay at
around 3.5 billion dlrs, he said. On the budget deficit, which
tripled to a provisional 47 billion forints last year after
quadrupling in 1985, Fekete said the finance ministry was
working out measures to reduce an approved target deficit for
this year of 43.8 billion forints to between 30 and 35 billion
forints.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3612>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with unspecified late assistance of around 240 mln
stg.
    This brings its total assistance on the day to 346 mln stg
compared with a liquidity shortfall it estimated at a revised
250 mln stg.
    Overnight interbank sterling was being offered at eight pct
shortly after the Bank's announcement.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3666>
Foreign exchange market rumours that the
the Bank of England has been selling sterling to halt its rise
prompted a wary response from dealers who said they saw no
obvious confirmation, market sources said.
    Bank of England officials were not immediately available
for comment. Earlier this week, the Bank sanctioned a cut in
bank interest rates in a surprise move, which aimed at limiting
sterling's rise ahead of the March 17 budget.
    But today the pound has strengthened to 72.7 on its
trade-weighted index from 72.1 last night, though the U.K.
Currency is below its day's high against the dollar.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3694>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
intervene in the government securities market to add temporary
reserves via customer or system repurchase agreements,
economists said.
    Most economists said the Fed will inject reserves
indirectly via customer repurchases, but they added that the
Fed might opt for a direct injection of reserves via overnight
system repurchases.
    Federal funds opened at 6-3/8 pct and eased to 6-5/16 pct
in early trading. Funds averaged 6.29 pct yesterday.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3735>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange two billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-5/16 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4038>
U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
declined comment on the February 22 Paris accord between the
six major industrial nations under which they agreed to foster
exchange rate stability.
    Asked by reporters after a speech before the National
Fitness Foundation banquet what, if any, currency intervention
levels had been set in Paris, Baker replied: "We never talk
about intervention."
    Baker also declined to comment on his views about the
foreign exchange markets' reaction to the accord.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4088>
The Bank of England said it had invited
the discount houses to make an early round of bill offers to
help offset a large liquidity shortage in the money market.
    It estimated the shortage at around 1.55 billion stg, one
adverse factor being the unwinding of a sale and repurchase
agreement, with the market having to buy back bills worth 542
mln stg from the Bank.
    Bills maturing in official hands and the treasury bill
take-up would drain 957 mln stg wile exchequer transactions and
a note circulation rise would take out 15 mln and 25 mln
respectively. Above target bankers' balances would add 10 mln.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4090>
The Bank of England said it had bought
bills worth 1.059 billion stg from the market for resale on
March 31 at rates of interest between 10-7/16 pct and 10-17/32
pct.
    Earlier, the Bank said it estimated the liquidity shortage
in the market today at around 1.55 billion stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4093>
Taiwan's new controls on currency
inflows, implemented today, are a desperate bid to stem a flood
of speculative money prompted by the local currency surge
against the U.S. Dollar, local and foreign bankers said.
    The central bank now has to clear remittances exceeding one
mln U.S. Dlrs earned from exports, shipping and insurance and
bank lending plus remittances of more than 10,000 dlrs from any
other source.
    Petitioners have to show their remittances relate to
genuine commercial transactions.
    Meanwhile, traders are no longer required to report all
outward payments concerning invisible trade, including freight,
insurance and royalties, to the central bank.
    But bankers said they believed the new controls would be
ineffective since businessmen could split up remittances into
smaller units or simply remit money through Taiwan's
flourishing currency black market.
    The bankers said the controls, announced on March 6, are a
panic reaction to U.S. Pressure, which has intensified over the
past week, for a faster appreciation of the Taiwan dollar to
slow the growth of Taiwan's exports to the U.S.
    The government has denied local press reports Washington is
pressing for an exchange rate of up to 28 dlrs.
    The Taiwan dollar opened four cents up today at 34.70.
    "I don't think the central bank has a final target," said an
executive with a U.S. Bank. Other bankers and economists said
they are wary of making any firm predictions about how far the
Taiwan dollar will rise.
    Taiwan's trade surplus with the U.S. Hit 13.6 billion U.S.
Dlrs last year against 10.2 billion in 1985. The surplus
widened in the first two months of the year to 2.35 billion
dlrs from 1.87 billion in the same period last year.
    Economists estimate up to five billion dlrs in speculative
money flowed into Taiwan in 1986.
    This inflow helped boost foreign exchange reserves to more
than 51 billion dlrs from just under 25 billion this time last
year and provided further upward pressure on the currency.
    The Taiwan dollar has appreciated by almost 15 pct against
the U.S. Currency since September 1985, further encouraging
speculators.
    Central bank governor Chang Chi-cheng said last week
Washington's pressure plus rising foreign exchange reserves
meant a further strengthening in the currency is inevitable.
    Many local bankers argue the only effective solution to the
currency problem is to drop foreign exchange controls and allow
the local dollar to find its own level.
    "Lifting exchange controls is the final answer, but the
central bank is not prepared to do it. It simply does not want
to take the risk," said one local banker.
    He said he believed the new restrictions are a temporary
measure designed to buy time as the central bank grapples with
the exchange rate problem.
    The restrictions are a bureaucratic imposition and skirt
around the real issue, he said.
    Taiwan needs a fundamental restructuring of foreign
exchange controls, said an executive with a western bank.
    "The controls will create more paperwork, but the extra bank
charges will not outweigh the profits of speculation," said the
manager of a European bank.
    Economists criticised the controls, saying they could
antagonise Washington, which is pushing for further economic
liberalisation in Taiwan.
    "Instead of liberalising outflows, the government has
restricted inflows," said Kate Newman, an economist with Vickers
da Costa.
    A local banker, who declined to be named, said, "It's
basically ridiculous. It's a backward movement and goes against
the government's liberalisation programme."
    Taiwan last year eased some of its financial regulations to
enable Taiwan nationals to invest in foreign government bonds,
treasury bills and certificates of deposit and to allow
individuals to take 5,000 U.S. Dlrs in cash out of the country
each year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4131>
The Bank of England said it provided the
market with a further 442 mln stg assistance during the morning
to offset a liquidity shortage it estimated at 1.60 billion
stg, revised up from 1.55 billion
    The bank bought outright eight mln stg of band one treasury
bills and five mln stg of band one bank bills at 10-3/8 pct.
    It bought a further 429 mln stg of bills for resale to the
discount houses on April 2 at an interest rate of 10-7/16 pct.
    So far today, the bank has given the market assistance
worth a total of 1.501 billion stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4139>
U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
declined comment on the February 22 Paris accord between the
six major industrial nations under which they agreed to foster
exchange rate stability.
    Asked by reporters after a speech before the National
Fitness Foundation banquet what, if any, currency intervention
levels had been set in Paris, Baker replied: "We never talk
about intervention."
    Baker also declined to comment on his views about the
foreign exchange markets' reaction to the accord.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4170>
Taiwan imposed currency controls today
in what bankers called a desperate move to prevent speculation
as the Taiwan dollar appreciated against the U.S. currency.
    The strict controls will require proof that large
remittances to Taiwan are connected to commercial transactions
rather than currency speculation.
    Bankers attacked the controls as ineffective, saying they
were a panic reaction to pressure from Washington for faster
appreciation of the Taiwan currency against the U.S. dollar,
which would slow exports to the United States.
    Remittances exceeding one mln dlrs earned through exports,
shipping, insurance or bank lending will now need government
approval, along with remittances of more than 10,000 dlrs from
any other source.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4188>
The Bank of England said it gave the
market further assistance of two mln stg during the afternoon,
buying that amount of band two bank bills at 10-5/16 pct.
    The bank has given the market assistance worth 1.503
billion stg today to offset a shortage it estimated at a
revised 1.60 billion.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4275>
The Federal Reserve is not expected to
intervene in the government securities market today, several
economists said.
    They said the Fed does not have a much of an adding need
this week and may wait until tomorrow or Monday before
supplying reserves.
    But a few economists said there was an outside chance that
the Fed may inject reserves indirectly via a small round of
customer repurchase agreements.
    Federal funds hovered at 6-1/8 pct this morning after
averaging 6.32 pct yesterday.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4298>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange two billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a spokeswoman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-1/8 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4616>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told a
press conference he thinks exchange rates will remain stable
due to the currency accord reached in Paris last month by six
major industrialised nations but he did not say for how long.
    The dollar has hovered around 153 yen since the six agreed
to cooperate to bring about currency stability.
    Asked to comment on remarks by some U.S. Officials calling
for a further decline of the dollar, Miyazawa said only the
U.S. President and the U.S. Treasury Secretary can make
official statements about exchange rates.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4633>
International Trade and Industry Minister
Hajime Tamura told a parliamentary session Japan's small- and
medium-sized enterprises are seriously suffering from the yen's
rise and can only stand levels around 170 yen.
    He also said he still believes a dollar exchange rate level
plus or minus 10 yen from 170 yen would be within levels agreed
upon last month in Paris by six major industrial nations.
Finance ministers of Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the U.S.
And West Germany agreed on February 22 to cooperate in
stabilizing exchange rates around the current levels. The
dollar had closed here at 153.77 yen on February 20.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4666>
The Bank of England said it invited an
early round of bill offers to help ease tight conditions in the
money market.
    The bank estimated today's liquidity shortage at about 1.10
billion stg.
    Bills maturing in official hands and the treasury bill
take-up would drain 1.21 billion stg from the system while a
rise in the note circulation and below target bankers' balances
would take out 265 mln and 180 mln respectively, the bank said.
    Against this, exchequer transactions would add a net 535
mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4680>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told a
parliamentary session the current dollar/yen exchange rate is
not necessarily satisfactory for the Japanese economy.
    Miyazawa said the Paris currency accord among six major
industrial nations last month does not necessarily mean the yen
should stay stable around current levels in the future.
    The Paris agreement was aimed at stopping a further rapid
fluctuation of exchange rates, he said.
    The accord stipulated that current rates reflect
fundamentals of the six nations - Britain, Canada, France,
Japan, the U.S. And West Germany.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4682>
The Bank of England said it provided the
market with 478 mln stg of early assistance to help ease a
liquidity shortage it estimated at 1.10 billion stg.
    It made outright purchases of seven mln stg of band one
bank bills at 10-3/8 pct and 30 mln stg of band two bank bills
at 10-5/16 pct.
    In addition, it bought 294 mln stg of paper for resale to
the market on March 30 and 147 mln stg for resale on April 8,
in both cases at an interest rate of 10-7/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4703>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told a
parliamentary session the current dollar/yen exchange rate is
not necessarily satisfactory for the Japanese economy.
    Miyazawa said the Paris currency accord among six major
industrial nations last month does not necessarily mean the yen
should stay stable around current levels in the future.
    The Paris agreement was aimed at stopping a further rapid
fluctuation of exchange rates, he said.
    The accord stipulated that current rates reflect
fundamentals of the six nations - Britain, Canada, France,
Japan, the U.S. And West Germany.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4709>
International Trade and Industry Minister
Hajime Tamura told a parliamentary session Japan's small- and
medium-sized enterprises are seriously suffering from the yen's
rise and can only stand levels around 170 yen.
    He also said he still believes a dollar exchange rate level
plus or minus 10 yen from 170 yen would be within levels agreed
upon last month in Paris by six major industrial nations.
Finance ministers of Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the U.S.
And West Germany agreed on February 22 to cooperate in
stabilizing exchange rates around the current levels. The
dollar had closed here at 153.77 yen on February 20.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4712>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told a
press conference he thinks exchange rates will remain stable
due to the currency accord reached in Paris last month by six
major industrialised nations but he did not say for how long.
    The dollar has hovered around 153 yen since the six agreed
to cooperate to bring about currency stability.
    Asked to comment on remarks by some U.S. Officials calling
for a further decline of the dollar, Miyazawa said only the
U.S. President and the U.S. Treasury Secretary can make
official statements about exchange rates.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4720>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with a further 168 mln stg of assistance to help
offset a shortage it now estimated at 1.05 billion stg, revised
down from 1.10 billion.
    It bought 21 mln stg of bank bills outright, 20 mln in band
one at 10-3/8 pct and one mln in band two at 10-5/16 pct. In
addition, it bought 98 mln stg of bills for resale on March 30
and 49 mln stg for resale April 8 at an interest rate of
10-7/16 pct. All these rates are the same as for today's
earlier help.
    So far today, the bank has provided the market with
assistance worth 646 mln stg.
    The bank also announced the rates applicable to temporary
lending facilities rolled over today.
    The average mid-market rate for lending rolled over for one
week is 10-15/16 pct and for two weeks 10-5/8 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4768>
The Bank of England said it has revised
its estimate of today's shortfall to one billion stg, before
taking account of 646 mln stg morning assistance.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4783>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with a further 195 mln stg assistance during the
afternoon.
    This brings total help today to 841 mln stg compared with a
liquidity shortage it has estimated at a revised one billion
stg.
    The Bank bought 176 mln stg of band two bank bills outright
at 10-5/16 pct and 13 mln stg of band one bank bills at 10-3/8
pct. In addition, it bought four mln stg of bills for resale to
the market on March 30 and two mln stg for resale on April 8,
at a common interest rate of 10-7/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4809>
The European Monetary System marks its
eighth anniversary still vulnerable to turmoil in world money
markets despite creating an island of currency rate stability
in Europe, economists say. But many economists say the system,
which holds eight European Community currencies within narrow
fluctuation bands, remains in its infancy.
    Its new currency, the European Currency Unit (Ecu), has
been a runaway success with investors and borrowers alike
seeking an alternative to the volatile dollar.
    And on Wednesday, the long term vision of the Ecu as
Europe's common currency took a step nearer to becoming reality
when Belgium minted the world's first Ecu coin.
    But economists say members such as West Germany have so far
blocked a second stage of development envisaged by the system's
founding fathers, ex-West German Chancellor Helmut Schmidt and
former French President Valery Giscard d'Estaing.
    Under this phase, originally due to have started two years
after the EMS was set up, decision-making was to have been
transferred from national governments and central banks to an
autonomous European Monetary Fund.
   But members have jealously guarded their sovereignty in
economic and monetary matters. "The basic problem of the EMS is
that governments are not prepared to make the quantum leap to a
situation where certain decisions are taken in common," said one
economist who has closely watched the system's development.
    The result is that the EC is often divided over policy on
third currencies, accentuating what the economists say is the
system's greatest weakness, its vulnerability to a weak dollar.
    Over the past 18 months, as the U.S. Dollar plunged and
investors moved into strong currencies, the resulting sharp
rise of the West German mark severely strained the system. MORE
    As the mark soared against the dollar, it also rose against
EMS currencies less favoured by international investors. And as
West Germany last year refused to give in pressure from several
EC partners and the United States to cut interest rates to slow
the mark's rise, the EMS had to be realigned twice to ease
financial and trade strains within the community.
    Two months ago the mark and the Dutch guilder were revalued
by three pct and the Belgian and Luxembourg francs by two pct
against other currencies in the system -- the French franc,
Italian lira, the Irish punt and Danish crown.
   Another frustration has been Britain's failure to lend the
EMS political support by keeping the pound, still a major world
currency, outside the system.
    No change in the British government's attitude is expected
before the country's next general elections, due by mid-1988.
    Meanwhile, the system's last realignment, the 11th since it
was set up, prompted European finance ministers to ask the EC's
highly-secretive Monetary Committee and Committee of Central
Bank Governors to come up with suggestions for reinforcing it.
    Their ideas are due to be unveiled when finance ministers
hold an informal meeting in Belgium early next month.
    But economists said the proposals are unlikely to involve
more than tinkering with technical details. They are sceptical
about the chances for any fundamental change.
    "Technical measures won't be enough to protect the EMS
against external factors such as dollar weakness. For that we
must take the step forward to the institutional level," said Leo
de Corel of Kredietbank's economic research department.
    Economists say the system's fortunes now will depend
largely on the success of an agreement last month among major
industrial nations to stabilise exchange rates. If the dollar
resumes its slide the EMS could be in for more turbulence, they
predict.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4822>
The Bank of England said it gave the
money market late, unspecified assistance of around 185 mln
stg.
    This takes the total liquidity injected into the system by
the bank today to 1.026 billion stg compared with a shortage it
estimated at around one billion stg.
    Overnight interbank sterling dipped to 10 nine pct after
the bank's announcement compared with levels around 10-1/2 pct
shortly before and 11-1/4 11 pct initially today, dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4829>
France today repaid 21.95 billion francs
of short-term currency intervention debt to the European
Monetary Cooperation Fund, EMCF, the Finance Ministry said.
    It said the debt was part of a 33.90 billion franc
liability incurred through the activation of EMCF swap
facilities to defend the franc before the January 11 European
Monetary System realignment.
    The realignment, following several weeks of speculative
pressure, produced a three pct revaluation of the West German
mark and the Dutch guilder against the French franc and a two
pct revaluation of the Belgian franc.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4882>
U.S. Trade Representative Clayton
Yeutter said that whether the exchange rate of the dollar would
fall or rise in the coming decade would depend on nations'
financial, monetary and tax policies.
    But, he said, in a speech and remarks to the Heritage
Foundation, that in the end "the marketplace will ultimately
rule the day."
    Asked about the future of the dollar, he said that whether
or not it would rise or fall depended on economic policies and
coooperation among trading nations.
    Yeutter said "if nations do the right kinds of things in
financial, monetary and tax policies, then a lesser burden of
adjustment is placed on exchange rates, and one could envision
a situation of the major trading nations moving back far closer
to what most of us would consider equilibrium and exchange
rates becoming relatively stable."
    But he said, on the other hand, that if nations did not
exhibit greater self discipline and international cooperation,
"It is simply inevitable that the exchange rates will make that
adjustment."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5070>
Central banks have easily beaten back
the foreign exchange market's first test of the industrialized
nations' recent pact to stabilize currencies, analysts said.
    In active trading this week, the market pushed the dollar,
sterling, the Canadian dollar and Australian dollar higher. But
operators got their fingers burned as one by one the central
banks signalled their displeasure.
    "So far G-6 has been a roaring success,"said James O'Neill,
financial markets economist at Marine Midland Bank NA.
    "The central banks are sending strong signals that they
won't tolerate any kind of momentum building behind
currencies," added a senior corporate trader at one U.K. bank.
    On February 22, the finance ministers and central bank
governors of the U.S., Japan, West Germany, France and the U.K.
-- the Group of Five -- plus Canada, signed an accord under
which they agreed to cooperate closely to foster stability of
exchange rates around prevailing levels.
    The agreement was viewed by many in the market as an
attempt to put a floor under the dollar after its sizeable
two-year decline against major world currencies.
    And initially, traders indicated their respect for the
accord by refraining from pushing the dollar lower.
    But by Wednesday, the dollar climbed to more than 1.87
marks, about five pfennigs above its levels the Friday before
the G-6 accord.
    The move was aided by indications that the U.S. economy
picked up steam in February at the same time as the West German
economy was regressing.
    But dealers said the Federal Reserve Bank of New York gave
traders a sharp reminder that the G-6 pact had encompassed the
idea of limiting inordinate dollar gains as well as declines.
    Dealers differed as to whether the U.S. central bank
actually intervened to sell dollars above 1.87 marks, or simply
telephoned dealers to ask for quotes and enquire about trading
conditions.
    But the dollar quickly backed off. It hovered today around
1.85 marks. "The market was surprised that the Fed showed its
face so soon," said Marine Midland NA's O'Neill.
    Also on Wednesday, London dealers said the Bank of England
intervened in the open market to sell sterling as the U.K.
currency rose to 1.60 dlrs compared with 1.5355 dlrs before the
G-6 pact.
    Sterling, along with the other high-yield currencies like
the Australian dollar and Canadian dollar, was in favor after
traders surmised that the the chance of intervention pursuant
to the Paris currency accord left limited room for profit plays
on dollar/mark and dollar/yen.
    The pound also was boosted by suggestions of an improving
U.K. economy, anticipation of a popular British budget on March
17 and public opinion polls showing good chances for the
incumbent Conservative party in any general election.
    "There was a real run on sterling," said Anne Mills of
Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc.
    Sterling traded today around 1.5750 dlrs, down from 1.5870
dlrs last night. It slid to 2.917 marks from 2.950 yesterday
and from a peak of about 2.98 recently. "There's been some
heavy profit-taking on sterling/mark ahead of next Tuesday's
U.K. budget," said James McGroarty of Discount Corp.
    As speculators detected the presence of the U.S. and
British central banks, they acclerated their shift into
Canadian and Australian dollars. But here too they were
stymied. The Bank of Canada acted to slow its currency's rise.
    The Canadian dollar traded at 1.3218/23 per U.S. dollar
today, down from 1.3185/90 yesterday.
    And the Australian Reserve Bank, using the Fed as agent,
sold Australian dollars in the U.S. yesterday, dealers said.
    The Australian dollar fell to a low of 67.45/55 U.S. cents
today from a high of 69.02 Thursday.
    Analysts said the central banks' moves to stifle sudden
upward movement, leave the market uncertain about its next
step. Today, the focus shifted to the yen which has held to a
very tight range against the dollar for several months.
    The dollar fell to 152.35/40 yen from 153.35/40 last night.
Analysts said the yen also gained as traders unwound long
sterling/short mark positions established lately.
    "Because of the change in perceptions about the health of
the German economy, the funds from those unwinding operations
are ending up in yen," a dealer at one U.K. bank said.
    Recent West German data have shown falling industry orders,
lower industrial output and slowing employment gains.
    Moreover, the yen is benefitting as Japanese entities who
have invested heavily overseas, for example in Australian
financial instruments, repatriate their profits ahead of the
end of the Japanese fiscal year on March 31.
    Noting that the dollar/yen rate is in a sense the most
controversial one because of the large U.S. trade deficit with
Japan, analysts said the stage could be set for another test of
the dollar's downward scope against the Japanese currency.
    In its latest review of the foreign exchange market through
the end of January, the Federal Reserve revealed that it
intervened to protect the dollar against the yen on January 28.
On that day, the dollar fell as low as 150.40 yen.
    "Sure, the Fed bought dollars near the 150 yen level in
January. But the market has to bear in mind that time marches
on and the situation changes," said McGroarty of Discount.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5176>
Leading industrial nations will meet
again next month to review their accord on currency stability,
but U.S. Officials said financial markets are convinced for now
the countries will live up to commitments to speed up economic
growth.
    The narrow currency movements of recent weeks strongly
suggests the six leading industrial countries have tamed the
normally unruly financial markets and next month's talks seem
likely to build on that stability.
    A Reagan administration official said the Paris agreement
last month was the main reason markets were calm.
    But he said in an interview that financial markets also
understood, "That all six countries concluded that the measures
to be taken over a period of time in the future should foster
stability of exchange rates around current levels. That is in
fact what has happened since Paris."
    Monetary analysts said stability has been helped in part by
the decision of industrial nations to bury the hatchet and
cease to quarrel over short-term policy objectives.
    Instead they have focused on medium-term policy goals, but
left room to adjust their agreements with periodic meetings.
    The official refused to comment, however, on whether the
agreement included a secret pact to consider further
coordinated interest rate cuts -- a measure industrial nations
have taken jointly several times in the past year.
    On February 22, the United States, Japan, West Germany,
France, Britain and Canada agreed that major currencies were
within ranges broadly reflecting underlying economic
conditions, given commitments by Washington to cut its budget
deficit and by Toyko and Bonn to boost economic growth.
    The shake-up would strengthen the U.S. Position in
future international talks.
    "I think these changes will strengthen the President's hand
politically and the stronger he is politically the better off
we are with the Congress and the better off we are in
international fora," said the official, an Administration
economic policymaker. "So it would be beneficial to the
continued conduct of our initiatives."
    But the official also said the Administration would resist
calls for a tax increase to cut the budget deficit -- a target
Europeans say is crucial to help curb economic instability.
    Last week, dealers said the Federal Reserve intervened to
stop the dollar rising against the mark, which had breached
1.86 to the dollar. British authorities are also understood to
have intervened to curb sterling's strength.
    International monetary sources say finance ministers and
central bankers, who will review market performance and their
own economic prospects, will reassemble again in Washington
just before the April 9 policymaking meeting of the
International Monetary Fund.
    The sources said Italy, which refused to join the Paris
pact, was invited back by Treasury Secretary James Baker.
    Since Paris, there are signs West German growth is slowing,
while U.S. Officials said they were giving Japan until April to
show that an economic stimulus package was in the offing.
    Signs of concern about German prospects emerged recently
when Bundesbank (central bank) president Karl Otto Poehl told
bankers he would consider cutting West German interest rates if
the Fed was ready to follow suit.
    A Reagan Administration official said this would show there
had been some change in approach on the part of the central
bank in Germany.
    But he declined to comment on the prospects for action by
the Fed and the Bundesbank.
    "If there is such a provision it is private and if I talked
about it, it would no longer be private," said the official, who
asked not to be identified.
    Public comments by Fed officials suggest the central bank
is keeping credit conditions broadly unchanged, but if the
major economies continue to show sluggish growth and the U.S.
Trade deficit remains stubbornly high, further coordinated
action could be on the April agenda.
 REUTER...
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5181>
Peru will put into effect Monday a foreign
exchange rationing system for imports designed to stop a slide
in the country's international reserves, a government decree in
the Official Gazette said.
    Under the system, importers will be required to present a
bill from the foreign seller of goods and apply for a license
for foreign exchange. The central bank will have 10 days to
decide whether to issue the required foreign exchange.
    Net international reserves now total about 800 mln dlrs
compared to 1.54 billion dlrs a year ago.
    The system will be effective until the end of 1988.
    A ceiling for foreign exchange availability will be set by
a council with members from the central bank, the economy
ministry and the planning and foreign trade institutes. The
central bank will issue licenses to procure foreign exchange in
accordance with guidelines set by the council.
    Peru's reserves fell sharply due to a drop in the trade
surplus to about five mln dlrs in 1986 from 1.1 billion in
1985, according to preliminary central bank estimates.
   Total exports dropped to 2.50 billion dlrs last year against
2.97 billion in 1985.
   Imports last year rose sharply as gross domestic product
grew by about 8.5 pct, the highest economic growth level
registered in 12 years. Imports were about 2.49 billion dlrs in
1986 against 1.87 billion in 1985, according to preliminary
estimates.
    The cushion of reserves allowed Peru to take a hard-line
debt stance last year and suspend most payments due on its 14.3
billion dlr foreign debt.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5183>
The United States wants Taiwan's
currency to appreciate faster to reduce Taiwan's trade surplus
with the U.S., A senior trade official said.
    Board of Foreign Trade director Vincent Siew told reporters
on Saturday U.S. Officials told him in Washington last week
that unless Taiwan allowed its dollar to rise faster it would
face retaliation.
    Siew returned from Washington on Friday after the U.S
responded to Taiwan's request to increase its textile export
quotas by promising further talks in May. Taiwan's surplus with
the U.S. Hit a record 13.6 billion U.S. Dlrs in 1986.
    Washington signed a three-year accord with Taipei last year
limiting textile export growth to 0.5 pct a year.
    Siew said the Taiwan dollar had risen by about 15 pct
against the U.S. Dollar since September 1985.
    It surged last week amid indications Washington was seeking
a major rise in its value. It rose four cents against the U.S.
Dollar on Saturday to close at 34.59.
    Western trade sources told Reuters Taiwan and the U.S. Have
been holding talks on the currency issue but added it is not
clear how far Washington wants to see the Taiwan dollar rise.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5190>
Zambia's talks with the World Bank and
International Monetary Fund (IMF) on a financial rescue package
have run into difficulties on the issue of food subsidies, an
official newspaper said.
    The Times of Zambia, which is run by the ruling United
National Independence Party (UNIP), quoted official sources as
saying the IMF and World Bank had refused to continue financing
food subsidies and were pressing the government to explain how
it proposes to pay for them.
    President Kenneth Kaunda tried to abolish maize subsidies
last December, in line with IMF recommendations, but the move
caused maize meal prices to double overnight and led to riots
in which 15 people were killed.
    The subsidies were immediately restored as part of moves to
quell the disturbances, but they are estimated to cost the
government about 500 mln kwacha per year.
    The Times of Zambia said another major issue in the
government's current talks with the IMF and World Bank was the
remodelling of Zambia's foreign exchange auction.
    The central bank's weekly auction of foreign exchange to
the private sector has been suspended since the end of January,
pending modifications to slow down the rate of devaluation and
dampen fluctuations in the exchange rate.
    The kwacha slid to around 15 per dollar under the auction
system, losing 85 pct of its value in 16 months. However, since
the end of January it has been revalued to a fixed rate of nine
per dollar.
    Banking sources said Zambia was persuaded by the World Bank
and IMF to lift its proposed ceiling of 12.50 kwacha per dollar
on the currency's devaluation once the auctions restart.
    According to the Times of Zambia, the IMF team, led by
assistant director for Africa Paul Acquah, is due to conclude
its talks with the government on schedule on March 23.
    The IMF mission arrived in Lusaka on February 26 and its
talks with the government have taken longer than expected.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5193>
Jordan's key economic priorities are
having a sound national treasury and adequate foreign exchange
reserves, Prime Minister Zeid al-Rifa'i said.
    "First, the national treasury should be in sound shape when
dealing with the public and other countries so that its
credibility is preserved," he said in a television interview
Saturday.
    "The second priority is to maintain an acceptable level of
foreign exchange reserves to provide (the) stability and
confidence needed by the government to meet foreign
commitments."
    Rifa'i said Jordan's outstanding government-guaranteed and
commercial loans total 902 mln dinars with a debt service ratio
of 14.9 pct.
    The figure was sharply lower than the 1.02 billion dinars
in outstanding loans at the end of September, according to
latest Central Bank figures.
    Rifa'i dismissed the view of some bankers and economists
here that the dinar, which is pegged to a basket of currencies,
is overvalued.
    "The dinar is strong and stable and we intend to preserve
its stability," he said.
    The prime minister said he hoped the next Arab summit would
tackle the question of continuing financial aid to Jordan.
Under a 10-year agreement reached in 1978, Jordan was to
receive a total of 1.25 billion dlrs annually from Algeria,
Iraq, Kuwait, Libya, Qatar, Saudi Arabia and the United Arab
Emirates to help it resist Israel.
    But only Saudi Arabia met its obligations, while the others
failed because of falling income due to lower oil prices.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5201>
German banking authorities are
weighing rules for banks' off-balance sheet activities in an
attempt to cope with the growing volume of sophisticated
capital market instruments, banking sources said.
    Interest rate and currency swaps and currency options are
under closest scrutiny, and if revisions are made they may
resemble regulation jointly proposed by the U.S. And U.K. To
Japan. Juergen Becker, director of the Bundesbank's division of
banking law and credit supervision, said the U.S.-British
proposals were interesting, but declined to elaborate.
    But banking sources said West Germany was more likely to
produce its own conclusions than to adopt foreign proposals.
    "There is no formal plan yet, but talks are in the latter
stages," one representative of the German Banking Association in
Cologne said. Bankers expect rule changes this year.
    All alterations must be approved by the Bundesbank, West
Germany's four major banking associations and the Federal
Banking Supervisory Office.
    Talks have been slowed by the fact that fundamental changes
would require a revision of Germany's credit law, which has
been in effect since 1934.
    Authorities favour reinterpreting the credit law to fit
present circumstances in order to avoid the long parliamentary
political process of changing it, banking sources said.
    Since the beginning of 1984 the banking law has limited
banks' lending to 18 times shareholders' equity plus reserves,
on a consolidated basis.
    But lending ratios do not extend to several newer
instruments such as spot and forward currency contracts,
currency and interest swaps, commercial paper programs,
currency options, interest rate futures in foreign currencies
and various innovative types of interest rate hedges.
    The sources said the main value of the U.S.-U.K. Proposals
lay in differentiating between different types of risk factor,
and, for instance, in placing greater weight on currency swaps
than interest swaps. But even if German banking authorities
agree with some of the assessments of swaps, they disagree on
how to find balance sheet equivalents for the risk.
    U.S.-British proposals include a complicated series of
formulae for assessing the stream of payments involved in
swaps, whose ultimate risk is borne by the financial
intermediary, especially when counterparties remain anonymous.
This is the so-called market-to-market value.
    But German authorities are likely to consider this much too
complex and to base their evaluation instead on a schedule of
lending ratings assigned according to the creditworthiness of
the borrowers involved, the sources said.
    The weightings, also likely if lending ratios are extended
to include banks' securities portfolios, are zero for public
authorities, 20 pct for domestic banks, 50 pct for foreign
banks and 100 pct for other foreign and non-bank borrowers.
    A further complication is that the more flexible
definitions of equity allowed in the U.S. And the U.K. May put
German banks at a competitive disadvantage, the sources said.
    Stricter definitions here also mean the use of a version of
the U.S.-U.K. Proposals could far exceed the intent of the U.S.
And British authorities, the sources said.
    One specialist for Dresdner Bank AG said a long-dated
foreign exchange forward transaction could, for instance, be
brought under the same rule as a cross-currency swap, despite
the fact that the risk may be entirely different.
    How new regulations will affect foreign banks here was
uncertain. Many have converted to full subsidiary status and
applied for a full banking licence over the last two years in
order to lead-manage mark eurobonds.
    But as their equity capital is fairly small, tight lending
ratios will severely hamper foreign banks' freedom of movement,
particularly in the growing business of currency swaps, if they
are required to include more transactions in the balance sheet,
the sources added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5206>
The Bank of Japan is satisfied with the
yen around its current range, a senior central bank official
told reporters.
    He said the pledge by major industrial nations in Paris
last month to cooperate to hold exchange rates around current
ranges applied in both directions, a dollar fall or a dollar
rise.
    Unilateral intervention itself cannot ensure currency
stability, but it can be useful when coordinated with other
policies and with other central banks, he said.
    The Bank of Japan is rather confident currency stability
will continue for some time, the senior bank official said, but
declined to be more specific.
    Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told parliament on Friday
the current dollar/yen exchange rate is not necessarily
satisfactory for the Japanese economy.
    Asked what factors might destabilize the markets, the
official cited a lessening of market fear about intervention, a
completely unexpected change in the economy of Japan, the U.S.
Or West Germany, or resumption of comments by government
officials seeking to talk the dollar up or down.
    The senior bank official said he expects Japan's gross
national product (GNP) to grow three pct or slightly more in
the fiscal year beginning in April. That would be little
changed from the performance expected this year.
    Domestic demand may grow nearly four pct in 1987/88, but
the external sector will have a negative impact on GNP of
nearly one percentage point, he said.
    He said there was virtually no room for further monetary
policy action to boost the economy. The economy's performance
in the future very much depends on fiscal policy, he added.
    The central bank's monetary policy has already done its
part in stimulating the economy, the senior bank official said.
The Bank of Japan has cut its discount rate five times over the
last year and a half.
    Although the central bank does not see any imminent risk of
inflation, there could be some problems in the future, he said.
"We are sitting on a barrel of powder, but fortunately it may
still be wet," he added.
    Liquidity among private households and especially the
corporate sector has increased substantially, he said.
    The liquidity is the reason for the recent boom of stock
exchange prices, the bank official said. This inflow of funds
into the stock exchange, occurring also in other countries, may
continue, he said.
    The senior official said the Bank of Japan is hoping
Federal Reserve chairman Paul Volcker will be re-appointed when
his current term expires later this year.
    "He's a great man," the official said, adding that more and
more people expect his reappointment.
    Turning to exchange rates, the official said the
substantial drop in the dollar is beginning to have an effect
on reducing the imbalance in world trade, even though the
impact has taken longer than expected to show through. Even the
U.S. Trade position has begun to feel the impact, although so
far it has not been very strong, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5223>
The Bank of England said it invited an
early round of bill offers from discount houses after
forecasting a shortage in the system of some 1.05 billion stg.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and treasury bill take-up will drain some
1.07 billion stg while exchequer transactions will take out
around 335 mln stg and bankers' balances below target five mln
stg.
    Partly offseting these outflows, a fall in note circulation
will add some 355 mln stg to the system today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5232>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with assistance worth 90 mln stg in response to an
early round of bill offers from discount houses.
    Earlier, the bank estimated the shortage in the system
today at some 1.05 billion stg.
    The bank bought bills for resale to the market in equal
amounts on April 1, 2 and 3 at an interest rate of 10-7/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5241>
The Bundesbank came into the domestic
money market to add temporary liquidity through federal
government funds as call money rates rose above 4.0 pct,
dealers said.
    They estimated that the bulk of liquidity was added at
about 3.95 pct. Call money fell to 3.90/4.0 pct after the move.
It had been 3.80/90 on Friday.
    The move came as call money extended a rise begun Friday
after the Bundesbank took up some six billion marks owed to it
by other European central banks after currency interventions in
the framework of European Monetary System in January.
    Rates could ease further in trading today but dealers
expect them to rise later in the week as banks begin paying out
funds for tax payments on behalf of clients.
    Some 30 billion marks is likely to leave the market this
month, with the bulk being paid out next week.
    In anticipation of this liquidity drain, banks have stocked
up reserves at the Bundesbank.
    On Thursday, minimum reserve holdings declined to 57.0
billion marks from 60.0 billion on Wednesday but were well
above the 53.2 billion held on Tuesday. Daily average reserve
holdings rose slightly to 54.7 billion marks from 54.5 billion.
    The daily average reserve holdings were above the level of
around 51 billion marks dealers said is needed for the required
daily average for the month.
    With the heavy tax drain in March, banks are likely to
remain cautious about taking more liquidity out of reserves
than is absolutely necessary.
    However, a new securities repurchase pact likely to be
added next week to replace a facility expiring then could
somewhat offset the drain.
    The Bundesbank is expected to allocate more than the 3.4
billion marks which is due to be rolled over, dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5269>
The Bank of England said it had revised
its estimate of the shortage in the money market today up to
1.15 billion stg before taking account of its early operations.
    Earlier, the bank forecast the deficit at 1.05 billion stg
and gave 90 mln stg assistance at an early round of bill
offers.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5271>
The Bank of Japan is satisfied with the
yen around its current range, a senior central bank official
told reporters.
    He said the pledge by major industrial nations in Paris
last month to cooperate to hold exchange rates around current
ranges applied in both directions, a dollar fall or a dollar
rise.
    Unilateral intervention itself cannot ensure currency
stability, but it can be useful when coordinated with other
policies and with other central banks, he said.
    The Bank of Japan is rather confident currency stability
will continue for some time, the senior bank official said, but
declined to be more specific.
    Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told parliament on Friday
the current dollar/yen exchange rate is not necessarily
satisfactory for the Japanese economy.
    Asked what factors might destabilize the markets, the
official cited a lessening of market fear about intervention, a
completely unexpected change in the economy of Japan, the U.S.
Or West Germany, or resumption of comments by government
officials seeking to talk the dollar up or down.
    The senior bank official said he expects Japan's gross
national product (GNP) to grow three pct or slightly more in
the fiscal year beginning in April. That would be little
changed from the performance expected this year.
    Domestic demand may grow nearly four pct in 1987/88, but
the external sector will have a negative impact on GNP of
nearly one percentage point, he said.
    He said there was virtually no room for further monetary
policy action to boost the economy. The economy's performance
in the future very much depends on fiscal policy, he added.
    The central bank's monetary policy has already done its
part in stimulating the economy, the senior bank official said.
The Bank of Japan has cut its discount rate five times over the
last year and a half.
    Although the central bank does not see any imminent risk of
inflation, there could be some problems in the future, he said.
"We are sitting on a barrel of powder, but fortunately it may
still be wet," he added.
    Liquidity among private households and especially the
corporate sector has increased substantially, he said.
    The liquidity is the reason for the recent boom of stock
exchange prices, the bank official said. This inflow of funds
into the stock exchange, occurring also in other countries, may
continue, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5277>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with a further 30 mln stg assistance.
    This brings the Bank's total help so far today to 120 mln
stg and compares with its upward revised estimate that the
system would face a shortage of some 1.15 billon stg.
    The central bank bought bills for resale to the market in
equal amounts on April 1, 2 and 3 at an interest rate of
10-7/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5279>
Peru will put into effect today a foreign
exchange rationing system for imports designed to stop a slide
in the country's international reserves, a government decree in
the Official Gazette said.
    Under the system, importers will be required to present a
bill from the foreign seller of goods and apply for a license
for foreign exchange. The central bank will have 10 days to
decide whether to issue the required foreign exchange.
    Net international reserves now total about 800 mln dlrs
compared to 1.54 billion dlrs a year ago.
    The system will be effective until the end of 1988.
    A ceiling for foreign exchange availability will be set by
a council with members from the central bank, the economy
ministry and the planning and foreign trade institutes. The
central bank will issue licenses to procure foreign exchange in
accordance with guidelines set by the council.
    Peru's reserves fell sharply due to a drop in the trade
surplus to about five mln dlrs in 1986 from 1.1 billion in
1985, according to preliminary central bank estimates.
   Total exports dropped to 2.50 billion dlrs last year against
2.97 billion in 1985.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5280>
The United States wants Taiwan's
currency to appreciate faster to reduce Taiwan's trade surplus
with the U.S., A senior trade official said.
    Board of Foreign Trade director Vincent Siew told reporters
on Saturday U.S. Officials told him in Washington last week
that unless Taiwan allowed its dollar to rise faster it would
face retaliation.
    Siew returned from Washington on Friday after the U.S
responded to Taiwan's request to increase its textile export
quotas by promising further talks in May. Taiwan's surplus with
the U.S. Hit a record 13.6 billion U.S. Dlrs in 1986.
    Washington signed a three-year accord with Taipei last year
limiting textile export growth to 0.5 pct a year.
    Siew said the Taiwan dollar had risen by about 15 pct
against the U.S. Dollar since September 1985.
    It surged last week amid indications Washington was seeking
a major rise in its value. It rose four cents against the U.S.
Dollar on Saturday to close at 34.59.
    Western trade sources told Reuters Taiwan and the U.S. Have
been holding talks on the currency issue but added it is not
clear how far Washington wants to see the Taiwan dollar rise.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5290>
Leading industrial nations will meet
again next month to review their accord on currency stability,
but U.S. Officials said financial markets are convinced for now
the countries will live up to commitments to speed up economic
growth.
    The narrow currency movements of recent weeks strongly
suggests the six leading industrial countries have tamed the
normally unruly financial markets and next month's talks seem
likely to build on that stability.
    A Reagan administration official said the Paris agreement
last month was the main reason markets were calm.
    But he said in an interview that financial markets also
understood, "That all six countries concluded that the measures
to be taken over a period of time in the future should foster
stability of exchange rates around current levels. That is in
fact what has happened since Paris."
    Monetary analysts said stability has been helped in part by
the decision of industrial nations to bury the hatchet and
cease to quarrel over short-term policy objectives.
    Instead they have focused on medium-term policy goals, but
left room to adjust their agreements with periodic meetings.
    The official refused to comment, however, on whether the
agreement included a secret pact to consider further
coordinated interest rate cuts -- a measure industrial nations
have taken jointly several times in the past year.
    On February 22, the United States, Japan, West Germany,
France, Britain and Canada agreed that major currencies were
within ranges broadly reflecting underlying economic
conditions, given commitments by Washington to cut its budget
deficit and by Toyko and Bonn to boost economic growth.
    The shake-up would strengthen the U.S. Position in future
international talks.
    "I think these changes will strengthen the President's hand
politically and the stronger he is politically the better off
we are with the Congress and the better off we are in
international fora," said the official, an Administration
economic policymaker. "So it would be beneficial to the
continued conduct of our initiatives."
    But the official also said the Administration would resist
calls for a tax increase to cut the budget deficit -- a target
Europeans say is crucial to help curb economic instability.
    Currency analysts believe the Paris agreement set secret 
short-term target ranges for their currencies with a specific
agreement to defend those bands with intervention.
    According to market sources, the ranges agreed were 1.60 to
1.90 marks to the dollar, and 140 to 155 yen to the dollar.
    There is no official confirmation that specific bands  were
set, although the agreement used the term "ranges", for the first
time in an international economic agreement.
    The Paris accord stated the six would cooperate closely to
foster currency stability around current levels.
    Last week, dealers said the Federal Reserve intervened to
stop the dollar rising against the mark, which had breached
1.86 to the dollar. British authorities are also understood to
have intervened to curb sterling's strength.
    International monetary sources say finance ministers and
central bankers, who will review market performance and their
own economic prospects, will reassemble again in Washington
just before the April 9 policymaking meeting of the
International Monetary Fund.
    The sources said Italy, which refused to join the Paris
pact, was invited back by Treasury Secretary James Baker.
    Since Paris, there are signs West German growth is slowing,
while U.S. Officials said they were giving Japan until April to
show that an economic stimulus package was in the offing.
    Signs of concern about German prospects emerged recently
when Bundesbank (central bank) president Karl Otto Poehl told
bankers he would consider cutting West German interest rates if
the Fed was ready to follow suit.
    A Reagan Administration official said this would show there
had been some change in approach on the part of the central
bank in Germany.
    But he declined to comment on the prospects for action by
the Fed and the Bundesbank.
    "If there is such a provision it is private and if I talked
about it, it would no longer be private," said the official, who
asked not to be identified.
    Public comments by Fed officials suggest the central bank
is keeping credit conditions broadly unchanged, but if the
major economies continue to show sluggish growth and the U.S.
Trade deficit remains stubbornly high, further coordinated
action could be on the April agenda.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5338>
Zambia's talks with the World Bank and
International Monetary Fund (IMF) on a financial rescue package
have run into difficulties on the issue of food subsidies, an
official newspaper said.
    The Times of Zambia, which is run by the ruling United
National Independence Party (UNIP), quoted official sources as
saying the IMF and World Bank had refused to continue financing
food subsidies and were pressing the government to explain how
it proposes to pay for them.
    President Kenneth Kaunda tried to abolish maize subsidies
last December, in line with IMF recommendations, but the move
caused maize meal prices to double overnight and led to riots.
    The subsidies were immediately restored as part of moves to
quell the disturbances.
    The Times of Zambia said another major issue in the
government's current talks with the IMF and World Bank was the
remodelling of Zambia's foreign exchange auction.
    The central bank's weekly auction of foreign exchange to
the private sector has been suspended since the end of January,
pending modifications to slow down the rate of devaluation and
dampen fluctuations in the exchange rate.
    The kwacha slid to around 15 per dollar under the auction,
losing 85 pct of its value in 16 months, but since the end of
January has been revalued to a fixed rate of nine per dollar.
    Banking sources said Zambia was persuaded by the World Bank
and IMF to lift its proposed ceiling of 12.50 kwacha per dollar
on the currency's devaluation once the auctions restart.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5360>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with late assistance of around 550 mln stg.
    This takes the Bank's total help today to some 1.12 billion
stg and compares with its estimated deficit of around 1.10
billion.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5394>
The European Monetary System marks its
eighth anniversary still vulnerable to turmoil in world money
markets despite creating an island of currency rate stability
in Europe, economists say. But many economists say the system,
which holds eight European Community currencies within narrow
fluctuation bands, remains in its infancy.
    Its new currency, the European Currency Unit (Ecu), has
been a runaway success with investors and borrowers alike
seeking an alternative to the volatile dollar.
    And on Wednesday, the long term vision of the Ecu as
Europe's common currency took a step nearer to becoming reality
when Belgium minted the world's first Ecu coin.
    But economists say members such as West Germany have so far
blocked a second stage of development envisaged by the system's
founding fathers, ex-West German Chancellor Helmut Schmidt and
former French President Valery Giscard d'Estaing.
    Under this phase, originally due to have started two years
after the EMS was set up, decision-making was to have been
transferred from national governments and central banks to an
autonomous European Monetary Fund.
    But members have jealously guarded their sovereignty in
economic and monetary matters. "The basic problem of the EMS is
that governments are not prepared to make the quantum leap to a
situation where certain decisions are taken in common," said one
economist who has closely watched the system's development.
    The result is that the EC is often divided over policy on
third currencies, accentuating what the economists say is the
system's greatest weakness, its vulnerability to a weak dollar.
    Over the past 18 months, as the U.S. Dollar plunged and
investors moved into strong currencies, the resulting sharp
rise of the West German mark severely strained the system.
    Another frustration has been Britain's failure to lend the
EMS political support by keeping the pound, still a major world
currency, outside the system.
    No change in the British government's attitude is expected
before the country's next general elections, due by mid-1988.
    Meanwhile, the system's last realignment, the 11th since it
was set up, prompted European finance ministers to ask the EC's
highly-secretive Monetary Committee and Committee of Central
Bank Governors to come up with suggestions for reinforcing it.
    Their ideas are due to be unveiled when finance ministers
hold an informal meeting in Belgium early next month.
    But economists said the proposals are unlikely to involve
more than tinkering with technical details. They are sceptical
about the chances for any fundamental change.
    "Technical measures won't be enough to protect the EMS
against external factors such as dollar weakness. For that we
must take the step forward to the institutional level," said Leo
de Corel of Kredietbank's economic research department.
    Economists say the system's fortunes now will depend
largely on the success of an agreement last month among major
industrial nations to stabilise exchange rates. If the dollar
resumes its slide the EMS could be in for more turbulence, they
predict.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5404>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
intervene in the government securities market to add reserves
via two to 2.5 billion dlrs of customer repurchase agreements,
economists said.
    Economists said the Fed will inject temporary reserves
indirectly to offset pressure on the Federal funds rate
associated with quarterly corporate tax payments to the
Treasury department.
    Fed funds opened at 6-1/4 pct and remained at that level
late this morning. Friday funds averaged 6.05 pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5412>
The Bank of Spain is relaxing exchange
controls to help put Spanish banks on an equal footing with
European Community competitors by the 1993 deadline for the
ending of restrictions, a central bank spokesman said.
    "The measures to take effect by June were designed to lift
restrictions on foreign currency operations, in line with
deregulation in the banking industry," he said in a telephone
interview.
    The spokesman said the relaxation of exchange controls
highlighted a broader package of reforms announced last Friday.
    The central bank said in a statement the measures included
increased provisions for high-risk borrowers and a provision
for future pension fund obligations.
    It said the measures were the latest steps to deregulate
Spain's financial sector, a move triggered by entry into the
Community last year.
    Spain has five years to complete bank deregulation, a
process that began in 1978 when the government allowed foreign
banks to open branches.
    Since then 39 foreign banks have come into the market and
they now control about 15 pct of the system's lending assets.
    Residents in Spain can now borrow freely in foreign
currency up to the equivalent of 1.5 billion pesetas against a
previous ceiling of 750 mln pesetas.
    The 750 mln peseta limit was set last March. Between that
date and the end of last year some 430 mln dlrs flowed into the
country on new foreign currency loans.
    The central bank spokesman said operations over 1.5 billion
pesetas were technically subject to authorisation, but would be
given clearance if the government failed to act in 15 days.
    Spanish banks will also be allowed to expand their foreign
currency funding, formerly obtainable through deposits, by
issuing certificates of deposit, bonds and commercial paper.
    They can also employ these funds to invest in foreign
issues, while before they had to be converted into deposits.
    Foreign exchange operations can be in mixed currencies,
instead of having to borrow and lend in the same currency.
    The central bank has also lifted the restriction on the
amount of foreign exchange loans, which previously were limited
to three times a bank's capital equity.
    The latest deregulation measures were welcomed by most
bankers, in contrast to rulings issued earlier this month which
imposed a 19 pct reserve requirement on new convertible peseta
funds held by banks and freed short term deposit rates.
    The reserve requirement, which was already in place on
normal peseta deposits, was intended to curb short-term foreign
speculative capital which is entering the country and
threatening the government's money supply growth target.
    A foreign banker said high reserve requirements, which now
account for about 30 pct of deposits, placed Spanish banks at a
disadvantage with European competitors.
    The government reduced fixed asset investment requirements
to 11 pct from 23 pct to help offset the negative impact of
interest rate deregulation. "The real problem is the freeing of
interest rates," the banker said. "This is going to take a big
bite out of profits."
    The ruling lifted a six pct ceiling on interest rates paid
on deposits of up to 180 days.
    The chairman of one of Spain's leading banks said the
measure was expected to bring a 20 pct drop in profits this
year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5439>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange three-day System
repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said that Federal funds were trading at 6-1/4 pct
when the Fed began its temporary and direct supply of reserves
to the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5778>
Underlying dollar sentiment is bearish,
and operators may push the currency to a new low unless Japan
takes steps to stimulate its economy as pledged in the Paris
accord, foreign exchange analysts polled by Reuters said here.
    "The dollar is expected to try its psychological barrier of
150.00 yen and to fall even below that level," a senior dealer
at one leading bank said.
    The dollar has eased this week, but remains stable at
around 151.50 yen. Six major industrial countries agreed at a
meeting in Paris in February to foster currency stability.
    Some dealers said the dollar may decline in the long term,
but a drastic fall is unlikely because of U.S. Fears of renewed
inflation and fears of reduced Japanese purchases of U.S.
Treasury securities, needed to finance the U.S. Deficit.
    Dealers generally doubted whether any economic package
Japan could adopt soon would be effective enough to reduce its
trade surplus significantly, and said such measures would
probably invite further U.S. Steps to weaken the dollar.
    Under the Paris accord, Tokyo promised a package of
measures after the fiscal 1987 budget was passed to boost
domestic demand, increase imports and cut its trade surplus.
    But debate on the budget has been delayed by an opposition
boycott of Parliamentary business over the proposed imposition
of a five pct sales tax, and the government has only a slim
chance of producing a meaningful economic package in the near
future, the dealers said.
    If no such steps are taken, protectionist sentiment in the
U.S. Congress will grow, putting greater downward pressure on
the dollar, they said.
    The factors affecting the U.S. Currency have not changed
since before the Paris accord, they added.
    "Underlying sentiment for the dollar remains bearish due to
a still-sluggish U.S. Economic outlook, the international debt
crisis triggered by Brazil's unilateral suspension of interest
payments on its foreign debts and the reduced clout of the
Reagan administration as a result of the Iran/Contra arms
scandal," said a senior dealer at a leading trust bank.
    "There is a possibility that the dollar may decline to
around 140.00 yen by the end of this year," said Chemical Bank
Tokyo branch vice president Yukuo Takahashi.
    But operators find it hard to push the dollar either way
for fear of possible concerted central bank intervention.
    Dealers said there were widespread rumours that the U.S.
Federal Reserve telephoned some banks in New York to ask for
quotes last Wednesday, and even intervened to sell the dollar
when it rose to 1.87 marks.
    The Bank of England also apparently sold sterling in London
when it neared 1.60 dlrs on Wednesday, they said.
    But other dealers said they doubted the efficacy of central
bank intervention, saying it may stimulate the dollar's decline
because many dealers are likely to await such dollar buying
intervention as a chance to sell dollars.
    However, First National Bank of Chicago Tokyo Branch
assistant manager Hiroshi Mochizuki said "The dollar will not
show drastic movement at least to the end of March."
    Other dealers said the U.S. Seems unwilling to see any
strong dollar swing until Japanese companies close their books
for the fiscal year ending on March 31, because a weak dollar
would give Japanese institutional investors paper losses on
their foreign holdings, which could make them lose interest in
purchases of U.S. Treasury securities.
    U.S. Monetary officials may refrain from making any
comments this month to avoid influencing rates, they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5779>
The Australian dollar rose more than 40
points and money market interest rates retreated on the better
than expected improvement in the February current account
deficit, but economists and dealers were cautious about
identifying it as the start of a downward trend.
    The current account deficit narrowed to 750 mln dlrs in
February from 1.23 billion in January. It hit 13.82 billion
dlrs in 1985/86 to end-June.
    The currency jumped to 0.6858/63 U.S. Dlrs and traded as
high as 0.6875 before retreating to around 0.6864/69.
    "It's got 69 cents written all over it," one dealer said.
    Foreign exchange dealers said some buyers had gone long on
the dollar expecting a lower figure and sold it down about 30
points to 0.6820 U.S. Dlrs before the release.
    The 750 mln dlr deficit was at the lower end of forecasts
and analysts said the market would welcome any figure below one
billion dlrs for March.
    Banque National de Paris &lt;BNPP.A> senior dealer Peter
Nicolls cautioned that in the long term the currency and
interest rates were too high for import substitution and export
industries.
    Nicolls said he expected the dollar to go as high as 0.6875
and perhaps to 69 cents tomorrow.
    &lt;Lloyds Bank NZA Ltd> chief economist Will Buttrose said
the 42 mln dlr trade surplus was encouraging as were imports at
2.77 billion dlrs, down from 2.99 billion in January.
    But he warned that the outlook for rural and iron and coal
exports remained poor. "We should remember we are paying
something like seven to eight billion dollars simply to service
our foreign debt and that is not going to go away in the near
term," Buttrose said.
    Buttrose said he expected a March deficit of around 900 mln
dlrs, and added "Any figure under a billion dollars will be
acceptable (to the markets)."
    ANZ Banking Group Ltd &lt;ANZA.S> senior economist Ian Little
said the big question was whether the improvement in exports
could be sustained. February FOB exports rose to 2.82 billion
dlrs from a revised 2.74 billion in January.
    Interest rates responded quickly to the deficit news, with
90-day bank bill yields falling to 16.42-16.45 pct from early
highs of 16.50 and yields yesterday as high as 16.65.
    Longer term yields fell with 10-year bonds at 13.66/68 pct
from 13.74 before the release and highs of 13.87 yesterday.
    The stock market was easier at midsession but brokers said
the current account data had little impact on trading.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5811>
Spot volume in the Australian foreign
exchange market jumped to a record 22.63 billion dlrs a day in
January from 16.18 billion in December and 8.27 billion a year
earlier, the Reserve Bank said in its monthly bulletin.
    The previous record was 17.51 billion dlrs last August.
    The peak broke a steady trading trend of 15 to 17 billion
dlrs a day seen in the second half of 1986.
    Including forward deals, total deliverable volume was 27.01
billion dlrs a day (13.43 billion against the Australian
dollar) against 19.56 billion (8.48 billion) in December and
9.92 billion (5.88 billion) a year earlier, the bank said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5819>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
shortage of around 450 mln stg in the money market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
some 650 mln stg while banker's balances below target will take
out around 50 mln stg.
    Partly offsetting these outflows, exchequer transactions
and a fall in note circulation will add some 200 mln stg and 50
mln stg to the system respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5841>
Taiwan's central bank is considering
proposals to ease currency restrictions to reduce foreign
exchange reserves of 51 billion U.S. Dlrs, a local newspaper
reported today.
    The China Times, which has close ties with the government,
quoted central bank governor Chang Chi-cheng as saying the
government had agreed in principle to liberalise financial
restrictions.
    The bank was considering proposals to allow firms and
individuals to hold foreign exchange and invest in foreign
stocks for the first time, Chang was quoted as saying.
    All foreign exchange must now be handed to local banks and
exchanged for local currency. Firms and individuals may only
invest in foreign government bonds, treasury bills and
certificates of deposit.
    Central bank and other government officials were not
available to comment on the report.
    Economists said it was likely that the government would
ease foreign exchange controls, but only gradually.
    They said vast foreign currency reserves, earned mainly
from huge trade surpluses with the United States, made Taiwan a
target for U.S. Protectionism.
    Taiwan's trade surplus with the U.S. Rose to 13.6 billion
U.S. Dlrs last year compared with 10.2 billion in 1985.
    "The central bank has to go in this direction," said Su
Han-min, chief economist with the International Commercial Bank
of China. "If they don't quicken the pace, Washington could
retaliate and really damage Taiwan."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5858>
Underlying dollar sentiment is bearish,
and operators may push the currency to a new low unless Japan
takes steps to stimulate its economy as pledged in the Paris
accord, foreign exchange analysts polled by Reuters said here.
    "The dollar is expected to try its psychological barrier of
150.00 yen and to fall even below that level," a senior dealer
at one leading bank said.
    The dollar has eased this week, but remains stable at
around 151.50 yen. Six major industrial countries agreed at a
meeting in Paris in February to foster currency stability.
    Some dealers said the dollar may decline in the long term,
but a drastic fall is unlikely because of U.S. Fears of renewed
inflation and fears of reduced Japanese purchases of U.S.
Treasury securities, needed to finance the U.S. Deficit.
    Dealers generally doubted whether any economic package
Japan could adopt soon would be effective enough to reduce its
trade surplus significantly, and said such measures would
probably invite further U.S. Steps to weaken the dollar.
    Under the Paris accord, Tokyo promised a package of
measures after the fiscal 1987 budget was passed to boost
domestic demand, increase imports and cut its trade surplus.
    But debate on the budget has been delayed by an opposition
boycott of Parliamentary business over the proposed imposition
of a five pct sales tax, and the government has only a slim
chance of producing a meaningful economic package in the near
future, the dealers said.
    If no such steps are taken, protectionist sentiment in the
U.S. Congress will grow, putting greater downward pressure on
the dollar, they said.
    The factors affecting the U.S. Currency have not changed
since before the Paris accord, they added.
    "Underlying sentiment for the dollar remains bearish due to
a still-sluggish U.S. Economic outlook, the international debt
crisis triggered by Brazil's unilateral suspension of interest
payments on its foreign debts and the reduced clout of the
Reagan administration as a result of the Iran/Contra arms
scandal," said a senior dealer at a leading trust bank.
    "There is a possibility that the dollar may decline to
around 140.00 yen by the end of this year," said Chemical Bank
Tokyo branch vice president Yukuo Takahashi.
    But operators find it hard to push the dollar either way
for fear of possible concerted central bank intervention.
    Dealers said there were widespread rumours that the U.S.
Federal Reserve telephoned some banks in New York to ask for
quotes last Wednesday, and even intervened to sell the dollar
when it rose to 1.87 marks.
    The Bank of England also apparently sold sterling in London
when it neared 1.60 dlrs on Wednesday, they said.
    But other dealers said they doubted the efficacy of central
bank intervention, saying it may stimulate the dollar's decline
because many dealers are likely to await such dollar buying
intervention as a chance to sell dollars.
    However, First National Bank of Chicago Tokyo Branch
assistant manager Hiroshi Mochizuki said "The dollar will not
show drastic movement at least to the end of March."
    Other dealers said the U.S. Seems unwilling to see any
strong dollar swing until Japanese companies close their books
for the fiscal year ending on March 31, because a weak dollar
would give Japanese institutional investors paper losses on
their foreign holdings, which could make them lose interest in
purchases of U.S. Treasury securities.
    U.S. Monetary officials may refrain from making any
comments this month to avoid influencing rates, they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5861>
The Bank of England said it did not
operate in the money market in the morning session.
    Earlier, the central bank had estimated the deficit in the
system today at some 450 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5905>
The Bank of England said it had revised
its forecast of the shortage in the money market today down to
400 mln stg from 450 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5909>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with 16 mln stg help in the afternoon session.
    The Bank did not operate in the market in the morning and
earlier revised its estimate of the shortage in the system
today down to 400 mln stg from 450 mln.
    The central bank purchased bills outright in band one at
10-3/8 pct comprising two mln stg of local authority bills and
14 mln stg of bank bills.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5945>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with late assistance of around 120 mln stg.
    This brings the bank's total help today to some 136 mln stg
and compares with its forecast of a 400 mln stg shortage in the
system.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5998>
There is a slightly better than even
chance that the Federal Reserve will enter the U.S. Government
securities market to add temporary reserves, economists said.
    They said the Fed would supply the reserves indirectly via
around 1.5 billion dlrs of customer repurchase agreements.
    Federal funds, which averaged 6.25 pct yesterday, opened at
6-1/16 pct and moved in a narrow range between there and six
pct in early trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6046>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange two billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-1/16 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6083>
Zambia will reintroduce a modified
foreign exchange auction at the end of this month as part of a
new two-tier exchange rate, central bank governor Leonard
Chivuno said.
    Chivuno told a press conference at the end of three weeks
of negotiations with the International Monetary Fund (IMF) that
there would be a fixed exchange rate for official transactions
and a fluctuating rate, decided by the auction, for other types
of business.
    The Bank of Zambia previously held weekly auctions to
distribute foreign exchange to the private sector and determine
the kwacha's exchange rate, but these were suspended at the end
of January.
    President Kenneth Kaunda said at the time that he was
suspending the auction system in view of the rapid devaluation
and violent fluctations of the exchange rate which had
resulted.
    Business and banking sources said another reason for
suspending the auction was that the central bank was low on
foreign exchange and was 10 weeks behind in paying successful
bidders.    The kwacha stood at 2.2 per dollar when the auction system
was first introduced in October 1985, but it slid to around 15
per dollar by the time it was suspended 16 months later.
    Since then, Zambia has operated a fixed exchange rate of
about nine kwacha per dollar.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6108>
The dollar is near appropriate levels
against European currencies and the yen, and a further fall
could damage confidence in the currency while endangering world
economic growth, a top Bundesbank official said.
    Board member Leonhard Gleske also told a Forex Association
conference current exchange rates of major currencies "can be
viewed as equilibrium levels in a medium-term perspective."
    He said the recent Paris agreement on currency
stabilisation and policy coordination between the Group of Five
and Canada may herald "an era of greater exchange rate
stability."
    The Paris agreement was not, however, an attempt to set up
permanent target zones for exchange rates, Gleske stressed,
adding such targets would be extremely difficult to agree and
enforce on an international level.
    "At present levels the dollar can no longer be considered
grossly overvalued in relation to the European currencies and
the yen," Gleske said.
    He said the dollar had fallen much less against currencies
of important trading nations such as Canada, Korea, Taiwan and
Hong Kong, and further falls there may still be necessary.
    But "a further dollar depreciation against major European
currencies and the yen may not be the best way to restore the
dollar to a fully competitive position, as measured by its
weighted external value," he said.
   In fact, a further marked decline in the dollar rate would
hold two major dangers, Gleske said.
    First, in countries with large balance of payments
surpluses such as Japan and West Germany, it threatened to
hamper economic growth and thus slow down the expansion of real
income and domestic expenditure necessary to wipe out
surpluses.
    Second, in the United States, it could damage investors'
confidence in the dollar and thus reduce their willingness to
finance huge fiscal and external payments deficits, Gleske
said.
    Gleske also was strongly sceptical that an international
system of binding target zones for currencies, fluctuating in
narrow bands against each other, can be established. Such
targets threatened to cause policy conflicts, "both within
countries and between them."
    For instance, the U.S. Reliance on foreign capital to fund
its deficits requires interest rates there be set at high
levels, but domestic considerations call for low ones.
    If target zones were established, this would put "pressure
on other countries to reduce their interest rates even more,
even though this may be in conflict with their own domestic
situation and priorities," he said.
    Gleske added, "targeting the exchange rate even within a
wide margin will meet with serious objections where there is a
clearly perceived potential for conflict between domestic and
external policy priorities."
    Commenting on the Paris currency accord, Gleske said its
chances of stabilising exchange rates rested heavily on current
interest rate differentials being maintained.
    These chances "seem to me to rest critically on the
expectation that the current configuration of interest rates,
and the monetary policies behind them, will assure smooth
financing of current account imbalances in the months ahead."
    Gleske said past experience of currency adjustments had
learned "that markets are inclined to be impatient and will thus
tend to overshoot." He said this "would seem to be unnecessary
and should be avoided if at all possible."
    Monetary policies can help achieve this, but only if
markets believe that pledged changes in fiscal policies will
lead to balanced international payments, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6137>
Finance and economy ministers of the
Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) opened a two- day meeting to
discuss further economic integration, officials said.
    They said issues to be discussed by the ministers from
Bahrain, Kuwait, Oman, Qatar, Saudi Arabia and the United Arab
Emirates (UAE) would include a recommendation by central bank
governors on a common currency exchange rate.
    The governors agreed in January on a denominator on which
to base currencies of the six states. Any decision will be
forwarded for final approval to a GCC summit meeting due in
Saudi Arabia late this year.
    The six states have different currency systems. Saudi
Arabia, Bahrain, Qatar and the UAE are linked in theory to the
International Monetary Fund's basket of currencies -- the
special drawing right (SDR) -- but in practice to the dollar.
    Oman links its currency formally to the dollar, while
Kuwait pegs its dinar to a trade-weighted basket devised by
itself.
    The denominator chosen by central bank governors has not
been disclosed, but some bankers expect the currencies to be
linked to the SDR or a trade-weighted basket.
    Opening the meeting, Ahmed al-Tayer, the UAE's Minister of
State for Finance and Industry, said implementation of joint
economic agreements "is increasingly linking the interests of
GCC citizens together."
    The general assembly of the Gulf Investment Corporation met
in Abu Dhabi earlier under the chairmanship of Bahrain's
Finance and National Economy Minister, Ibrahim Abdul-Karim
    The corporation was formed to contribute to joint economic
and investment projects in the GCC.
    Officials said the corporation's assets rose to 1.31
billion dollars last year from 1.04 billion at the end of 1985.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6338>
"Endaka," the strong yen, has usurped
"Godzilla Versus the Sea Monster" as Japan's favourite horror
story.
    The yen's 40 pct surge against the dollar over the last two
years has frightened foreigners with tales of the 40 dlr melon,
the 120 dlr taxi ride from the airport and rents of 15,000 dlrs
a month.
    But "endaka," like many Japanese products, is for foreign
consumption, locals and long-time foreign residents said.
    "It's not really that expensive. I don't pay attention to
the cost of living," said Cheryl Richmond, a 25-year-old
Canadian teacher of English in Tokyo.
    Richmond said she earns 1,635 dlrs a month by "chatting" 40
hours a week in English to Japanese who hope to learn the
language. For 326 dlrs a month she rents a sunny, quiet
two-room flat some 20 minutes by train from Shinjuku, one of
Tokyo's prime business and entertainment districts, and has
managed to send home an average of 320 dlrs a month.
    She spends less than 6.50 dlrs a day on food despite eating
out once a day.
    "For lunch I buy the teishoku (daily special) which comes
with soba (buckwheat noodles) or pork cutlet, pickles, miso
soup, rice and tea," although she takes only coffee for
breakfast and a sandwich for dinner.
    No one argues that Tokyo is cheap, but long-time residents
see no need to spend the 2,000 to 15,000 dlrs a month spent by
foreign firms to house executives in Western-style homes.
    The companies feel otherwise. They say they must pay the
price to bring over the best people needed to back up their
push into Japan's increasingly lucrative markets.
    "You can't expect people to move from New York or Sydney and
trade down. It's not reasonable," said a spokesman for
International Business Machines Corp (IBM), which supports
Western lifestyles for more than 350 foreigners in Tokyo.
    Tokyo is the world's most expensive city for business
travellers, a survey issued this month by Employment Conditions
Abroad said. It found that businessmen visiting Tokyo spend on
average more than 300 dlrs a day.
    While the businessmen have little choice but to come here,
many tourists, especially those from Europe, are opting to
visit sunnier and cheaper climes in Southeast Asia.
    The Japan Tourist Bureau estimates "endaka" caused an 11.5
pct drop in the number of foreign visitors to Japan last year.
    Those who came tried to cut back on expenses, chiefly by
curtailing shopping, it said.
    To help combat "endaka" and the slump in tourism, the Tourist
Bureau prepared a pamphlet, "Economical Travel in Japan."
    It gives budget-saving tips on finding medium-priced
business hotels and Japanese-style inns, cheap sushi and public
baths while getting a "revealing glimpse of Japanese in their
daily lives."
    Residents of Okubo House, a transit hotel in Tokyo's
Shin-Okubo love hotel district, offer even more savvy advice.
    For 9.80 dlrs a night, Scott Perry, a 23-year-old budding
English teacher from New Zealand, shares an unheated,
berth-sized twin-room in the Japanese "flop house."
    Perry has budgeted 26 to 33 dlrs a day while he looks for
work. "Normally I eat 'teishoku' for 400 yen but sometimes I'll
splurge at Shakey's where for 550 yen you can eat unlimited
pizza for at least two hours."
    Still, there are the extras that dent the budget. "I had to
spend 600 yen today to dry-clean my suit coat," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6357>
Global trading of yen bond futures is
just around the corner and they are expected to be listed soon
on the London International Financial Futures Exchange (LIFFE)
and the Chicago Board of Trade (CBOT), bond managers said.
    "Internationalisation of the yen through expansion of
overseas portfolios in yen assets is the key to the success of
global trading of yen bond futures," said Katsuyuki Okayasu,
general manager of Yamaichi Securities Co Ltd's bond division.
    "But Tokyo-based orders are necessary for a primary stimulus
for the LIFFE yen bond futures market," said Tetsuya Dezuka,
deputy general manager of the money market section of New Japan
Securities Co Ltd, one of the most active yen bond brokers in
London.
    Healthy growth of yen bond futures markets depends
basically on substantial liquidity in cash yen bond markets
overseas and on the yen becoming attractive to traders there,
dealers said.
    Outstanding yen cash bonds worldwide stand at around
140,000 billion yen, with most held in Japan, they said.
    An agreement between CBOT and LIFFE in early February on
mutual settlements is expected to link U.S. Treasury bond
futures trading in London and Chicago, enabling a continuous
12-hour session, bond managers here said, adding the move was
made with yen bond futures trading in mind.
    LIFFE is preparing for an early listing of yen bond futures
after receiving approval from Japan's Finance Ministry last
December.
    But futures markets will never take root unless they are
backed by substantial liquidity in cash bond markets, dealers
said.
    Daily transactions in the London yen cash bond market now
stand at 200 to 300 billion yen, but the extent of investor-
linked transactions is unknown, securities bond managers said.
    "Japanese corporations have been actively setting up their
financing companies in London, suggesting they increasingly are
engaging in, not only fund raising, but management there,"
Dezuka said.
    The steep increase in the number of branches of Japanese
securities houses in London and the growing numbers of U.S. And
U.K. Brokers coming to Tokyo has helped the London market's
growth, dealers said.
    Internationalisation of the yen is also likely to be
promoted by yen bond trading in Chicago and New York later this
year, securities managers said.
    The recent removal of a key regulatory obstacle by the U.S.
Securities and Exchange Commission will allow the CBOT to apply
to the Commodity Futures Trading Commission for a yen bond
futures contract, they said.
    The ruling removed a regulation which prohibited trading
futures of designated foreign government debt securities not
located in the issuing country.
    Fundamental Brokers Inc, a major U.S. Brokers' broker, has
decided to launch yen bond broking on its display system in New
York as early as April.
    CBOT's start of an evening session, planned for the end of
April, will also multiply yen bond futures trading, a Nomura
Securities Co Ltd bond manager said. But there are still
obstacles to trading on the London market.
    "Problems concerning cash bond delivery and clearing are
major obstacles for an early launching at LIFFE," said Koki
Chiyojima, deputy general manager of Nikko Securities Co Ltd's
bond administration division.
    Nikko Securities Co Ltd, one of the big four Japanese
securities houses, is responsible for corresponding with LIFFE
on these matters.
    Japan's Finance Ministry will start issuing bonds with
coupon payment of either March and September, or June and
December from April 1, matching futures delivery months.
    The ministry now pays coupons in January, June, July and
December. When delivery months and coupon payments do not
match, a 20 pct withholding tax is imposed on interest earned
by non-resident bond holders, a deterrent to LIFFE, securities
managers said.
    LIFFE is likely to wait until the outstanding amount of
bonds with matching months increases to over several billion
yen, bond managers said.
    These bonds will be used for deliveries, as they are
expected to be the cheapest deliverable issues due to low
interest rates, they said.
    Market participants here expect a clearing organisation to
be set up by the time they have substantial deliverable cash
issues, making overseas listings probable in the latter half of
1987.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6359>
The Bank of England said it had invited
an early round of bill offers from the discount houses after
forecasting a shortage in the system of around 1.1 billion stg.
    Money market dealers speculated that the central bank could
be taking the opportunity to signal a reduction in U.K. Base
lending rates by cutting the rates at which it intervenes in
the discount market.
    Most operators are expecting a base rate cut today,
possibly of one point, following yesterday's budget in which
the U.K. Public sector borrowing target for 1987/88 was slashed
by three billion stg.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
some 1.11 billion stg while a rise in note circulation and
bankers' balances below target will take out around 120 mln stg
and 20 mln stg respectively.
    Partly offsetting these outflows, exchequer transactions
will add some 140 mln stg to the system today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6399>
The Bank of England said it revised up
its estimate of the deficit in the system today to 1.3 billion
stg from 1.1 billion.
    The Bank has not provided any assistance to the market so
far today but earlier invited the discount houses to use their
borrowing facilities at 1430 GMT today and set the terms at 10
pct for 14 days.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6400>
Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson
said he was content with the current level of sterling and
welcomed today's announcement of a further half point cut in
British bank base lending rates to 10 pct.
    However, he said he wanted to see a gradual approach to
declines in domestic U.K. Interest rates, although optimism in
financial markets might push for big moves quickly.
    He told a briefing of economic journalists that "I don't
think we should rush anything." Lawson stressed the themes of
"gradualism and steadiness" as economic policy.
    Lawson acknowledged that today's fall in interest rates
were in response to his budget for fiscal 1987/88, unveiled
yesterday to Parliament and which set a lower target for the
key Public Sector Borrowing Requirement (PSBR) of 1.0 pct of
GDP.
    Lawson said the two recent cuts in base rates, both made
this month in the form of half percentage point declines, were
"perfectly consistent" with monetary conditions now in Britain.
    He supported that by saying the narrow M0 money supply
aggregate was "safely inside" its flucuation band of two to six
pct set for both 1986/87 and 1987/88. In his budget, Lawson set
no explicit target range for the broader sterling M3.
    Turning to the question of Britain eventually joining the
exchange rate mechanism of the European Monetary System (EMS),
Lawson repeated that "it is most unlikely we will enter before
the next election."
    He said Britain was keeping the subject of full EMS
membership under constant review. But he would not indicate
what the chief considerations for this were for the government.
    Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher late last year said a
decision on whether or not to join depended on the strength of
the U.K. Economy. But she later said such a move depended on
other EMS countries scrapping residual capital controls.
    Although Lawson denounced what he said was "the current wave
of election fever" in Britain, he added:  "It is more likely that
there will be an election this year" than not.
    He said he supported an early election only because it
would clear the air. "Ideally, we (the government) should have a
full term," but events could force a premature poll, Lawson
said.
    The government, which has been in power since 1979, must
call an election by June 1988. Speculation is rising for either
a June or an early autumn election, political sources said.
    The decision to cut basic tax by only two pence in 1987/88
"was the right balance, economically and politically," he said.
    Lawson's decision to restrict the fall in the standard rate
of tax to two-pence surprised many analysts, who had predicted
that with Treasurys coffers full of tax revenue would have
allowed the government to reach its goal of 25 pct in one move.
    But it was being praised today by political analysts as a
shrewd move which, while advancing towards that aim, could not
be seized upon by opposition parties as overtly trying to bribe
the electorate.
    Lawson told journalists he had been surprised by how much
the PSBR had undershot his original assumption of 7.1 billion
stg for 1986/87 -- by some three billion stg.
    Returning to changing levels of interest rates, Lawson
stressed that "they are not an objective (for the government) -
they are an instrument of policy." Consequently the Treasury had
no precise target for domestic borrowing levels, he said.
    But "there may be interest rate consequences" from changes in
the level of government borrowing, he added.
    Lawson said he did not think that the U.K.'s relatively
high level of real interest rates had hurt investment in
Britain.
    He said conditions created by London's role as a leading
financial centre had caused sterling interest rates to be
higher in real terms than in other countries.
    Three factors had caused the higher level in relative
interest rates in Britain, Lawson said.
    First, control of credit in Britain rested on interest
rates alone, due to the freedom of its financial markets.
    He said the second reason was political uncertainty caused
by proposed spending plans of the opposition Labour Party.
     Thirdly, he said "we do not have as long a track record of
low inflation" as did the U.S., Japan and West Germany.
    Lawson foresaw London becoming the world's pre-eminent
financial centre, because it was more international in
character and more favourably placed in time zones than New
York or Tokyo.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6426>
The Bundesbank is likely to steer a
steady monetary course over the next few weeks and a change in
credit policies is not expected at tomorrow's regular central
bank council meeting, bank economists and dealers said.
    "There is no need for action," Hermann Remsperger, chief
economist of Berliner Handels- and Frankfurter Bank (BHF) said.
    Others noted that exchange rates are stable after last
month's Group of Six agreement in Paris and central bank money
stock growth is still well above the three to six pct target
zone, so a change in credit policies could be ruled out.
    One money market dealer said comments by Bundesbank
President Karl Otto Poehl at a private seminar in Duesseldorf
two weeks ago hinting at another interest rate cut only
indicated the Bundesbank might act if conditions changed.
    Bank economists said U.S. Pressure on West Germany to
further ease credit policies had receded since the Paris pact.
    But such demands could re-emerge if West Germany failed to
stimulate its economy enough to affect the massive U.S. Trade
deficit.
    Remsperger said continued strong money supply growth also
precluded a further cut in official interest rates.
    Central bank money stock was growing at an annualized 7.5
pct in February, unchanged from the 7.5 pct in January.
    Economists said some of the 18 members of the central bank
council were worried about the continued overshoot in the money
supply target and were bound to resist any moves to cut rates.
But Poehl played down the risk of inflation.
    Economists said the fact that money stock growth remained
stable last month was a success. Some said it was likely to
return to within the target range later this year.
    "The special factors which boosted money supply growth last
year are disappearing," one economist said.
    He said some 75 pct of the money supply increase in 1986
was caused by a sharp rise in the inflow of foreign funds.
    This trend had been reversed recently and with domestic
credit demand likely to remain at steady levels, money stock
growth was expected to narrow in the medium-term.
    These developments were increasing the Bundesbank's scope
for a rate cut in the medium-term, economists said.
    Money market dealers said period rates remained little
changed, indicating no change in credit policy was expected.
    Call money rates declined to 3.75/80 pct from 3.90/95
yesterday, with the market well stocked with liquidity.
    Dealers said call money was soft because tax payments on
behalf of customers had been less than expected so far. But
rates were likely to tighten again as soon as the full effect
of this month's major tax payment period is felt. Payments for
the federal railways bond are also likely to burden the market.
    The Bundesbank did not inject liquidity via a securities
repurchase agreement this week, but countered a tightening in
rates on Monday by injecting funds through government-owned
banks.
    Dealers said recent securities repurchase pacts had shown
the Bundesbank clearly wanted call money rates stable at 3.80.
    One dealer said, "If the central bank wanted lower interest
rates, it would first of all drive call money rates down."
    Banks remained relatively well stocked with minimum reserve
assets. They held 52.9 billion marks in minimum reserves on
Monday, averaging 53.7 billion marks over the first 16 days of
March. A requirement of around 51 billion is expected.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6445>
Bankers Trust International Ltd said it
is issuing 200,000 stg call/dlr put currency warrants at an
initial offer price of 31.25 dlrs per warrant.
    The issue is guaranteed by Bankers Trust New York Corp.
    Each warrant entitles the holder to exchange 500 dlrs for
stg at a rate of 1.60 stg/dlr and the minimum number of
warrants exercisable or tradeable is 100.
    Exercise period for the warrants will run from April 22,
1987 until March 17, 1989. Payment is due April 15, 1987.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6452>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with a further 15 mln stg assistance. This
brings the Bank's total help so far today to 344 mln stg and
compares with the estimated shortage of around 1.3 billion stg.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright, at the
lower dealing rates established this morning, comprising one
mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct and 14 mln stg in band two at
9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6531>
Today's modest half-point cut in U.K.
Bank base lending rates to 10 pct signals the Bank of England's
determination to maintain a cautious monetary stance, but
financial markets appear set to force its hand, analysts said.
    They said a further half-point cut in base rates to 9-1/2
pct was bound to occur within the next week and rates may shed
a further half point soon if markets remain buoyant.
    Earlier, markets were bracing for a one-point cut in rates
after yesterday's budget set a sharp three billion stg
reduction in 1987 government borrowing targets to four billion
stg.
    Sterling money market rates moved lower again, with the key
three-month interbank rate down to 9-5/8 1/2 pct at the start
of business from 9-11/16 9/16 yesterday, and sterling rallied
to four-year highs against the dollar in very active trading.
    Government bond prices also surged on the budget, with
gains in excess of one point pushing yields on long-term paper
below nine pct for the first time in nearly a year.
    But today's smaller than expected rate cut appeared to have
placated markets for now, analysts said. Money market rates
recovered up to 1/4 point from earlier lows while both sterling
and gilts came off highs as trading ground to a near halt.
    Analysts said the slowdown was likely to be temporary, and
the reappraisal of sterling assets by international investors
was set to resume as early as tomorrow, leading to higher gilt
prices, exchange rate advances and lower money market rates.
    "Today's cut was slightly disappointing," said Bill Martin,
chief U.K. Economist at stockbrokers Phillips and Drew. "The
Bank of England is taking a very cautious line ... To temper
the markets' first rush of blood to the head after the budget."
    Analysts said the bank's move today to lend two-week cash
to U.K. Discount houses at a lower 10 pct suggested it hoped to
maintain the new rates for about that period of time.
    The analysts agreed success would depend largely on how
sterling performs in the near term.
    Sharp rises in the pound's value could be checked initially
through Bank of England intervention but eventually the gains
would force the bank to cut interest rates rates again.
    "The market seems to have accepted the modest cut for the
time being," said Midland Bank treasury economist David
Simmonds. "But I am sceptical that the bank will be able to hold
up rates for long."
    Simmonds said he saw sterling rising another two U.S. Cents
this week from around 1.60 dlrs, forcing a rate cut by Friday.
    Robin Marshall, chief economist at Chase Manhattan
Securities, said "There is another half point to come in the
near term, this week or next week at the latest...We see a
whole point off base rates in the next two or three weeks."
    Analysts stressed that apart from prestige, Britain had
very little to gain from a sharp rise in sterling's exchange
rate.
    Martin, of Phillips and Drew, said the dampening effect of
a sterling rise on consumer price inflation would not
materialise for at least nine months while its hampering impact
on manufactured exports would show almost immediately.
    Analysts said the budget, featuring income tax cuts as well
as cautious plans for public finances, had improved the chances
of re-election for the Conservative government and probably
advanced the election date. One must be held before June, 1988.
Combined with overall good prospects for the U.K. Economy, this
was likely to fuel a foreign rush on sterling-denominated
assets, pushing the pound's value well above unofficial
targets.
    With mark-denominated investments largely out of favour
because of low yields and a dull economic outlook, Chase's
Marshall said "Sterling is simply the best game in town,
especially after the budget, and demand will remain strong."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6543>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
enter the U.S. Government securities market to add temporary
reserves indirectly via 1.5 billion dlrs or more of customer
repurchase agreements, economists said.
    They said the below-six pct Federal funds rate suggests the
Fed does not have a large reserve adding need. However, some
dealers reportedly backed out of the three-day System
repurchase agreements set on Monday, leaving the Fed with a
somewhat increased need to supply reserves.
    Federal funds, which averaged 6.05 pct yesterday, opened at
5-15/16 pct and remained there in early trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6576>
Finance and economy ministers of the
six-nation Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) have ended talks
after adopting resolutions and recommendations aimed at
boosting economic integration.
    But the ministers from Bahrain, Kuwait, Oman, Qatar, Saudi
Arabia and the United Arab Emirates (UAE) did not endorse a
resolution on a common currency exchange rate system.
    The UAE's Minister of State for Finance and Industry, Ahmed
Humaid al-Tayer, told reporters after the two-day talks that
the ministers referred the issue back to GCC central bank
governors for further discussion.
    He said the governors, who agreed in January on a proposed
denominator on which the six currencies should be based, were
asked to resubmit the recommendation before July, when finance
ministers were due to meet in Saudi Arabia.
    Bankers said the central bank governors would meet soon to
discuss the issue, adding there was a possibility that a new
system could be submitted for final approval to a GCC summit
conference scheduled to be held in Saudi Arabia late this year.
    The denominator approved by the governors has not been made
public, but banking sources said it could be similar to the
European Monetary System (EMS).
    Tayer said the ministers agreed in principle to allow GCC
citizens to set up businesses and work in any member state.
They also agreed in principle on a recommendation for citizens
to buy and own shares of GCC shareholding firms.
    He said the ministers discussed a report on imported goods
containing radiation caused by last year's Chernobyl nuclear
disaster in the Soviet Union, and agreed all products with
excessive levels should be returned to the country of origin.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6945>
Former Prime Minister Robert
Muldoon, an outspoken advocate of a managed float for the N.Z.
Dollar, said the currency is at least 10 pct overvalued.
    Muldoon said in a speech last night the exchange rate
should be around 48 U.S. Cents instead of the current 57 cents.
    "A reasonable value for the New Zealand dollar would be
between 10 and 15 pct less and nearer 15 than 10. Perhaps
around about 48 cents," he said.
    The Labour Party government removed exchange controls and
floated the dollar two years ago when it was worth 44 cents.
    Muldoon has no rank in the opposition National Party, and
party leaders, with an eye to general elections to be held by
September, have rejected his calls for a managed float.
    He said the dollar was high because of "grossly excessive"
interest rates for government stock.
    "I know of no other country which is implementing such a
free floating policy," he added. "There is widespread agreement
internationally that we have no alternative to floating
currencies in the short to medium term. But we need more
effective methods of managing them so as to limit the
volatility which has caused so much concern and damage."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6981>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
shortage of around 450 mln stg in the money market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
some 650 mln stg while a rise in note circulation will take out
around 30 mln stg.
    Partly offsetting these outflows, bankers' balances above
target and exchequer transactions will add some 200 mln stg and
35 mln stg to the system respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7020>
The Bank of England said it revised down
its estimate of the deficit in the system today to 400 mln stg
from 450 mln.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7027>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with 181 mln stg in assistance this morning.
    This compares with the Bank's revised shortage forecast of
around 400 mln stg.
    The central bank purchased bank bills outright at the new
dealing rates established yesterday.
    These comprised 65 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct, 114
mln stg in band two at 9-13/16 pct and two mln stg in band
three at 9-3/4 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7036>
Brisk increases in personal income and
consumption are to appear in February data released today, but
the bond market's recent sluggishness suggests there will be no
major price reaction unless the rises are much larger than
expected, economists said.
    Personal income is forecast to rise by 0.6 to 0.8 pct,
compared with no change in January, while consumption
expenditures are projected to increase 1.4 to 1.6 pct,
reversing most of the two pct drop recorded in January.
    M-1 money supply data for the March 9 week will also be
released. An increase of some 2.3 billion dlrs is expected.    
    Peter Greenbaum of Smith Barney, Harris Upham and Co Inc
expects a one pct rise in income, led by a strong gain in wage
and salary disbursements in February.
    Nonfarm payrolls expanded by 337,000 jobs in February, the
average workweek lengthened by 0.6 pct and hourly wages rose by
four cts, he noted in a report. Vigorous spending on durable
goods last month, especially cars, foreshadow a rise of at
least 1.5 pct in consumption, he added.
    The prospect of bearish data did not trouble the bond
market much yesterday, with the 30-year Treasury bond slipping
just 7/32 to 99-28/32 for a yield of 7.51 pct.
    Analysts said the market is still trapped in a narrow
range, desperately seeking direction.
    "Seasonally adjusted, it's already December in the bond
market," quipped Robert Brusca of Nikko Securities Co
International Inc.
    Paul Boltz of T. Rowe Price Associates Inc said the
steadiness of long bond yields around 7.5 pct, despite some
signs of a stronger economy, probably reflects expectations
that inflation will remain subdued.
    But he warned that this assumption might not be justified.
    "It took the bond market a long while to see that inflation
was not returning to double digits, and now that it has learned
that lesson, it may be a little slow to see that a four to five
pct inflation is a real possibility ahead," Boltz said in a
report.
    After trading late yesterday at 5-15/16 pct, Fed funds were
indicated by brokers to open comfortably at 5-15/16, six pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7043>
The financial rand, widely viewed
as a direct reflection of foreign investor confidence in South
Africa, appears headed above 30 U.S. Cents, dealers and bank
economists said.
    The currency has risen about 25 pct in the past three
months to its current rate of 29.50 cents, due partly to signs
of a possible power shift with the appearance of a number of
independent candidates in the whites-only election on May 6,
they added.
    It has risen about two cents this week alone.
    "Another factor is that banks in London, where the main
market is based, are going long in the currency because of a
general feeling that it will rise in the future," one economist
said.
    Dealers described 30 cents as a psychological barrier that
was expected to be broken soon after a brief consolidation
phase from recent gains.
    After reaching 30 cents, "There is a chance of appreciation
to 32 cents in the next several weeks," one dealer said.
    There was a widespread feeling that both the commercial
rand, holding stable at 48 cents, and the financial rand were
staying firm, banking sources said.
    A Barclays National Bank executive who asked not to be
identified said: "The rise of the independents appears to be
indicative of a potential shift of power in the National Party
and has created a favourable sentiment overseas."
    One dealer said growing business and investor interest from
West Germany and Switzerland were behind the financial rand's
rise.
    Economists said foreigners also were being attracted by
South Africa's long-term government bonds and "semi-gilts" or
securities in partly government-owned firms, many with yields
as high as 30 pct. They could be purchased with financial rands
with interest paid in commercial rands.
    "This has had a definite influence on the financial form of
the rand," a dealer said, adding that at present demand is
slightly in excess of supply.
    The financial rand was reintroduced in September 1985 to
help end capital flight from South Africa during a period of
severe political unrest in the country.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7080>
The Bank of England said it gave the
money market a further 191 mln stg assistance in the afternoon
session. This takes the Bank's total help so far today to 372
mln stg and compares with its upwards revised estimate of the
shortage in the system of around 400 mln stg.
    The central bank bought bank bills outright comprising 15
mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct and 176 mln stg in band two at
9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7100>
The bank of England said it provided the
money market with late assistance of around 40 mln stg. This
brings the Bank's total help today to some 412 mln stg and
compares with its forecast of a shortage in the sytem of around
400 mln stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7159>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
refrain from reserve-management intervention in the U.S.
Government securities market, economists said.
    If the Fed does act, however, they said it would be likely
to add temporary reserves indirectly by arranging around 1.5
billion dlrs of customer repurchase agreements.
    Federal funds, which averaged 5.97 pct yesterday, opened at
six pct and remained there in early trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7207>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange 1.5 billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at six pct when the
Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to the
banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7312>
Federal Reserve Board Vice Chairman
Manuel Johnson said that the U.S.'s main industrial partners
should expand their domestic growth.
    In a speech to a women's group here, Johnson said, "There is
room for stronger domestic growth in those countries ... strong
enough to absorb growth in U.S. export markets."
    Johnson also said there was a better alignment of exchange
rates now and the Paris agreement to stabilize currencies has
brought western nations a long way towards establishing that
goal.
    Johnson said, "The Fed supports this pattern of exchange
rates ... and we'll see if it leads to a convergence in trade.
Quite possibly it can be achieved."
    Johnson said the Paris agreement achieved a better
alignment of exchange rates in exchange for stimulus by the
major surplus countries.
    He said this was "a major improvement and a step in the
right direction" and added U.S. allies look very strongly to a
U.S. budget deficit cut. "There will always be a potential risk
of breakdown in international cooperation" without a budget
deficit cut.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7313>
Slower than expected growth in Britain's
narrow M0 money supply measure in February will help spur a
further cut in U.K. Interest rates if a surge in sterling's
value requires such a move, economic analysts said.
    M0, the only targeted money supply measure left after
Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson scrapped the official
target for the broad sterling M3 measure in his 1987 budget
speech on Tuesday, fell an adjusted 3/4 to one pct in February.
    On an annual basis, this put M0 growth at four to 4-1/2
pct, in the middle of the 1987 target of two to six pct.
    "The M0 data are much better than we expected," said Robert
Thomas, economist at Greenwell Montagu Securities.
    He and other analysts said while the better than expected
M0 figures alone would not be sufficient to trigger a new
interest rate cut, they removed an obstacle to such a move.
    Thomas noted the rise in M0 had been kept in check despite
buoyant retail sales in February, advancing an adjusted 2.2 pct
after a fall of the same size in January.
    Analysts said the M0 measure, reflecting variations in
consumer demand rather than real inflation prospects, was not
an adequate indicator to determine interest rates.
    "The authorities still seem to want to pretend that M0 is
important ... In practice, it is likely to be the exchange rate
and the election which call the tune," Lloyds Merchant bank
chief economist Roger Bootle wrote in a budget comment.
    Richard Jeffrey, economist at stockbrokers Hoare Govett,
said in a comment: "It is unlikely that (Lawson) will respond to
signals from M0 alone ... Reinforcement from exchange rate
trends is necessary before action is taken."
    "With the Chancellor making clear that policy manoeuvres are
made in response to signals from this narrow money variable,
the City has been forced to take it seriously," he added.
    Noting this point, Thomas said market fears at the end of
last year of an M0 overshoot had now disappeared.
    This removed a potential obstacle to a further cut in U.K.
Base lending rates if foreign demand for sterling pushed up the
pound above unofficial targets, analysts said.
    Such targets are believed to have been secretly agreed
between finance ministers of the Group of Five and Canada at
their Paris meeting last month, they added.
  U.K. Base rates have been cut twice by half a point since the
Paris agreement, once on March 11, and again yesterday when
foreign demand for sterling surged in reaction to a sharp cut
in 1987 government borrowing targets contained in the budget.
    They stand at 10 pct now, and foreign exchange dealers and
analysts expect them to shed another half-point in the coming
week.
    Analysts shrugged off as largely irrelevant a higher than
expected increase in February sterling M3, which pushed the
annual growth rate to almost 19 pct, well above the previous
target of 11 to 15 pct.
    Thomas said the February figures seemed to indicate the
improvement in sterling M3 growth witnessed over the past few
months had been reversed, but firm conclusions could only be
drawn after revised data are released on March 31.
    Some analysts said foreign investors had long ceased to
watch the sterling M3 target, and Lawson's move to scrap it
altogether earlier this week removed whatever was left of its
credibility as a key factor in monetary policy.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7375>
Beryl Sprinkel, chairman of
the president's council of economic advisors, said stronger
domestic demand growth in Japan and Western Europe is needed to
help stimulate U.S. exports without having to rely on futher
dollar declines.
    "Stronger domestic demand growth in the major foreign
industrial countries is needed to engender the much needed
expansion of U.S. export markets without having to rely on
further dollar depreciation," he told the Futures Industry
Association.
    Sprinkel said the recent recovery of domestic demand in
Japan and Europe has been one of the weakest in the post-war
period.
    "Stronger domestic demand growth in the major industrial
countries would help give balance to the current world
recovery," he said.
    Asked if Japan was not living up to commitments made last
month to trading partners, he said recent figures showed
Japan's economy grew by about 0.5 pct in the fourth quarter of
1986, "Not enough to sustain employment growth."
    However, Sprinkel said Japan had not reneged on its pledges
and was moving toward more stimulative policies, including tax
reform. "I suspect there will be further moves," he said.
    Sprinkel repeated his call for further cuts in U.S.
government spending and for resistance to tax increases.
    "Reducing the federal government budget deficit by
expenditure restraint is needed to preserve the low marginal
tax rates achieved by tax reform," he said, adding that "a vote
to increase to government expenditures is a vote against tax
reform."
    Sprinkel said the fall of the dollar had substantially
restored U.S. cost competitiveness and that the deterioration
of the U.S. trade balance appeared to have abated.
    However, he said that "sole reliance on dollar depreciation
to reduce our trade deficit is not desirable," as it risks
inflation in the United States and recession abroad.
    "I am confident that further improvements in our trade
performance will contribute significantly to growth in 1987," he
said. Improvements in the U.S. trade balance, he said, will
come about largely from a swing in manufactures trade and
present "serious adjustment problems for U.S. trading partners."
    Western Europe, where manufactures output and employment
have been weak, promises to be especially hard hit by the
improvement in the U.S. trade balance, Sprinkel said.
    He defended flexible exchange rates saying wide swings in
rates were not a fault of the system but of the undesirable
policies that produced them.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7394>
Liberalization of Italy's foreign exchange
controls should be "gradual" but also "reasonably rapid," a report
issued by a study committee nominated by the Italian Treasury
Ministry said.
   The report, looking at the country's financial development
prospects, said Italy's large public sector deficit and growing
public debt were among the considerations that made a gradual
liberalization preferable.
    The report also favoured retention of the lira's six pct
oscillation band with the European Monetary System (EMS) during
the liberalization process in order to lessen short-term
domestic interest rate fluctuations which could result from
portfolio adjustments.
    The lira's fluctuation margin is currently significantly
higher than that allowed for other EMS currencies.
    Italy has over recent months announced a series of
deregulation moves in response to a European Community
directive aimed at creating a genuine common market in goods,
services and finance by 1992.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7429>
U.K. Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel
today repeated that he was satisfied with the current level of
sterling, both against the dollar and the West German mark.
    Lawson said in a television interview that he did not
regard the pound's present exchange rate was uncomfortably
high.
    "I think it is round about right," he said.
    "I think there was a time that they (British manufacturers)
thought the (exchange) rate was uncomfortably high. But I think
they are very satisfied with the present level."
    "But I have made it absolutely clear that I don't want to
see the pound go through the roof," he added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7460>
The Singapore International
Monetary Exchange Ltd, SIMEX, said it would launch at least two
options on futures contracts this year.
    SIMEX said in a press release that the options contracts
would be based on the currency and interest rate futures
currently traded on the exchange and be started "toward the
third quarter."
    SIMEX, which is linked to the Chicago Mercantile Exchange,
currently trades three currency futures -- on Deutsche marks,
Japanese yen and British pounds -- and two interest rate
futures -- on U.S. Treasury-bonds and three-month Eurodollars.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7538>
Japanese short-term interest rates,
buoyed recently by seasonal factors, are likely to fall from
the beginning of April when the new financial year begins,
money traders said.
    The Bank of Japan is expected to encourage the trend
following its attempts to pressure rates to enhance its
discount rate cut on February 23, they said.
    The Bank cut the rate to 2.5 pct from three, and began
actively injecting funds into the money market to offset rate
rises resulting from the end-of-fiscal-year surge in demand for
funds from financial institutions.
    Despite its attempts to dampen rates with measures such as
aggressive commercial bill purchases, the central bank has
failed to remove all upward pressure, money traders said.
    Attractive interest rates offered by domestic banks to
compete for time deposits of more than 600 mln yen has
underpinned short-term rates, they said.
    Interest rates on time deposits of more than 600 mln yen
were decontrolled by the Finance Ministry last September.
    This resulted in such deposits with domestic banks rising
to 17,830 billion yen by the end-December, a three-fold
increase on end-December 1985 levels, bankers said.
    On March 31, the money market expects to see a 2,000
billion yen surplus resulting from government payment of fiscal
funds, money traders said.
    From April 1, they predict the unconditional call rate will
fall to 3.5000 pct from 3.7500 pct today and the one-month
commercial bill discount rate to drop to 3.7500 pct from 4.0635
pct.
    They predict the three-month bill discount rate to slip to
3.875 pct from 4.0000 today and the three-month certificate of
deposit rate to slide to 4.10/4.15 from 4.35/25.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7559>
The Dutch Central Bank said it has
accepted bids totalling 4.00 billion guilders at tender this
morning for new five-day special advances at 5.3 pct for the
period March 20 to 25.
    Subscriptions to 250 mln guilders were fully met, amounts
above 250 mln at 30 pct.
    The new facility replaces old 11-day advances totalling 6.5
billion guilders at the same rate.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7562>
The Bank of England said it had invited
an early round of bill offers from the discount houses after
forecasting a shortage of around 950 mln stg in the money
market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
around 572 mln stg while a rise in note circulation wil take
out some 280 mlns stg.
    In addition, exchequer transactions and bankers' balances
below target will remove some 85 mln stg and 15 mln stg for the
system respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7568>
The Bank of Finland called a news
conference at 1200 GMT to announce new measures for the
"development of the system of monetary control."
    A spokesman for the Bank declined to give further details.
    Banking sources said they expected the bank to announce it
will actively take part in the interbank market and buy and
sell certificates of deposit.
    The state treasury issues government paper with a maturity
of up to one year. The central bank has so far not issued its
own paper, the sources said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7571>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with 728 mln stg assistance in response to an
early round of bill offers from the discount houses.
    Earlier, the Bank had estimated the shortage in the system
today at 950 mln stg.
    The central bank purchased 625 mln stg of bills for resale
to the market on April 7 at rates of interest between 9-15/16
pct and 10 pct.
    It also bought 103 mln stg bank bills outright comprising
65 mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct and 38 mln stg in band two
at 9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7587>
The Bank of Spain suspended its daily
money market assistance and offered to drain funds with three-
and seven-day repurchase agreements at 12-1/2 pct, money market
sources said.
    The sources said the measures were a further attempt to
rein in money supply and were likely to force some institutions
to scramble for funds before the 10-day accounting period for
reserve requirements closes on Monday.
    The bank, which raised its rate for ordinary overnight
assistance to 13-3/4 from 13-1/2 pct on Wednesday, opened its
special borrowing facility for overnight funds at 14-1/2 pct.
    Money market sources said institutions in need of funds
were likely to have to return to the bank tomorrow for further
assistance.
    The bank rarely invites applications for ordinary
assistance on a Saturday and the sources said it was more
likely to open its special borrowing facility again.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7599>
The Bank of England said it gave the
money market another 31 mln stg in assistance in the morning
session.
    This brings the Bank's total help today to 759 mln stg and
compares with its estimate of a 1.05 billion stg money market
shortage which it earlier revised up from 950 mln stg.
    The central bank bought 31 mln stg of bank bills outright
in band two at 9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7614>
The Bank of Spain suspended its daily
money market assistance and offered to drain funds with three-
and seven-day repurchase agreements at 12-1/2 pct, money market
sources said.
    The sources said the measures were a further attempt to
rein in money supply and were likely to force some institutions
to scramble for funds before the 10-day accounting period for
reserve requirements closes on Monday.
    The bank, which raised its rate for ordinary overnight
assistance to 13-3/4 from 13-1/2 pct on Wednesday, opened its
special borrowing facility for overnight funds at 14-1/2 pct.
    Money market sources said institutions in need of funds
were likely to have to return to the bank tomorrow for further
assistance.
    The bank rarely invites applications for ordinary
assistance on a Saturday and the sources said it was more
likely to open its special borrowing facility again.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7628>
Japan's economic policies face fierce
international attack as hopes fade of a substantial drop in its
trade surplus, international monetary sources said.
    At a meeting this week in Paris, senior government
officials from major nations are considering an Organisation
for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD) staff report
that forecasts a continuing large Japanese trade surplus, they
said.
    Though Japanese exports have become more expensive with the
yen's sharp rise against the dollar, they still tend to surge
when growth picks up, according to the OECD.
    As a solution, the OECD staff has urged Japan to redirect
its export-driven economy, boosting domestic demand and imports
by adopting a more flexible fiscal policy, they said.
    That recommendation echoes calls made recently at secret
meetings of the International Monetary Fund's executive board.
    The monetary sources said Japan's policy was criticized
when the board met to consider the country's economy under the
annual consultations it holds with each of its members.
    The United States, which until recently has been reluctant
to criticize Japan's fiscal stance, joined in the attack, he
said.
    The IMF staff has also cast doubt on the Japanese
government's forecast of 3.5 pct economic growth in the fiscal
year beginning April 1. Most independent forecasters, including
the IMF, believe that growth in calendar 1987 will be below
three pct, monetary sources said.
    The Finance Ministry has been particularly sensitive to
such criticism because it is already under mounting domestic
pressure to boost an economy hard-hit by the yen's rise. The
yen's climb has lost exporters sales and profits in the huge
American market.
    Tokyo is also eager to avoid any suggestion that a further
yen rise might be needed to cut its trade surplus, which last
year amounted to a record 93 billion dlrs.
    Japan cannot tolerate a further rise of the yen, Foreign
Minister Tadashi Kuranari said recently. The yen closed here
today at 151.53 to the dollar. Most Japanese politicians,
including Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa, are clearly hoping
the yen will weaken, government officials said.
    At a meeting in Paris last month, Britain, Canada, France,
Japan, the United States and West Germany, agreed to cooperate
to hold currencies at around current levels.
    Officials said that wording represented a compromise.
Miyazawa hopes the agreement will hold the yen stable for a few
months, before it weakens later in the year.
    Japan wanted the Paris communique to imply a higher value
for the dollar, perhaps by substituting the word "recent" for
"current," while the United States wanted it to more clearly
point to the dollar's weaker levels now, perhaps by use of the
word "present," they said.
    In the months leading up the February 22 agreement, the
dollar dropped some 10 yen.
    The officials also sought to discredit suggestions in the
market that recent U.S. Action to prevent the dollar from
rising above 1.87 marks pointed to a 153 to 155 yen ceiling for
the U.S. Currency.
    Japan has also attacked OECD forecasts, which it says do
not take account of the structural changes in the Japanese
economy that will be triggered by the strong yen.
    Officials said there are already signs of that. More and
more companies have announced plans to move production
facilities offshore to take advantage of cheaper costs abroad,
they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7652>
The Bank of England said it had given
the money market a further 186 mln stg assistance in the
afternoon session. This brings the Bank's total help so far
today to 945 mln stg and compares with its revised forecast of
a one billion stg deficit.
    The central bank bought bank bills outright comprising 51
mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct and 135 mln stg in band two at
9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7669>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
in a newspaper interview that he supports the current course of
Federal Reserve Board monetary policy.
    "The course of Fed policy is quite adequate as far as we are
concerned," Baker said in an interview with the New York Times.
    In the interview, Baker declined to comment about the
recent Paris accord among the six leading industrialized
democracies when he was asked why the U.S. agreed to stabilize
the dollar at current levels when the trade deficit hit a
record level last year.
    Baker said in the newspaper interview that it was "a subject
I prefer not to talk about."
    He said that if he explained why the U.S. agreed to help
maintain the dollar at current levels "I would of necessity end
up getting into some of the private agreements that support
such and agreement" on the dollar.
    Baker was optimistic about Brazil, which has stopped
interest payments on much of its outstanding debt with foreign
commercial banks.
    "They are, after all, paying on time all the debt service
and principal on their official debts, having just rescheduled
with the Paris Club," Baker said in the newspaper interview.
    Baker said that Brazilian repreentatives had explained they
intented to pay their commercial bank debts in full but needed
time.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7710>
The Bank of Finland said it has
started dealings in banks' certificates of deposits (CDs) with
immediate effect and that it was prepared to issue its own
paper to stimulate operations on the domestic money market.
    Bank of Finland Governor Rolf Kullberg told a news
conference the Bank will also limit credits on the call money
market from March 30, 1987, by introducing a maximum credit
amount and a penalty rate if banks exceed this ceiling.
    "The recent introduction of three-month money and these new
regulations are decreasing the role of the call money market
and the discount rate as monetary instruments," Kullberg said.
    Bankers welcomed the central bank measures saying these
were needed to accelerate the domestic money market. The Bank
of Finland had never before been allowed to issue its own CDs,
they said.
    "The central bank for the first time has an instrument with
which it really can influence the price of money in this
country," one banker said.
    Under the new rules banks are limited to call money credits
to a maximum of 7.5 pct of the total of their equity capital
and cash reserves. A penalty rate of interest of 19 pct is now
introduced if the limit is exceeded.
    Director Sixten Korkman at the Bank of Finland's monetary
department said he expected the bank to pursue an active policy
on the interbank market as an issuer of own-CDs.
    "We are free to do it, so maybe on Monday we will issue the
first, just to see how the system functions. Overall I think we
will issue at least a few times a week," Korkman told Reuters.
    He said the bank was likely to aim at CDs with a
three-month maturity at first as the market was best developed
for paper of that maturity.
    The Bank of Finland introduced last December three-month
credits and deposits at rates determined by the central bank
and the commercial banks as a shift away from the traditional
overnight call money market.
    Liquidity on the call credit market has fallen from around
nine billion markka in early December to 167 mln last week,
while three-month credits have risen to three to four billion.
    On the interbank market there has been an increasing trade
in banks' CDs, estimated to be some eight billion markka. In
addition, commercial paper accounts for around five billion
markka and Treasury Bills two billion.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7716>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
intervene in the government securities market to add temporary
reserves indirectly via 1.5-2.0 billion dlrs of customer
repurchase agreements, economists said.
    Federal funds, which averaged 6.06 pct yesterday, opened at
6-1/16 pct and remained there in early trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7769>
The Federal Reserve entered the U.S.
Government securities market to arrange 1.5 billion dlrs of
customer repurchase agreements, a Fed spokesman said.
    Dealers said Federal funds were trading at 6-1/16 pct when
the Fed began its temporary and indirect supply of reserves to
the banking system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7804>
A panel of four leading economists
told a congressional hearing today that foreign economies will
need to expand to avoid recession as the U.S. trade deficit
declines.
    C. Fred Bergsten, a former senior Treasury Department
official, and Robert Solomon of the Brookings Institution told
the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, the major exporting
countries risk recession if they do not expand because U.S.
demand for imports is expected to fall.
    "They need to beef up domestic demand as their trade
surplus falls," or unemployment will keep growing, Bergsten
said.
    Bergsten predicted the U.S. trade deficit, which hit 169
billion dlrs last year, will fall 30-40 billion dlrs a year for
the next two years as a result of the dollar's 35-40 pct
decline since September 1985.
    The government should intervene to push the dollar down
further if the previous declines do not lead to an improvement
in the trade picture, if the U.S. budget deficit is not reduced
and if foreign expansion does not occur, he added.
    Solomon said the dollar must fall further to compensate for
the huge interest payments required on U.S. foreign debt. The
Paris agreement between the major industrialized countries
provided only for a pause in its decline, he said.
    Rimmer de Vries, senior vice president of Morgan Guaranty
Trust Co., said the U.S. trade deficit problem is a problem of
lagging growth in industrial economies, prolonged currency
misalignment, debt problems of the developing countries, and
unbalanced growth in the Asian industrializing countries.
    John Makin of the American Enterprise Institute, suggested
foreign tax cuts to increase demand and pick up the slack from
the U.S. trade deficit fall.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7950>
Deputy Finance Ministers from the Group
of 10 leading western industrialised countries met here to
discuss the world debt crisis, trade imbalances and currency
stability today following last month's Paris monetary accord,
sources close to the talks said.
    The officials met at the offices of the International
Monetary Fund (IMF) to discuss broad aspects of world monetary
policy in preparation for the IMF's interim committee meeting
in Washington in April.
    The talks were the first high-level international review of
the monetary situation since the accord last month reached by
the U.S., West Germany, France, Britain, Japan and Canada to
stabilise world currency markets at around present levels
following the 40 pct slide in the dollar since mid-1985.
    Other countries represented at today's talks were Italy,
which refused to attend last month's meeting on the grounds
that it was being excluded from the real discussions, the
Netherlands, Belgium and Switzerland.
    Many of the officials had met earlier today and yesterday
within the framework of the Organisation for Economic
Cooperation and Development (OECD) to review the slow progress
being made in cutting the record 170 billion dlr U.S. Trade
deficit and persuading West Germany and Japan to open their
economies to more foreign imports.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8064>
Zimbabwe's Reserve Bank, the nation's
central bank, has denied the Zimbabwe dollar would be devalued.
    Bank Governor Kombo Moyana told The Herald daily newspaper
"unfortunate and completely unfounded speculation that a
depreciation of the Zimbabwe dollar was about to occur" had
aggravated a serious foreign exchange shortage.
    "During February and the early part of March this
(speculation) caused importers to bring forward their payments
and exporters to delay as long as possible the inward
remittance of export receipts, resulting in a significant
slowdown in net foreign exchange inflows," he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8074>
Nigeria's Central Bank has changed the
rules governing its foreign exchange auctions in what analysts
see as a means of defending the naira currency, which has
depreciated steadily.
    The bank said in a statement that from April 2, banks
bidding for foreign exchange would have to pay at the rate they
offered and not, as presently, at the rate of the lowest
successful bid made at the auction.
    This should discourage banks from bidding high to ensure
that they were successful while paying the lower "marginal" rate,
analysts said.
    "It should act as a brake because banks will know that if
they bid high they will have to pay what they offered," a
Western diplomat commented.
    The naira has depreciated against the dollar by 62 pct
since the auctions, known as the Second-Tier Foreign Exchange
Market (SFEM), began last September 26.
    At last week's session the Nigerian currency was fixed at
4.0 to the dollar, the third fall in a row.
    "They were clearly worried... And this is the logical way of
trying to stop the trend," the diplomat said.
    The Central Bank also announced the auctions would be
fortnightly, not weekly, beginning on April 2.
    It was not immediately clear whether next Thursday's
scheduled session would still take place, nor if the bank was
planning to double the 50 mln dlrs which are normally on offer
at each auction.
    Demand for foreign exchange has consistently outstripped
supply, encouraging banks to bid high and thus further
weakening the naira.
    If the normal weekly allocation is not doubled at the
fortnightly session, high demand could undermine the objective
of the new system, analysts said.
    Although bidding banks will now pay what they offered, the
official exchange rate for the naira applying to business
transactions will continue to be the marginal rate -- the
lowest successful bid.
    SFEM is a central part of Nigeria's structural adjustment
program, which is considered to be the most ambitious economic
recovery plan in Black Africa.
    The program involves setting a realistic exchange rate for
the naira, which was over-valued for many years, liberalising
imports, boosting agriculture, removing subsidies and reducing
inefficient government participation in the economy.
    The World Bank has played a prominent part in designing
this dramatic blue-print and in selling it to an often
sceptical public which fears inflation and lower living
standards.
    Ishrat Husain, the World Bank's representative in Nigeria,
said yesterday he was satisfied both with the adjustment
program as a whole and the foreign exchange auctions.
    "So far so good" he told a meeting of bankers in Lagos,
adding that only members of Nigeria's import-dependent elite
would suffer hardship while the common man would benefit.
    Fears that the program would encourage inflation were
incorrect, he said.
    Bumper harvests had reduced rural inflation and urban
prices had already reflected the naira's black market value
before the currency was allowed to find its true level last
September.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8097>
U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
again said the meeting of six major industrial nations in Paris
last month did not establish a target exchange rate for the
dollar.
    Baker said in a television interview aired here yesterday:
"We don't have a target for the dollar." He declined to comment
on what might be a desired level for the dollar, saying: "We
really don't talk about the dollar."
    He said protectionism was becoming "extremely strong" in the
U.S. In response to widening U.S. Trade deficits and import
barriers in other countries.
    "The mood in the United States is extremely disturbing. It's
extremely strong," he said.
    "As I've said before, we sort of see ourselves as engaged
here in a real struggle to preserve the world's free trading
system, because if the largest market in the world (the U.S.)
goes protectionist we run the risk of moving down the same path
that the world did in the late 1930s," he said.
    While relative exchange rates had a role to play in
defusing the threat of protectionism, it alone did not offer
any solution, he said.
    "You must address this problem on the exchange rate side,
but it cannot be solved on the exchange rate side alone. It's
far more comprehensive and broad than that, and the solution of
it requires a comprehensive approach," Baker said in the
interview.
    Baker said it would be necessary for other countries to
adjust their currencies upwards, as well as remove their
barriers to U.S. Imports. But he did not elaborate or name any
countries.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8098>
A hefty slice of new U.S. Treasury
supply is not the most welcome prospect for a slumbering credit
market, but at least this week's offerings should provide it
with some focus, economists said.
    "Banks and mutual funds have cash that should be put to
work, so the auctions should breathe some life into the market,"
said economists at Merrill Lynch Capital Markets Inc.
    The Treasury will place a 25 billion dlr package of
two-year, four-year and seven-year notes on the sales block
this week.
    The "mini-refunding," which will raise 9.27 billion dlrs in
new cash, comprises 10 billion dlrs of two-year notes for
auction on Tuesday, 7.75 billion dlrs of four-year notes on
Wednesday and 7.25 billion dlrs of seven-year notes on
Thursday. The market also faces the regular weekly three- and
six-month bill auction today, amounting to 12.8 billion dlrs.
    The mini-refunding does not come at a particularly
auspicious time for the market. Bond prices have been drifting
sideways in a narrow range against the backdrop of a cloudy
U.S. Economic outlook, diminished chances of a change in
Federal Reserve Board policy and a stable dollar.
    Moreover, the bond market's inertia has compared
unfavourably with the rash of activity taking place in
high-yield markets overseas, like the U.K., As well as in U.S.
Equities.
    But according to the Merrill Lynch economists, there are
signs the pall hanging over the U.S. Bond market is lifting a
bit.
    "Customer activity has been light, but all on the buy-side,
and there is a marked absence of selling," they said in a weekly
report.
    Philip Braverman of Irving Trust Securities Inc believes
banks will snap up the two- and four-year issues at this week's
sales.
    "The banks are in need of investments that provide earnings.
Though the yield spread to the cost of carrying these
maturities has been wider, it is still positive," he said in a
weekly market review.
    But economists agreed not even the auctions will generate
enough impetus for a major move. This will only come once the
overseas markets have had their run.
    "Based on last week's events, there is little to indicate
that the appetite for yield has begun to wane," said economists
at Salomon Brothers Inc.
    Indeed, talk persisted last week that Japanese investors
are planning to re-weight their portfolios in favour of the
higher-yielding markets at the start of Japan's new fiscal year
on April 1.
    And while traditionally the Japanese have not been big
buyers of the shorter-dated issues on offer at this week's U.S.
Auctions, such reports undermine market confidence.
    Even actions by the British, Australian and Canadian
monetary authorities to curb the rise of their currencies
should also enhance the attractiveness of their respective bond
markets, the Salomon Brothers' economists said.
    Meanwhile, ecomomic releases are unlikely to enliven the
U.S. Market unless they deviate widely from expectations,
economists said.
    This week's economic calendar begins on Tuesday with
February durable goods orders. Economists expect a rebound from
January's depressed levels.
    Peter Greenbaum of Smith, Barney, Harris Upham and Co said
several areas, including transport equipment, should have
bounced back. But a decline in military capital goods will cap
total new orders. He forecasts a rise of two pct after
January's 6.7 pct slump. Some other economists foresee a gain
as large as five pct.
    Friday's consumer price report for February is expected to
show an increase of about 0.3 pct after a 0.7 pct January gain.
Economists said energy prices -- the driving force behind the
January rise -- rose more moderately last month, while food
prices declined.
    Meanwhile, economists warned that the federal funds rate
will be subject to volatility in the weeks ahead due to the
approach of quarter-end and the mid-April tax date.
    Some economists expect the Fed to execute a bill pass this
week because its adding requirement increases sharply in the
new statement period beginning on Thursday.
    Fed funds traded at 6-1/16 pct late Friday and are expected
to open near that level.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8145>
The Bundesbank set a new tender for a
28-day securities repurchase agreement, offering banks
liquidity aid at a fixed rate of 3.80 pct, a central bank
spokesman said.
    Banks must make their bids by 1000 GMT tomorrow, and funds
allocated will be credited to accounts on Wednesday. Banks must
repurchase securities pledged on April 22.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8147>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
shortage of around 800 mln stg in the money market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
around 1.18 billion stg while bankers balances below target
will take out some 20 mln stg.
    Partly offseting these outflows, a fall in note circulation
and exchequer transactions will add some 355 and 55 mln stg to
the system respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8153>
Japan is expected to post a 3.6 pct rise
in real gross national product in 1987/88, higher than the
official 3.5 pct target, a private economic institute said.
    The Research Institute on National Economy said in a report
the economy will start picking up in the April-June quarter,
partly because of an improvement in earnings performance and
capital spending in manufacturing industries.
    The institute assumed an average exchange rate in the year
starting April 1 of 150 yen to the dollar. It predicted the
Bank of Japan will not change the official discount rate in the
year.
    The institute forecast that Japan's exports will gradually
rise in the year in volume terms as the dollar's fall in the
past 18 months is likely to help prop up the U.S. Economy.
    Japan's trade surplus is expected to narrow slightly to
90.2 billion dlrs in 1987/88 ending March 31 from an estimated
98 billion in the current fiscal year, it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8168>
The Bank of France will not hold a money
market intervention tender today, ruling out a further cut in
its 7-3/4 pct intervention rate, central bank sources said.
    At the tenders, depending on market conditions, the Bank
injects liquidity into the market by buying up first category
paper. But market sources said that while the recent franc
performance leaves room for a further quarter point cut in the
intervention rate there was plenty of market liquidity.
    The Bank cut its rate to 7-3/4 pct from eight pct on March
9, the first change since January 2. Interest rates also fell
the same week in Britain, Belgium and Italy.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8182>
The Bank of England said it revised down
its forecast of the deficit in the money market today to 750
mln stg from 800 mln.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8189>
U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
again said the meeting of six major industrial nations in Paris
last month did not establish a target exchange rate for the
dollar.
    Baker said in a television interview aired here yesterday:
"We don't have a target for the dollar." He declined to comment
on what might be a desired level for the dollar, saying: "We
really don't talk about the dollar."
    He said protectionism was becoming "extremely strong" in the
U.S. In response to widening U.S. Trade deficits and import
barriers in other countries.
    "The mood in the United States is extremely disturbing. It's
extremely strong," he said.
    "As I've said before, we sort of see ourselves as engaged
here in a real struggle to preserve the world's free trading
system, because if the largest market in the world (the U.S.)
goes protectionist we run the risk of moving down the same path
that the world did in the late 1930s," he said.
    While relative exchange rates had a role to play in
defusing the threat of protectionism, it alone did not offer
any solution, he said.
    "You must address this problem on the exchange rate side,
but it cannot be solved on the exchange rate side alone. It's
far more comprehensive and broad than that, and the solution of
it requires a comprehensive approach," Baker said in the
interview.
    Baker said it would be necessary for other countries to
adjust their currencies upwards, as well as remove their
barriers to U.S. Imports. But he did not elaborate or name any
countries.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8194>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with help of 97 mln stg in the morning session.
    This compares with the Bank's revised estimate of a 750 mln
stg shortage in the system today.
    The central bank bought bank bills outright comprising 12
mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct and 85 mln stg in band two at
9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8199>
Sight deposits of commercial banks at
the Swiss National Bank rose 743.7  mln Swiss francs in the
second 10 days of March to 8.40 billion, the National Bank
said.
    Foreign exchange reserves fell 392.1 mln francs to 33.55
billion.
    Sight deposits are a major indicator of money market
liquidity in Switzerland.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8234>
Nigeria's Central Bank has changed the
rules governing its foreign exchange auctions in what analysts
see as a means of defending the naira currency, which has
depreciated steadily.
    The bank said in a statement that from April 2, banks
bidding for foreign exchange would have to pay at the rate they
offered and not, as presently, at the rate of the lowest
successful bid made at the auction.
    This should discourage banks from bidding high to ensure
that they were successful while paying the lower "marginal" rate,
analysts said.
    The Central Bank also announced the auctions would be
fortnightly, not weekly, beginning on April 2.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8247>
The Bank of England said it had given
the money market a further 485 mln stg assistance in the
afternoon session. This takes the Bank's total help so far
today to 582 mln stg and compares with its forecast of a 750
mln stg shortage in the system today.
    The central bank bought bank bills outright comprising 345
mln stg in band one at 9-7/8 pct and 75 mln stg in band two at
9-3/16 pct. It also purchased 65 mln stg of treasury bills in
band one at 9-7/8 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8299>
The Federal Reserve is expected to
intervene in the government securities market to add temporary
reserves indirectly via 1.5 to 2.5 billion dlrs of customer
repurchase agreements, economists said.
    They said that while the Fed has only a moderate add need
over the next few days, it will probably intervene in an
attempt to counteract an elevated federal funds rate.
    Fed funds, which averaged 6.09 pct on Friday, opened at
6-3/16 pct and remained at that level in early trading.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8309>
Treasury Secertary James Baker said
currencies were now within ranges that better reflected
economic fundamentals.
    In a speech to the annual meeting of the Inter-American
Development Bank, he said, "Excchange have moved into ranges
that better reflect economic fundamentals."
    He noted that in particular that dollar has fallen from its
high point in early 1985 helping to moderate protectionist
pressures in the U.S.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8563>
Foreign currency futures
markets would not be harmed if the leading industrial countries
agreed to restrict currency movements to within a narrow band,
said Leo Melamed, chairman of the Chicago Mercantile
Exchange's, CME, executive committee.
    "The target zone would not affect our market I think at
all.... A 10 pct range in the Deutsche mark gives us a healthy
market," Melamed told Reuters in an interview.
    "We were willing to live in the old Smithsonian era with a
four pct shift," he said, referring to permitted currency
fluctuations in the early 1970s. "One thing you can adjust is to
make each contract a larger value."
    As chairman of the CME in 1969-71, Melamed was instrumental
in the development of currency futures, which now are crucial
to the Chicago exchange.
    Melamed said capital flows -- which he estimated can
approach 200 billion dlrs a day -- would overwhelm efforts by
governments to control currency fluctuations.
    "They can do it for a day, in terms of intervention, an
hour, a week maybe, but not over a period of time. So it's
unrealistic and it doesn't work and it's unnecessary."
    The CME's top policymaker also said a decision by the
exchange to advance the quarterly settlement time of its stock
index futures contract to the morning from the afternoon would
help eliminate dramatic price gyrations in futures and equity
markets on so-called "triple-witching" day.
    "We think that the settlement in the morning will have a
salutary effect so that over a longer period of time I think
this issue (triple witching) will go away because of the change
in the structure as of next June," when the move is scheduled to
go into effect, he said.
    Melamed said proposed changes in floor practices by traders
of the popular Standard and Poor's 500 stock index future would
address complaints of trading abuses and stimulate trading.
    Two weeks ago, the CME board of directors proposed barring
brokers on the top step of the pit from trading for their own
account. The board also proposed requiring brokers engaged in
dual trading elsewhere in the pit to record personal trades to
the nearest minute and curbing trading between broker groups.
    The changes "will in time have an extremely positive effect
on the marketplace. That's going to prove very, very
instrumental in increasing volume over time," he said,
predicting the increase would come within a year.
    Melamed, also chairman of Dellsher Investment Co Inc, said
the CME last week withdrew a proposal to put a 12-point limit
on the S and P 500 index's daily price movement when the
Commodity Futures Trading Commission told the exchange it could
not be a temporary program.
    The CME also received "many negative comments, many more
than we anticipated," Melamed conceded. Many futures commission
merchants predicted sell orders would accelerate in the event
the price approached the bottom limit.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8578>
Britain has reaped profits by using a
stronger pound to buy back dollars used by the government last
autumn to support sterling during a currency crisis, Chancellor
of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson said.
    He said in a parliamentary debate, "I can now tell the House
(of Commons) that the dollars that were sold from the reserves
in September and October (1986) have subsequently all been
repurchased - at a profit of some tens of millions of pounds."
    Hindsight had proved him right to resist market pressures
then for a two percentage point interest rate rise, he said.
The increase in base rates was instead limited then to one
point.
    During a debate on the 1987/88 British budget which Lawson
unveiled last week, he said that "during the period of foreign
exchange market turbulence which followed the somewhat
inconclusive Group of Five and Group of Seven meetings at the
end of September, I authorised the Bank of England to intervene
unusually heavily in order to buy breathing space that would
enable me to confine the interest rate rise to one pct rather
than the two pct the market was then pressing for."
    He said that that one percentage point increase, effected
in October 1986, had been reversed by this month's two half
point cuts in banks' base lending rates. They are now at 10
pct.
    Treasury figures show that the underlying change in British
reserves - seen as a guide to possible Bank of England
intervention on foreign exchange markets - suggest that the
authorities sold around 1.0 billion dlrs during September and
October 1986, government sources said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8588>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said the
time has come for major industrialised nations to take action
on exchange rates in line with their agreement last month in
Paris.
    In Paris, Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And West
Germany agreed to coooperate to hold currency rates around
their then current levels.
    Miyazawa would not say what specific measures major nations
would take, but told reporters the measures had been discussed
in Paris. The dollar fell to a record low against the yen this
morning, piercing the 150 yen barrier.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8591>
The Bank of Japan stepped up its dollar
buying as it re-entered the market after the midday Tokyo lunch
break, dealers said.
    They said the bank seemed more determined to support the
dollar than it did this morning.
    Several dealers said the central bank intervened this
afternoon when the dollar stood around 149 yen.
    One said it purchased 150 to 200 mln dlrs in the half-hour
since the market re-opened after its lunchtime closure. Another
said the bank still has buying orders in the market.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8597>
Taiwan's foreign exchange reserves,
swollen by strong trade surpluses to a record 53 billion U.S.
Dlrs, are becoming a problem, government officials said.
    Official figures show the latest level compares with the
previous record of 51 billion dlrs on March 4 and about 26
billion in late March 1986.
    Central bank Governor Chang Chi-cheng told reporters the
increase in reserves was the result of heavy intervention by
the bank on the local interbank market. It bought nearly two
billion U.S. Dlrs between March 5 and 23, he said.
    Wang Chao-ming, vice chairman of the government's Council
for Economic Planning and Development, told Reuters the rising
reserves were "a big headache for Taiwan."
    He said the government expects heavier pressure from the
U.S., Where protectionist bills are being proposed against
nations such as Taiwan and Japan with large trade surpluses
with the U.S.
    Wang said the government would launch new measures within
the next two months to further reduce import tariffs and open
the market wider to foreign products, especially those from the
U.S.
    Wang said the measures aim at helping reduce Taiwan's trade
surplus, which rose to 2.73 billion U.S. Dlrs in the first two
months of 1987 from 2.02 billion a year earlier. Nearly 90 pct
of the surplus was with the U.S.
    Vice Economic Minister Wang Chien-shien agreed with Wang's
remarks and said efforts to avert U.S. Protectionism were
running out of time. "We must do it quickly or face retaliation
from Washington," he said.
    He said the measures would include removal of trade
barriers on insurance and inland services for U.S. Companies.
    Chang Chi-cheng said the central bank could not stop buying
U.S. Dollars because of heavy sales by local exporters who fear
the strong local dollar will cause them exchange losses.
    He said the bank is studying revision of the foreign
exchange rules in hope of further reducing currency controls,
but declined to give details.
    The Taiwan dollar has risen about 15 pct against the U.S.
Dollar since September 1985. It opened at 34.38 to the U.S.
Dollar today and is expected to rise further to 33 in June and
to 32 by end-year, some foreign bankers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8607>
Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita
said in a statement the central bank will intervene in foreign
exchange markets to stabilise exchange rates if necessary in
close cooperation with other major industrial nations.
    Sumita said the Bank will take adequate measures including
market intervention, if necessary, in line with the February 22
Paris agreement by six major industrial nations.
    Canada, Britain, France, Japan, the U.S. And West Germany
agreed to cooperate in stabilising exchange rates around
current levels. Sumita's statement was issued after the dollar
slipped below 150 yen to hit a record low of 148.40.
    "It is inevitable that exchange rates fluctuate under the
system of floating rates," Sumita said.
    The fact the dollar plunged below 150 yen does not mean
anything significant under the floating system, he said.
    The six nations agreed in Paris exchange rates prevailing
then were broadly consistent with underlying economic
fundamentals and further substantial rate shifts could damage
growth and adjustment prospects in their countries, the Paris
statement said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8621>
The dollar is expected to decline further
in coming days as scepticism mounts about the effectiveness of
last month's Paris accord to stabilise currency exchange rates,
senior foreign exchange dealers said.
    Following its fall today to a record 148.40 yen, dealers
said they expect the dollar to establish a new trading range of
147 to 150 yen before the market again tries to push it down.
Behind the latest dollar fall lies the belief that last month's
accord was no longer enough to stop operators pushing the
dollar down, the dealers said.
    "The recent remark by U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
that the Paris accord did not set any target ranges for major
currencies has cast a shadow on the agreement," said Koji
Kidokoro, general manager of Mitsui Bank Ltd's treasury
division.
    He said the market interpreted this as indicating the U.S.
Would favour a weaker dollar and it had little intention of
intervening to support the currency.
    "This eliminated the widespread market caution against
possible joint central bank intervention," Kidokoro said.
    Dealers said the dollar had gathered renewed downward
momentum and that Bank of Japan intervention alone could hardly
contain a further slide in the currency.
    They said the central bank bought between one to 1.5
billion dlrs today, including direct purchases through brokers,
and yesterday it might have bought a small amount of dollars
through the U.S. Central bank in New York.
    Most dealers said they doubted the U.S. Federal Reserve
would intervene on its own account to support the dollar, but
some said this might occur if the dollar fell much below 148
yen.
    "If the dollar drops to that low level, it could reduce the
flow of foreign capital into U.S. Securities, which the
Americans don't want," said Haruya Uehara, chief money market
manager of Mitsubishi Trust and Banking Corp.
    He said the dollar may return to around 152 yen next month
when corporations reduce their dollar sales after they close
their books for the 1986/87 business year ending on March 31.
    But dealers said the longer-term outlook for the dollar
remained bearish. This was due to the lacklustre performance of
the U.S. Economy, the continuing U.S. Trade deficit and
Japanese delays in announcing an economic stimulation package.
    "The Americans are getting frustrated at Japan's inertia in
stimulating its economy," said Hirozumi Tanaka, assistant
general manager of Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd's international
treasury division.
    In the Paris currency accord Japan promised a package of
economic measures, after the fiscal 1987 budget was passed, to
boost domestic demand, increase imports, and thus reduce its
trade surplus. The package was expected in April, but debate on
the budget has been delayed by an opposition boycott of
parliamentary business over the proposed introduction of a
sales tax.
    In the circumstances the government had only a slim chance
of producing a meaningful economic package in the near future,
Dai-Ichi Kangyo's Tanaka said.
    Dealers said if steps are not taken to stimulate the
Japanese economy protectionist sentiment in the U.S. Congress
would grow and put more downward pressure on the dollar.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8629>
The Bank of England said it forecast a
shortage of around 300 mln stg in the money market today.
    Among the main factors affecting liquidity, bills maturing
in official hands and the take-up of treasury bills will drain
some 338 mln stg while bankers' balances below target will take
out around 25 mln stg.
    Partly offsetting these outflows, a fall in note
circulation and exchequer transactions will add some 45 mln stg
and 25 mln stg to the system respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8641>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told
Parliament's Lower House Finance Committee that the U.S. Is
expected to intervene in the foreign exchange market to
stabilise exchange rates, political sources said.
    Asked if the U.S. Federal Reserve Board agreed in Paris
last month to intervene to stabilise exchange rates, Miyazawa
said yes, the sources said.
    Miyazawa was also quoted as saying that he is sceptical
about the effectiveness of currency reference ranges even if
major nations agree on such an idea as it is extremely
difficult to set such ranges.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8657>
The Bank of Japan stepped up its dollar
buying as it re-entered the market after the midday Tokyo lunch
break, dealers said.
    They said the bank seemed more determined to support the
dollar than it did this morning.
    Several dealers said the central bank intervened this
afternoon when the dollar stood around 149 yen.
    One said it purchased 150 to 200 mln dlrs in the half-hour
since the market re-opened after its lunchtime closure. Another
said the bank still has buying orders in the market.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8658>
Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita
said in a statement the central bank will intervene in foreign
exchange markets to stabilise exchange rates if necessary in
close cooperation with other major industrial nations.
    Sumita said the Bank will take adequate measures including
market intervention, if necessary, in line with the February 22
Paris agreement by six major industrial nations.
    Canada, Britain, France, Japan, the U.S. And West Germany
agreed to cooperate in stabilising exchange rates around
current levels. Sumita's statement was issued after the dollar
slipped below 150 yen to hit a record low of 148.40.
    "It is inevitable that exchange rates fluctuate under the
system of floating rates," Sumita said.
    The fact the dollar plunged below 150 yen does not mean
anything significant under the floating system, he said.
    The six nations agreed in Paris exchange rates prevailing
then were broadly consistent with underlying economic
fundamentals and further substantial rate shifts could damage
growth and adjustment prospects in their countries, the Paris
statement said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8664>
The dollar is expected to decline further
in coming days as scepticism mounts about the effectiveness of
last month's Paris accord to stabilise currency exchange rates,
senior foreign exchange dealers said.
    Following its fall today to a record 148.40 yen, dealers
said they expect the dollar to establish a new trading range of
147 to 150 yen before the market again tries to push it down.
Behind the latest dollar fall lies the belief that last month's
accord was no longer enough to stop operators pushing the
dollar down, the dealers said.
    "The recent remark by U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
that the Paris accord did not set any target ranges for major
currencies has cast a shadow on the agreement," said Koji
Kidokoro, general manager of Mitsui Bank Ltd's treasury
division.
    He said the market interpreted this as indicating the U.S.
Would favour a weaker dollar and it had little intention of
intervening to support the currency.
    "This eliminated the widespread market caution against
possible joint central bank intervention," Kidokoro said.
    Dealers said the dollar had gathered renewed downward
momentum and that Bank of Japan intervention alone could hardly
contain a further slide in the currency.
    They said the central bank bought between one to 1.5
billion dlrs today, including direct purchases through brokers,
and yesterday it might have bought a small amount of dollars
through the U.S. Central bank in New York.
    Most dealers said they doubted the U.S. Federal Reserve
would intervene on its own account to support the dollar, but
some said this might occur if the dollar fell much below 148
yen.
    "If the dollar drops to that low level, it could reduce the
flow of foreign capital into U.S. Securities, which the
Americans don't want," said Haruya Uehara, chief money market
manager of Mitsubishi Trust and Banking Corp.
    He said the dollar may return to around 152 yen next month
when corporations reduce their dollar sales after they close
their books for the 1986/87 business year ending on March 31.
    But dealers said the longer-term outlook for the dollar
remained bearish. This was due to the lacklustre performance of
the U.S. Economy, the continuing U.S. Trade deficit and
Japanese delays in announcing an economic stimulation package.
    "The Americans are getting frustrated at Japan's inertia in
stimulating its economy," said Hirozumi Tanaka, assistant
general manager of Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd's international
treasury division.
    In the Paris currency accord Japan promised a package of
economic measures, after the fiscal 1987 budget was passed, to
boost domestic demand, increase imports, and thus reduce its
trade surplus. The package was expected in April, but debate on
the budget has been delayed by an opposition boycott of
parliamentary business over the proposed introduction of a
sales tax.
    In the circumstances the government had only a slim chance
of producing a meaningful economic package in the near future,
Dai-Ichi Kangyo's Tanaka said.
    Dealers said if steps are not taken to stimulate the
Japanese economy protectionist sentiment in the U.S. Congress
would grow and put more downward pressure on the dollar.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8670>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said the
time has come for major industrialised nations to take action
on exchange rates in line with their agreement last month in
Paris.
    In Paris, Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And West
Germany agreed to coooperate to hold currency rates around
their then current levels.
    Miyazawa would not say what specific measures major nations
would take, but told reporters the measures had been discussed
in Paris. The dollar fell to a record low against the yen this
morning, piercing the 150 yen barrier.
    Asked if major nations were now negotiating on what
measures to take, Miyazawa said they were not as measures had
already been agreed in Paris.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8674>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told
Parliament's Lower House Finance Committee that the U.S. Is
expected to intervene in the foreign exchange market to
stabilise exchange rates, political sources said.
    Asked if the U.S. Federal Reserve Board agreed in Paris
last month to intervene to stabilise exchange rates, Miyazawa
said yes, the sources said.
    Miyazawa was also quoted as saying that he is sceptical
about the effectiveness of currency reference ranges even if
major nations agree on such an idea as it is extremely
difficult to set such ranges.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8678>
The Bank of England said it had provided
the money market with 115 mln stg assistance in the morning
session. This compares with the Bank's forecast of a 300 mln
stg shortage in the system today.
    The central bank bought bills outright in band two at
9-13/16 pct comprising 73 mln stg bank bills and 42 mln stg
local authority bills.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8710>
Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita
said in a statement the central bank will intervene in foreign
exchange markets to stabilise exchange rates if necessary in
close cooperation with other major industrial nations.
    Sumita said the Bank will take adequate measures including
market intervention, if necessary, in line with the February 22
Paris agreement by six major industrial nations.
    Canada, Britain, France, Japan, the U.S. And West Germany
agreed to cooperate in stabilising exchange rates around
current levels. Sumita's statement was issued after the dollar
slipped below 150 yen to hit a record low of 148.40.
    "It is inevitable that exchange rates fluctuate under the
system of floating rates," Sumita said.
    The fact the dollar plunged below 150 yen does not mean
anything significant under the floating system, he said.
    The six nations agreed in Paris exchange rates prevailing
then were broadly consistent with underlying economic
fundamentals and further substantial rate shifts could damage
growth and adjustment prospects in their countries, the Paris
statement said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8714>
The sharp drop in the value of the
dollar against the yen and the mark is the first serious test
of last month's Group of Five (G-5) plus Canada agreement to
stabilise currencies, dealers and bank economists said.
    "The dollar will be pushed down until there is coordinated
central bank intervention," one dealer for a German bank said,
echoing widepread sentiment in the market.
    But opinion was divided on whether the united front forged
in Paris still exists. Some dealers said there were growing
signs the United States wanted the dollar to fall further.
    Despite repeated Bank of Japan intervention, the dollar
plunged to a post-war low in Tokyo today. It was quoted as low
as 148.40 yen in the Far East and dealers here said they
expected the U.S. Currency to decline further.
    "The dollar is now firmly within a broad 140 to 150 yen
range," Chase Bank AG's senior dealer Eckhart Hager said.
    Others said there were technical reasons for the sharp
dollar drop. "Window-dressing" operations by some Japanese
companies who were selling dollars and buying yen before the
end of the Japanese fiscal year on March 31 were undermining
the U.S. Currency.
    Dealers said main reason for the sell-off was not
technical. U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker's comment the
Paris accord did not have fixed dollar targets was seen as a
renewed attempt by the U.S. Administration to talk the dollar
down.
    "Suddenly, support levels which had existed for fear of
central bank intervention disappeared," one dealer said.
    The Bank of Japan was believed to have bought some 1.5
billion dlrs, and this with comments by Japanese officials
indicated Tokyo was unhappy about the plunge, dealers said.
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita threatened central bank
intervention if necessary.
    Japanese Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said today the
time had come for the six nations who agreed in Paris last
month to stabilise currencies - Japan, Britain, Canada, France,
the U.S. And West Germany - to take action in line with the
pact.
    But the Bundesbank and other European central banks were
not detected in the open market during the European morning.
Opinion here was divided on when the Bundesbank would act.
    While some said the West German central bank would support
the dollar once it fell below 1.80 marks, others said the
Bundesbank would only intervene after a fall below 1.75 marks
or if the decline accelerated.
    The Bundesbank last intervened on January 27, when the
dollar threatened to fall below 1.81 marks.
    "The Japanese seem to be on their own at the moment," one
dealer said. Others said cooperation between central banks and
governments was easier said than done.
    Some said Baker's remarks and U.S. Trade Representative
Clayton Yeutter's warning that the U.S. And Japan were on the
verge of a serious trade conflict showed there was a rift.
    "It's hard to tell whether the G-6 agreement still stands," a
dealer said. Another added, "If the Americans do not get what
they want, they will push the dollar down, regardless of G-6."
    Citibank AG also cast doubt on the chances of success for
the Paris agreement in its latest investment letter.
    "It is hard to see that Japan and Germany are willing or
able to loosen fiscal policy sufficiently to offset the
necessary U.S. Fiscal contraction," Citibank said.
    It added, "Markets should therefore be aware that 1.80 marks
is not the lower limit for the dollar -- a rate of 1.70 marks
or even less is expected this year."
    And London Broker Hoare Govett said in its March 1987
economic report, "We are looking for a further, more gradual,
fall, possibly to 1.60 marks by the end of the year."
    But opinion about whether the Paris accord was still in
force was not universal. Some dealers said not too much should
be read into Baker's and Yeutter's comments.
    "There is no reason to believe the Paris pact has broken
down," a senior dealer said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8723>
The Bank of Spain raised overnight call
money rates by 1/4 to 14 pct on demand for 746 billion pesetas
in today's auction, which a bank spokesman termed "heavy."
    Rates stood at 12.1 pct at the start of the year and have
been increased to drain liquidity on rising demands for funds,
the spokesman said.
    He said in reply to Reuters inquiries that rates could rise
further if money supply growth rose above this year's eight pct
target for M-4, defined as liquid assets in public hands.
    Money supply rose at an annualised rate of 16.7 pct last
month against 8.1 pct in January. Growth was 11.4 pct in 1986.
    A leading Spanish broker said the central bank was applying
a more restrictive policy to keep the lid on inflation.
    The consumer price index rose 8.3 pct last year.
    "Money supply control is the government's chief weapon
against inflation," he said. "The problem is higher rates are
attracting liquidity from abroad."
    He said this was why the central bank enacted specific
measures to control the inflow of foreign capital. The Bank of
Spain earlier this month imposed a 19 pct reserve requirement
on new convertible peseta funds held by banks to curb
short-term speculative capital from abroad.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8728>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with assistance of 104 mln stg in the afternoon
session.
    This takes the bank's total help so far today to 219 mln
stg and compares with its estimate of a 300 mln stg shortage.
    The central bank bought outright 104 mln stg in bank bills
in band two at 9-13/16 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8735>
The Federal Reserve appears to have
intervened in the U.S. foreign exchange market to buy dollars
against yen this morning, currency dealers said.
    They said the intervention occurred near the dollar's early
low of 148.50 yen and the U.S. currency subsequently firmed to
149.05/15. It closed at 150.00/05 on Monday.
    Dealers were uncertain of the amount involved and whether
the Fed's purchases were for its own account or for a customer.
But there was speculation that it may have been done in
conjunction with the Bank of Japan. Tokyo dealers said the
Japanese central bank bought dollars in Tokyo earlier today.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8760>
The Bank of England said it provided the
money market with late help of about 10 mln stg.
    This takes the bank's total help today to some 229 mln stg
and compares with its forecast of a 300 mln stg shortage.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8796>
Sudan has rejected a demand by the
International Monetary Fund for a currency devaluation because
such a move would have a negative impact on its economy, the
official Sudan News Agency (SUNA) reported.
    Finance Minister Beshir Omer, quoted by SUNA, said his
government also rejected an IMF demand to lift state subsidies
on basic consumer goods.
    SUNA, monitored by the British Broadcasting Corporation,
said Omer made the remarks after a meeting in Khartoum
yesterday with IMF envoy Abdel-Shakour Shaalan.
    Sudan, burdened by a foreign debt of 10.6 billion dlrs, is
some 500 mln dlrs in arrears to the IMF, which declared it
ineligible for fresh loans in February last year.
    In February 1985, Sudan announced a 48 pct devaluation of
its pound against the dollar, adjusting the official exchange
rate to 2.5 pounds to the U.S. Currency.
    Since then, it has resisted pressure from main creditors
for more currency adjustments, arguing that past devaluations
had failed to boost exports but raised local consumer prices.
Sudan also has an incentive rate of four pounds to the dollar
for foreign visitors and remittances by expatriate workers.
    Dealers in Khartoum's thriving black market said the dollar
was sold at 5.5 pounds today.
    With stringent import regulations and the government
increasingly short of foreign currency, black market dollars
are used to finance smuggled imports from neighbouring
countries, mainly Egypt, Kenya, Ethiopia and Zaire.
    Western diplomats in Khartoum say the meetings between IMF
and Sudanese government officials do not amount to formal
talks, but rather an effort by the IMF to monitor Sudan's
economic performance.
    The diplomats said Sudan hoped a planned four-year economic
recovery program would be acceptable to the IMF as a serious
attempt to tackle the country's economic troubles and persuade
its Gulf Arab creditors to pay the IMF arrears.
    This, they said, could provide Sudan with a clean bill of
health from the IMF that it could take to Western government
creditors, grouped informally in the so-called Paris Club, to
reschedule debt payments.
    Twenty-three pct of Sudan's total foreign debt is owed to
members of the Paris Club, the diplomats said.
    Sudan's Finance Minister said last month the country's IMF
representative had told him the fund's executive board was "very
pleased with the 18.5 mln dlrs arrears we have paid in the past
couple of months."
    The representative, Omer Said, said IMF Managing Director
Michel Camdessus said he would ask Saudi Arabia, to which Sudan
owes about 1.4 billion dlrs, to help Khartoum to pay more.
    Sudan has an annual debt liability of nearly 900 mln dlrs
but set aside only some 200 mln dlrs to service debts in the
fiscal year ending next June 30.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8845>
Robert Heller, a member of the Board
of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, said commodity
prices could form a useful guide for setting domestic and
international monetary policy.
    Speaking to the conservative Heritage Foundation, Heller
said, "A broadly based commodity price index may be worth
exploring" as a guide to monetary policy.
    "In times of rising commodity prices, monetary policy might
be tightened and in times of falling commodity prices, monetary
policy might be eased," he said.
    Commodities are also standardized to avoid measurement
problems and occur at the beginning of production so as to give
"early warning" signs of wholesale and retail changes.
    "There is no need to react to every small fluctuation in
commodity prices or to do so on a daily basis," Heller said in a
prepared text.
    "But if commodity prices exhibit a broad trend, a policy
action might be considered," he said.
    Heller said using a broad-based commodity price index as an
indicator for monetary policy would also contribute to
stabilized currency exchange rates.
    Commodity prices are generally uniform worldwide and prices
for them are more consistent than for other types of goods, he
said.
    He said other beneficial effects would be to stabilize
export commodity prices for developing countries by using a
commodity basket as a guidepost for monetary policy.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8884>
The move by foreign exchange markets to
test the strength of the Paris currency accord has thrown into
question the near-term outlook for sterling, until recently one
of the main beneficiaries of the agreement, analysts said.
    Since the six-nation accord last month, sterling has risen
sharply, adding almost five pct on its trade-weighted index.
    While the accord effectively stifled dollar/yen and
dollar/mark movements, the markets turned their attention to
sterling as foreign investors rushed to take advantage of
relatively high U.K. Interest rates.
    But analysts say the pound has been sidelined by the first
tentative test of the Paris accord seen yesterday.
    The market now looks set sooner or later to push the dollar
down further in a test of the willingness of central banks to
intervene. Analysts say if the banks do not intervene
effectively, the Paris accord could collapse.
    "On balance, sterling would be a net sufferer if G-6
collapses," Phillips and Drew analyst Stephen Lewis said.
    He said sterling would lose out as markets turned their
attention to capital movements whereas previously they had been
restricted to looking only at the interest yield on currencies.
    However, although most analysts and foreign exchange
dealers were forecasting a brief period of consolidation or
even retracement for sterling, none were expecting a very sharp
drop in the U.K. Currency.
    Sterling remained supported by optimism on the U.K.
Political and economic outlook, firmer oil prices and
relatively high interest rates, they said.
    Bullish sentiment on the U.K. Economic outlook has been
running especially high after last week's budget, seen as
popular both with the markets and with British voters.
    Sterling was also supported by signs of a weakening in the
West German and Japanese economies, where growth for 1987 is
trailing behind the three pct forecast for the U.K.
    Recent opinion polls showing Britain's ruling conservative
party ahead of opposition parties in popularity have also
supported the pound.
    In addition, sterling has so far shrugged off two
half-point cuts in U.K. Bank base lending rates in less than
two weeks. A further half-point cut, widely expected in the
next week or so, has already been largely discounted.
    U.K. Base rates, now running at 10 pct, are still
relatively high compared to other western countries, and
analysts said a further base rate cut to 9-1/2 pct was unlikely
to affect sterling.
    Sterling today appeared resilient to the dollar's decline,
dropping only slightly on a cross-rate basis.
    Worries about renewed turbulence in the foreign exchange
markets, however, were reflected in the U.K. Government bond
(gilt) market, where prices dropped by up to 5/16 point.
    Until now foreign investor interest in the gilt market has
been one of the major reasons behind the rise in sterling.
    Dealers said they expected the pound to hold quietly steady
for the next few days while the market awaits further
developments on the dollar and this Thursday's U.K. Current
account figures for February.
    Market forecasts are for a deficit of around 250 mln stg
after January's small surplus.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8922>
A member of the Federal Reserve
Board, Robert Heller, said he wanted to see stronger Japanese
demand for American goods.
    "What I was advocating here was more Japanese purchases of
American goods," Heller said in response to a question about the
dollar's weakness in currency markets.
    He told a Heritage Foundation forum, "I'd be very happy to
see that."
    In his formal remarks, Heller said he supported the idea of
using commodity prices as an indicator for monetary policy.
    Asked if he would raise the issue at the next Federal Open
Market Committee meeting, he said, "Even at previous meetings
commodity prices were raised."
    He added, "I would not expect future meetings to be
different from past meetings in that respect."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9007>
Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige
said he supported efforts to persuade newly-industrialized
countries (NICS) to revalue currencies that are tied to the
dollar in order to help the United States cut its massive trade
deficit.
    "We do need to do something with those currencies or we
will be substituting Japanese products for Taiwanese products,"
or those of other nations with currencies tied to the dollar,
Baldrige told a House banking subcommittee.
    The U.S. dollar has declined in value against the Yen and
European currencies, but has changed very little against the
currencies of some developing countries such as South Korea and
Taiwan because they are linked to the value of the dollar.
    As a result, efforts to reduce the value of the dollar over
the past year and a half have done little to improve the trade
deficits with those countries.
    Baldrige told a House Banking subcommittee that the
Treasury Department was attempting to persuade those countries
to reach agreement with the United States on exchange rates.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9022>
Central bank intervention in the
foreign exchange markets succeeded in staunching the dollar's
losses today, but senior dealers here believe the U.S. currency
is headed for a further retreat.
    Although the intervention was widespread, dealers perceive
that the six major industrial nations have differing levels of
commitment to their recent accord to stabilize currencies.
    Moreover, hard economic realities hold greater sway over
the currency market than central bank intervention and these
argue for a further dollar decline, dealers said.
    "The market can be bigger than the central banks. And
economic fundamentals will always come to the fore," said a
dealer at one major U.S. bank.
    As the dollar dropped to post-World War II lows against the
yen today foreign exchange traders said the Bank of Japan,
Federal Reserve Board and Bank of England intervened in the
markets on behalf of the U.S. currency.
    Reports of the authorities' actions helped the dollar
recover to about 149.45 yen in New York this afternoon from
the post-war low of 148.20 yen in the Far East. But it still
failed to regain Monday's U.S. closing level of 150.00/05 yen.
    Tokyo dealers said the Bank of Japan bought one to 1.5
billion dlrs in Tokyo today and may also have purchased dollars
yesterday in the U.S. via the Federal Reserve.
    Meanwhile, there were strong rumors in New York that the
Fed also bought a modest amount of dollars around 148.50 yen
today. Talk also circulated that the Bank of England purchased
a small amount of dollars for yen.
    The Fed's last confirmed intervention was on January 28
when it bought 50 mln dlrs in coordination with the Bank of
Japan. But on March 11 the Fed also was rumored to have
signalled displeasure with a dollar surge above 1.87 marks.
    The authorities' actions appeared to back up the February
22 Paris pact between the U.S., Japan, West Germany, Britain,
France and Canada under which the nations agreed to cooperate
to foster exchange rate stability around prevailing levels.
    But foreign exchange dealers were not overly impressed by
the authorities' intervention which they said can only soften
extreme moves in the market.
    For one thing, some dealers believed that the Fed's
purchases were done on behalf of the Bank of Japan rather than
for the U.S. central bank's own account, suggesting a rather  
watered-down American commitment to the currency accord.
    The Bank of England's action also was thought to be
completed on behalf of the Japanese central bank, reinforcing
the market's view that Japan is the most resolute of the six
nations in its support of the currency pact.
    "No-one doubts the Bank of Japan is serious. But the other
two central banks seem to be making more token gestures than
anything else," said Chris Bourdain of BankAmerica Corp.
    "I'm not convinced the intervention was concerted," said
Earl Johnson of Harris Trust and Savings Bank in Chicago. 
"It's a yen problem more than anything else."
    Some dealers said a rising wave of trade protectionist
sentiment in the U.S. limits the extent to which the American
authorities can endorse a stronger dollar against the yen.
    "The dollar's break below the key 150 yen level ties the
Treasury's hands behind its back. The U.S. cannot intervene on
its own account because of the strength of protectionism here,"
said Albert Soria of Swiss Bank Corp.
    Such comments reflect the view that the currency markets
are becoming increasingly politicized. Despite official
denials, some traders still feel the U.S. would countenance a
lower dollar to help trim the nation's trade deficit.
    The majority of the 170 billion dlr merchandise trade
deficit in 1986 was with Japan.
    Indeed U.S. Treasury secretary James Baker's comment on
Sunday that the February currency pact had not established
dollar targets was read by the market as a signal to sell the
U.S. currency and kicked off the latest retreat.
    "The dollar still has more room on the downside against the
yen based on the frictions in trade and financial services. The
currency market is becoming very political," said Natsuo Okada
of Sumitomo Bank Ltd.
    Okada expects the dollar to trade between 148 and 150 yen
this week but sees the chance of a drop to 140 yen by the end
of April or early May.
    Even if West Germany and Japan succeed in stimulating their
economies, it may not be enough to solve structural economic
imbalances in the near future, dealers said.
    "Even if Japan and West Germany do expand this year, it
won't be enough to help the trade situation much," said
Bourdain of BankAmerica, who also expects the dollar to drop to
148 yen in the next couple of days.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9055>
The chairman of the Federal Reserve
Board, Paul Volcker, has written to the chairman of the House
Banking Committee to raise concerns about legislative proposals
scheduled for consideration Wednesday.
    Volcker told committee chairman Fernand St. Germain a
proposal to deny primary dealer status to firms from countries
that do not grant U.S. firms equal access to their government
debt markets might invite retaliation against U.S. firms
abroad.
    He added, "even Japan, against whom this proposal seems to
be particularly directed," has started opening its markets.
    In his letter, made available at the Treasury, Volcker also
said a proposal to ease debt problems of developing countries
by setting up a public facility to buy their debts owed to
commercial banks, was a problem.
    "I believe that the prospect of debt relief would undermine
the difficult internal efforts of the borrowing countries to
achieve the structural reform that is needed regardless of the
policies that are followed on servicing external debt," Volcker
said.
    It might also cause private lenders to become reluctant to
extend more credit to the borrowing countries, he said.
    Volcker said he endorsed comments by Treasury Secretary
James Baker "about the inappropriateness of using public
resources for purchasing private commercial bank debt, which we
both see as an inherent aspect of the proposed international
debt facility."
    He also said a proposal for establishing formal procedures
for international negotiations on currency exchange rates "is
unrealistic and could well have damaging effects."
    "For example, the bill's directive to intitiate negotiations
in order to achieve a competitive exchange rate for the dollar
-- a matter upon which there can be considerable difference
among analysts -- runs the risk of building up potentially
destabilizing market expectations," Volcker said.
    He recommended "we should not lock ourselves into formalized
procedures for international negotiations" on exchange rates but
instead use other, more flexible means like the recent mmeting
in Paris between U.S. treasury and central bank representatives
and those of major trade allies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9061>
Federal Reserve Board Vice Chairman
Manuel Johnson said the dollar has stabilized against other
currencies after action taken by the Fed.
    "We have taken the appropriate action and the dollar has
stabilized," Johnson said after testifying to a House Banking
subcommittee.
    He did not elaborate on the nature of the action nor when
it was taken, but said that it was in the spirit of the
agreement reached by six industrial nations in Paris recently.
    Johnson said the dollar's decline against other currencies
such as the Japanese yen has been gradual.
    Since the accord by the United States, Britain, West
Germany, Japan, France and Canada, foreign exchange markets
have been closely watching for indications of intervention by
central banks to determine the committment by those nations to
their agreement.
    The nations agreed that currency exchange rates were at
about the correct levels when the pact was signed earlier this
year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9079>
Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul
Volcker said that the dollar's slide in currency markets has
been enough, a Fed spokesman said.
    The spokesman confirmed that Volcker, who spoke to a group
of financial analysts, said in answer to a question about the
dollar's recent slide that "enough is enough."
    Volcker has often expressed concern about the dollar
falling too rapidly in currency markets.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9120>
The Bank of Japan bought a modest amount
of dollars this morning, possibly around 200 to 300 mln,
dealers said.
    One dealer said the central bank bought about 200 mln dlrs
through brokers and the rest through banks. The buying began
when the dollar was at about 149.60 yen, and helped drive the
U.S. Currency up to around 150, he said.
    Another said the central bank seemed to be trying to push
the dollar up above 150 yen. But heavy selling at around that
level quickly pushed the dollar back down towards 149 yen,
dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9129>
The Bank of Japan is continuing to
intervene in the Tokyo market, buying small amounts of dollars
to hold the unit above 149 yen, brokers said.
    They said the Bank is coming in when the dollar is around
149.05/10 yen, the same levels as New York's close yesterday
and the midday close in Tokyo today.
    Dealers said the Bank of Japan is intervening in the market
through both banks and brokers this afternoon.
    The central bank is checking selling orders through banks
and placing matching buy orders, they said.
    The central bank started to intervene shortly after the
market opened here in the afternoon, the dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9134>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said that current exchange rates are almost within the levels
agreed to by six major nations last month in Paris.
    Asked whether a dollar/yen rate of 148 or 149 reflected
economic fundamentals, he said current rates almost reflect
fundamentals.
    Sumita told reporters major nations have cooperated to
bring about currency stability in line with the Paris
agreement, which stipulated that they would closely cooperate
to that end. He repeated the central bank will intervene if
necessary, adding he did not think a dollar free-fall was
likely.
    But Sumita said he could not say exactly what currency
levels would be considered in line with underlying economic
fundamentals.
    In Paris on February 22, Britain, Canada, France, Japan,
the U.S. And West Germany agreed to cooperate to hold
currencies around their then current levels.
    Sumita said he could not find any specific reasons behind
the fall of the dollar to a record low against the yen
yesterday. But he said the market rushed to sell dollars as it
nervously reacted to statements abroad and to developments
surrounding trade tensions.
    U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker said over the weekend
that the Paris pact did not encompass fixed tragets for the
dollar. U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter called
U.S/Japan relations on certain key trade issues very strained.
    The market reacted nervously because the dollar has been
moving narrowly against the yen since mid-January, Sumita said.
He added he does not expect the yen/dollar exchange rate to
remain unstable because the market is concerned about a sharp
rise of the yen.
    The Bank of Japan will keep a close watch on exchange rates
in line with the Paris accord, he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9138>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said the central bank has no intention of cutting its discount
rate again as a way of preventing the yen's rise.
    He told a press conference that the growth of Japanese
money supply remains high.
    The bank will have to watch closely various developments
resulting from its already eased monetary stance, such as the
sharp rise in real estate and stock prices, he said.
    Although the yen's rise will have a greater deflationary
impact on the economy, the economy is not likely to slow down
much further, Sumita said.
    "I don't think we should change our economic outlook at the
moment," Sumita said.
    Sumita has said in the past that he expects the economy to
show a gradual upturn in the second half of the year.
    The governor said the six major industrial nations are
expected to review last month's pact on currency stability when
they meet next in April.
    Dealers said they expect the six - Britain, Canada, France,
Japan, the U.S. Amd West Germany - to meet just before the
IMF/World Bank interim committee meeting in Washington starting
on April 9.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9149>
The yen could rise to 140 yen to the
dollar, a leading Japanese businessman said.
    Bumpei Otsuki, president of the influential Japan
Federation of Employers' Associations, (Nikkeiren), told
reporters: "The yen might rise as far as 140 (to the dollar).
The U.S. Economy is not good, and as long as the U.S. Economy
is not good, the U.S. Will put various pressures (on Japan)."
    "The yen's level depends on the condition of the U.S.
Economy rather than Japan's economy, and as long as the
American situation is bad, the yen will continue to rise," he
said.
    To cope with the negative impact of the strong yen,
Japanese enterprises must strive to cut costs by all means,
including holding down wages as much as possible, Otsuki said.
    He rejected recent calls from some government quarters for
wage increases this year as a means of raising private
consumption and thus boosting domestic demand.
    "We have to keep wages as low as possible," he said.
    He also said the yen's large and rapid rise is depressing
the outlook for the Japanese economy, noting that in addition
to hurting exporters it is also damaging domestic market
manufacturers through cheap imports.
    Parts of the service sector are also threatened, Otsuki
said.
    Tertiary industries provide services to manufacturers and a
downturn in manufacturing profits will adversely affect service
industries, he said.
    It is also doubtful whether the tertiary sector can fully
employ those put out of work in the manufacturing sector, he
said.
    Profits of service sector companies are likely to fall in
the business year ending in March 1988, leading to a possible
recession in the Japanese economy, he said.
    Otsuki said economic growth is unlikely to pick up beyond
levels experienced in 1986.
    The government's Economic Planning Agency said last week
the economy grew at 2.5 pct in 1986, the worst performance
since 1974 when the economy shrank 1.4 pct due to the first oil
price crisis.
    In order to stimulate domestic demand and boost the
economy, tax reforms aimed at bringing down the cost of land
and reforming the nation's housing stock are needed, along with
steps to bring down the high cost of commodities, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9164>
The Dutch Central Bank said it
allocated 4.183 billion guilders at tender for the new 5.3 pct,
nine-day special advances.
    Bids were fully met for the first 200 mln guilders and for
40 pct above.
    The new advances for the period March 25 to April 4,
replace current 5.3 pct, five day advances totalling 4.003
billion guilders which expire today.
    Money brokers said yesterday they expected the Bank to
allocate about 3.5 billion guilders.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9166>
The Ministry of International Trade and
Industry (MITI) has asked about 30 Japanese trading houses and
exporters to refrain from excessive dollar selling, trading
house officials said.
    The officials told Reuters MITI asked them to moderate
their foreign exchange trading because the excessive rise in
the yen will have unfavourable effects on the economy. It made
the request by telephone.
    A MITI official said the ministry has conducted a survey of
foreign exchange trading by trade houses and exporters. But he
said it was not aimed at moderating dollar selling.
    The trading house officials said MITI had asked them to
undertake foreign exchange transactions with due consideration
to the adverse effects excessive exchange rate movements would
have on the economy.
    The MITI official said MITI undertakes such surveys when
exchange rates fluctuate widely. A similiar survey was made
when the currency fell to the previous record low of 149.98 on
January 19. It hit a new record low of 148.20 yen yesterday.
    He said the survey showed currency transactions by trade
houses and exporters contributed little to the dollar fall.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9170>
Middle East currency dealers meet in
Abu Dhabi this weekend at a time of fundamental change in their
business, which has seen a growing volume of trade shift from
the Arab world to London.
    The 14th congress of the Inter-Arab Cambiste Association
also comes at a time when the prospect of a unified Gulf
currency system is more real that at any time this decade.
    Foreign exchange traders and bank treasurers said these
issues, and the slide of the Lebanese pound, can be expected to
be major talking points.
    About 250 traders and treasurers from some 115 banks --
including some in London and other major non-Arab financial
centres -- are expected to attend the conference which begins
on on Saturday.
    Bankers said it is hard to avoid the impression that a
growing proportion of transactions in the Saudi riyal market,
by far the largest in the region, is being carried out in
London.
    The market had been dominated by Saudi Arabia's 11 banks,
foreign exchange houses in the Kingdom and offshore banks in
Bahrain. But bankers said more and more Saudi and Bahrain-based
banks are boosting their treasury operations in London.
    As recession hit the Middle East and the need for trade
finance in the region declined, many offshore banks in Bahrain
ran down their currency operations. None of the four major U.K.
Clearing banks now has a dealing room on the island.
    The two major Bahrain-based international banks, &lt;Arab
Banking Corp> and &lt;Gulf International Bank BSC> have increased
their presence in London and Saudi banks are busy upgrading
representative offices to branch status to allow dealing.
    One economist said: "It is cheaper to run a riyal book in
London than staff an expensive offshore operation in Bahrain...
There is now the nucleus of a two-way market in London."
    Jeddah-based &lt;Riyad Bank> set up as a licensed deposit
taker in London in 1984, while its main rival in Saudi Arabia,
&lt;National Commercial Bank> (NCB) won a licence in November
1986.
    The major market maker has traditionally been London-based
consortium bank &lt;Saudi International Bank> but the kingdom
joint-venture &lt;Saudi American Bank> (SAMBA) also upgraded its
London operation to deposit taker status in mid-February.
    One senior currency trader in Riyadh said: "Inevitably the
volume of business in London has gained pace with the two new
licences for NCB and SAMBA, but there is no question that most
of the liquidity still rests in Saudi Arabia."
    Currency traders said the shift to London in the Saudi
riyal market is difficult to quantify.
    Bahrain Monetary Agency figures show regional currency
deposits held by offshore banks, most in Saudi riyals, dropped
to the equivalent of 12.2 billion dlrs at end-September 1986
from 13.4 billion at end-1985 and a 1983 peak of 15.0 billion.
    The shift has prompted changes in dealing habits. Riyal
trading in the Gulf on Saturdays and Sundays has become very
quiet with London closed while some Saudi and Bahrain banks now
staff offices on Friday, the Gulf weekend. Traders also expect
&lt;Arab National Bank> to step up London operations.
    Traders say it is difficult to foresee the riyal market
moving completely out of the region, partly because of local
demand and partly because of what is seen as the Saudi Arabian
Monetary Agency's (SAMA) desire to moderate
internationalisation of the riyal and protect it from undue
speculation.
    There have been far fewer signs of the Kuwaiti dinar market
shifting from its natural base of Kuwait and trading in Bahrain
and London is still limited.
    But for the first time since the formation of the six
nation Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) in 1981 there are signs
that a much mooted currency union could come into force soon.
    Currency traders said it remains unclear what form a final
currency union would take for the six states -- Saudi Arabia,
Kuwait, Bahrain, Oman, Qatar and the United Arab Emirates.
    But plans to link the six currencies in a European Monetary
System style with a common peg have been discussed at high
level and could be a topic on the GCC's annual summit expected
to be held in Saudi Arabia late in the year.
    One dealer said: "A lot of exposure is being given to
discussions and plans appear to be quite advanced. But in the
end a political decision has to be taken to give the go-ahead."
    One open question is that of a common peg for currencies.
    The idea of linking the six currencies has been debated
since the start of the GCC. The Kuwaiti dinar is currently
linked to a basket of currencies while the other five
currencies are either officially or in practice linked to the
U.S. Dollar.
    Some traders said a currency union could mean speculation
against the Saudi riyal rubbing off on other Gulf currencies,
but plans call for a permitted divergence in the system of
7-1/4 pct, large enough to avoid sudden strains.
    Another topic for debate is expected to be the continued
slide of the Lebanese pound against the dollar and the
undermining of the effective capital base of Lebanese banks.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9213>
The yen could rise to 140 yen to the
dollar, a leading Japanese businessman said.
    Bumpei Otsuki, president of the influential Japan
Federation of Employers' Associations, (Nikkeiren), told
reporters: "The yen might rise as far as 140 (to the dollar).
The U.S. Economy is not good, and as long as the U.S. Economy
is not good, the U.S. Will put various pressures (on Japan)."
    "The yen's level depends on the condition of the U.S.
Economy rather than Japan's economy, and as long as the
American situation is bad, the yen will continue to rise," he
said.
    To cope with the negative impact of the strong yen,
Japanese enterprises must strive to cut costs by all means,
including holding down wages as much as possible, Otsuki said.
    He rejected recent calls from some government quarters for
wage increases this year as a means of raising private
consumption and thus boosting domestic demand.
    "We have to keep wages as low as possible," he said.
    He also said the yen's large and rapid rise is depressing
the outlook for the Japanese economy, noting that in addition
to hurting exporters it is also damaging domestic market
manufacturers through cheap imports.
    Parts of the service sector are also threatened, Otsuki
said.
    Tertiary industries provide services to manufacturers and a
downturn in manufacturing profits will adversely affect service
industries, he said.
    It is also doubtful whether the tertiary sector can fully
employ those put out of work in the manufacturing sector, he
said.
    Profits of service sector companies are likely to fall in
the business year ending in March 1988, leading to a possible
recession in the Japanese economy, he said.
    Otsuki said economic growth is unlikely to pick up beyond
levels experienced in 1986.
    The government's Economic Planning Agency said last week
the economy grew at 2.5 pct in 1986, the worst performance
since 1974 when the economy shrank 1.4 pct due to the first oil
price crisis.
    In order to stimulate domestic demand and boost the
economy, tax reforms aimed at bringing down the cost of land
and reforming the nation's housing stock are needed, along with
steps to bring down the high cost of commodities, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9214>
The Bank of Japan bought a modest amount
of dollars this morning, possibly around 200 to 300 mln,
dealers said.
    One dealer said the central bank bought about 200 mln dlrs
through brokers and the rest through banks. The buying began
when the dollar was at about 149.60 yen, and helped drive the
U.S. Currency up to around 150, he said.
    Another said the central bank seemed to be trying to push
the dollar up above 150 yen. But heavy selling at around that
level quickly pushed the dollar back down towards 149 yen,
dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9216>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said the central bank has no intention of cutting its discount
rate again as a way of preventing the yen's rise.
    He told a press conference that the growth of Japanese
money supply remains high.
    The bank will have to watch closely various developments
resulting from its already eased monetary stance, such as the
sharp rise in real estate and stock prices, he said.
    Although the yen's rise will have a greater deflationary
impact on the economy, the economy is not likely to slow down
much further, Sumita said.
    "I don't think we should change our economic outlook at the
moment," Sumita said.
    Sumita has said in the past that he expects the economy to
show a gradual upturn in the second half of the year.
    The governor said the six major industrial nations are
expected to review last month's pact on currency stability when
they meet next in April.
    Dealers said they expect the six - Britain, Canada, France,
Japan, the U.S. Amd West Germany - to meet just before the
IMF/World Bank interim committee meeting in Washington starting
on April 9.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9217>
The Bank of England said it had revised
its forecast of the liquidity position in the money market
today to a surplus of 150 mln stg after it estimated a flat
position earlier this morning.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9218>
The Bank of England said it had not
operated in the money market during the morning session.
    Earlier, the Bank revised its forecast of the liquidity
position in the system today to a surplus of 150 mln stg from
its original estimate of a flat position.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9220>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said that current exchange rates are almost within the levels
agreed to by six major nations last month in Paris.
    Asked whether a dollar/yen rate of 148 or 149 reflected
economic fundamentals, he said current rates almost reflect
fundamentals.
    Sumita told reporters major nations have cooperated to
bring about currency stability in line with the Paris
agreement, which stipulated that they would closely cooperate
to that end. He repeated the central bank will intervene if
necessary, adding he did not think a dollar free-fall was
likely.
    But Sumita said he could not say exactly what currency
levels would be considered in line with underlying economic
fundamentals.
    In Paris on February 22, Britain, Canada, France, Japan,
the U.S. And West Germany agreed to cooperate to hold
currencies around their then current levels.
    Sumita said he could not find any specific reasons behind
the fall of the dollar to a record low against the yen
yesterday. But he said the market rushed to sell dollars as it
nervously reacted to statements abroad and to developments
surrounding trade tensions.
    U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker said over the weekend
that the Paris pact did not encompass fixed tragets for the
dollar. U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter called
U.S/Japan relations on certain key trade issues very strained.
    The market reacted nervously because the dollar has been
moving narrowly against the yen since mid-January, Sumita said.
He added he does not expect the yen/dollar exchange rate to
remain unstable because the market is concerned about a sharp
rise of the yen.
    The Bank of Japan will keep a close watch on exchange rates
in line with the Paris accord, he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9222>
The Ministry of International Trade and
Industry (MITI) has asked about 30 Japanese trading houses and
exporters to refrain from excessive dollar selling, trading
house officials said.
    The officials told Reuters MITI asked them to moderate
their foreign exchange trading because the excessive rise in
the yen will have unfavourable effects on the economy. It made
the request by telephone.
    A MITI official said the ministry has conducted a survey of
foreign exchange trading by trade houses and exporters. But he
said it was not aimed at moderating dollar selling.
    The trading house officials said MITI had asked them to
undertake foreign exchange transactions with due consideration
to the adverse effects excessive exchange rate movements would
have on the economy.
    The MITI official said MITI undertakes such surveys when
exchange rates fluctuate widely. A similiar survey was made
when the currency fell to the previous record low of 149.98 on
January 19. It hit a new record low of 148.20 yen yesterday.
    He said the survey showed currency transactions by trade
houses and exporters contributed little to the dollar fall.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9224>
The Bank of Japan intervened to stem
strong yen rises against the dollar during London trading this
morning, dealers said.
    The Bank of Japan here declined comment.
    The Bank of England was also rumored to be buying dollars
against the yen this morning but it also declined comment.
    Dealers said the intervention halted a sudden late morning
drop to a low of 148.65 yen, holding the dollar steady until
midsession at about 148.80.
    The Bank of England was strongly rumored to have intervened
on behalf of the dollar against the yen yesterday, but it gave
no confirmation.
    Overnight reports from Tokyo said that the Bank of Japan
was aggressively supporting the dollar, but failed to push it
back to the perceived target level of 150 yen.
    Selling during the London trading morning was largely
attributed to Japanese institutions.
    Dealers here were loath to quantify the scale of Bank of
Japan action this morning. One U.S. Bank trader said it could
have been up to 500 mln dlrs, but said this was largely a
guess.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9261>
The Bank of England said it revised up
its forecast of today's surplus in the money markets to 250 mln
stg from its earlier estimate of a 150 mln.
    The central bank has not operated in the market today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9295>
The Bundesbank bought large amounts
of dollars for yen in an apparent attempt to hold the dollar
above 149 yen, dealers said.
    The dollar intervention was in concert with some other
central banks, they said.
    Dealers said the Bank of Japan and Bank of England
supported the dollar against the yen earlier today and that
these two banks and the U.S. Federal Reserve were also active
yesterday.
    The Bundesbank declined to comment on the dealers' remarks.
    Dealers said the intervention underlined the determination
of central banks to keep currencies within recent ranges
following last month's agreement in Paris by six leading
countries to foster currency stability.
    One dealer said he had been repeatedly in contact with the
Bundesbank during the morning to see if it wanted to buy
dollars after the Japanese and U.K. Central bank moves.
    He said the Bundesbank told him it was observing the
situation to see if it should intervene in consultation with
other central banks.
    Since the Paris agreement on February 22 the dollar had
until yesterday traded in a 1.8150-1.8700 mark range, and above
150 yen, with traders reluctant to push the dollar down to test
central banks' resolve to defend currency stability.
    But the test came this week with the dollar falling below
1.81 marks and 150 yen. Dealers said a reviving trade dispute
between Washington and Tokyo and growing sentiment that the
dollar would have to fall further to narrow the obstinate U.S.
Trade deficit were behind the weakness.
    This week's intervention showed central banks were prepared
to cooperate to defend the Paris pact, dealers said.
    Dealers said it was significant the West German and British
central banks were supporting the dollar against the yen.
    That showed the pact involved multilateral cooperation by
central banks to foster currency stability, they said.
    But it was unclear how such cooperation was being arranged
and how frequent consultations between central banks were.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9299>
The Bank of England said it drained
liquidity from the money market when it sold 167 mln stg of
treasury bills due March 27 at rates between 9-9/16 and 10 pct.
    Earlier, the bank estimated a surplus of around 250 mln stg
in the system today.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9361>
The Federal Reserve will probably
intervene in the government securities market to add reserves
today, economists said.
    They expected the Fed will supply temporary reserves
indirectly via 1.5 to two billion dlrs of customer repurchase
agreements.
    Fed funds hovered at a relatively high 6-1/4 pct this
morning after averaging 6.14 pct on Tuesday.
    Early this afternoon the Fed also is expected to supply
reserves permanently, effective Thursday, by offering to buy
all maturities of Treasury bills.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9498>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
the administration is confident the effect of exchange rate
changes will bring about a cut in the trade deficit this year.
    In testimony before the Senate Committee on Governmental
Affairs, Baker conceded that the effect thus far has "not yet
proved as quick or as strong as had been expected from past
experience."
    He told the committee, however, that the "initial signs are
encouraging."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9535>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
the United States and other nations were willing to cooperate
to stabilize foreign exchange rates at the levels that existed
at the time of an international agreement last month.
    "Our position with respect to the dollar goes back to the
Paris Agreement that the currencies were within ranges broadly
consistent with underlying economic conditions," Baker told a
Senate committee.
    Baker continued, "We said further that we and others are
willing to cooperate closely to foster stability in exchange
rates around those levels."
    He referred to a February agreement by six leading
industrial nations to cooperate on monetary matters.
    Baker refused to answer a question whether Japan and
Germany had done enough to stimulate their domestic economies
for the United States to support the dollar.
    "I will not comment because the foreign exchange market
reads more or less than is intended in my statements," Baker
said.
    Baker said that the other signatories recognized that they
must carry their share of the load of correcting external
imbalances that have hindered the world's economy.
    He cited news reports that Germany would increase a
proposed tax cut for 1988 by about five billion marks to
stimulate domestic growth.
    Japan also agreed to consider stimulative measures after
the Japanese budget was made final.
    Baker said those nations were stimulating their economies
in a manner consistent with gains against inflation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9656>
The House Banking Committee adopted
legislation to direct the U.S. Treasury to begin negotiations
aimed at seeking regular adjustment of exchange rates by  
countries such as Taiwan and South Korea, whose currencies are
pegged to the value of the U.S. dollar.
    The measure was adopted as part of a wide-ranging trade
bill that will be considered by the full House in April before
it moves on to the Senate.
    The bill's many provisions also set as a priority for the
U.S. the negotiation of stable exchange rates and urge
government intervention as necessary to offset fluctuations.
    In addition, the Banking Committee bill would authorize
U.S. banks to use a variety of means to deal with the debt
problems of developing countries, such as lowering interest
rates on existing debt, renegotiating loans or debt
forgiveness. The bill would give a blanket waiver of any
federal banking regulations that bar such actions.
    The bill would direct Treasury Secretary James Baker to
discuss with debt-ridden developing countries the possibility
of the U.S. setting up a public debt management agency that
would purchase their debt at a discount and negotiate the
restructuring of the debt.
    The Banking bill authorizes U.S. participation in a
multilateral investment guarantee agency (MIGA) as requested by
the administration. Congress would approve an initial U.S.
subscription of 22 mln dlrs.
    And, it sets up a council on industrial competitiveness
composed of industry and administration members to explore ways
to make the U.S. more competitive in world markets.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9681>
The House Banking Committee adopted
legislation to direct the U.S. Treasury to begin negotiations
aimed at seeking regular adjustment of exchange rates by  
countries such as Taiwan and South Korea whose currencies are
pegged to the value of the U.S. dollar.
    The measure was adopted as part of a wide-ranging trade
bill that will be considered by the full House in April before
it moves onto the Senate.
    The bill's many provisions also set as a priority for the
U.S. the negotiation of stable exchange rates and urge
government intervention as necessary to offset fluctuations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9689>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
he stood by the Paris agreement among leading industrial
nations to foster exchange rate stability around current
levels.
    "I would refer you to the Paris agreement which was a
recognition the currencies were within ranges broadly
consistent with economic fundamentals," Baker told The Cable
News Network in an interview.
    "We were quite satisfied with the agreement in Paris
otherwise we would not have been a party too it," he said.
    Baker also noted the nations agreed in the accord to
"co-operate to foster greater exchange rate stability around
those levels."
    He refused to comment directly on the current yen/dollar
rate but said flatly that foreign exchange markets recently
tended "to draw unwarranted inferences from what I say."
    Baker was quoted on British Television over the weekend as
saying he has no target for the U.S. currency, a statement that
triggered this week's renewed decline of the dollar.
    "I think the Paris agreement represents evidence that
international economic policy co-ordination is alive and well,"
Baker said.
    The Treasury Secretary stressed however it was very
important for the main surplus countries to grow as fast as
they could consistent with low inflation to resolve trade
imbalances.
    He added that Federal Reserve Board chairman Paul Volcker
has also "been very outspoken" in suggesting main trading
partners grow as fast as they can.
    Baker noted that the J-curve, the delayed beneficial effect
of a weakening of a currency on that country's trade balance,
takes 12 to 18 months to work its way through to the trade
deficit and it is now 18 months since the Plaza agreement to
lower the dollar's value.
    He also said improvements in the trade deficit should come
from other sources besides the exchange rate, and pointed out
the administration's package to improve U.S. Competitiveness
was now before Congress.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9701>
Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita
said a further yen rise would have adverse effects on the
Japanese economy.
    He told Japanese business leaders the Bank of Japan will
continue to take adequate measures, including market
intervention, to stabilize exchange rates if necessary, in
close cooperation with other major industrialized nations. He
said the current instability of exchange rates will not last.
    Six major nations - Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the
U.S. And West Germany - agreed in Paris last month to act
together to hold currencies stable.
    Sumita said the Bank of Japan will continue to pursue
adequate and flexible monetary policies while watching economic
and financial developments in and outside Japan.
    He said the decision to cut the discount rate on February
20 was a hard choice for the Bank because monetary conditions
had already been sufficiently eased.
    To prevent a resurgence of inflation, the Bank will take a
very cautious stance regarding developments stemming from easy
credit conditions, he said.
    He said the latest discount rate cut to 2.5 pct should
stabilize exchange rates and expand domestic demand.
    Commenting on the dollar's fall below 150 yen, Sumita
reiterated he cannot find any specific reason for the
currency's weakness.
    The market undertook speculative dollar selling by reacting
to overseas comments by monetary authorities and trade tension,
he said.
    Sumita repeated that the Japanese economy may gradually
recover in the latter half of the 1987/88 fiscal year ending
April 1, 1988, provided exchange rates stabilize.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9720>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said
major nations are taking action to stabilise exchange rates in
line with their agreement in Paris last month, government
sources said.
    Miyazawa told an Upper House session the six nations --
Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And West Germany --
are abiding by the Paris accord. The six agreed to cooperate to
stabilise exchange rates at around current levels.
    Miyazawa said he wishes to attend a meeting of seven major
nations (G-7) expected just before the IMF/World Bank Interim
Committee meeting in Washington starting on April 9.
    The sources quoted Miyazawa as saying Japan is trying to
prevent a further rise of the yen. Japan is taking the matter
seriously, he added.
    Asked if the six nations had agreed to stabilise the dollar
at about 153 yen, the rate prevailing at the time of the Paris
talks, Miyazawa declined to give specific figures and said any
mention of specific rates would create an "unexpected situation."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9730>
The Bank of France said it set a money
market intervention tender today to inject funds to the market
against first category paper.
    Money market sources said the surprise announcement might
herald a quarter percentage point cut in the central bank
intervention rate from the 7-3/4 pct level set March 10, but
they added such a cut was relatively unlikely.
    The intervention rate was cut from eight pct on March 10
after being raised from 7-1/4 pct on January 2 to head off
speculative pressure against the franc.
    Dealers said market fundamentals could justify a further
easing, but a combination of technical factors and renewed
currency uncertainties surrounding the dollar had put
short-term upside pressure on interest rates in recent
sessions.
    Call money rose yesterday to 7-7/8 eight pct from 7-3/4 7/8
pct. Today it was first indicated at 8-1/8 1/4 before easing on
news of the tender to 7-13/16 7/8 pct.
    Technical factors making for a slight shortage of liquidity
in the market included the settlement yesterday of the latest
monthly treasury tap stock tender, on March 5, market sources
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9745>
The Bank of England said it has forecast
a flat position in the money market today.
    Among the main factors, maturing assistance and take-up of
treasury bills will drain 545 mln stg and a rise in note
circulation 35 mln stg but the outflow will be offset by 490
mln stg exchequer transactions and bankers balances above
target 70 mln.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9753>
Short-dated Saudi riyal interest rates
firmed but other rates were steady in quiet trading, dealers
said.
    "Day-to-day money is a bit tighter," one trader said.
    Overnight rose two points to six pct, while most quotes for
tomorrow/next and spot/next were 1/2 point higher at around
six, 5-1/2 pct.
    The periods were essentially steady at 5-7/8, 5/8 pct for
one month, 6-1/2, 3/8 pct for three, and 6-7/8, 11/16 for six
months.
    The spot riyal stood at 3.7500/05 to the dollar after
3.7506/09 yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9764>
The monetary authorities of the major
industrialised countries lost their credibility this week as
the dollar was sold off despite pleas from ministers and
widespread central bank intervention, dealers said.
    The dollar's fall below 150 yen, which follows last month's
Paris currency stabilisation agreement by the U.S., Japan, West
Germany, Britain, France and Canada, is a dramatic reversal of
the success of the Group of Five (G-5) 1985 New York Plaza
meeting to weaken the dollar, they said.
    The G-5 and the market agreed in 1985 that the dollar was
overvalued but this time the market and the authorities are on
different sides, dealers said.
    Apparent confusion in the ranks of the G-5 nations has
encouraged the market to challenge the authorities despite
concerted intervention by the central banks of the United
States, Japan, Britain and West Germany, they said.
    Pleas by Japanese Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa for
action to stabilise the dollar were matched over the weekend by
comments by U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker that there was
no target zone for the dollar. The dollar was sold anyway.
    Yesterday's comment by Baker that he stood by the Paris
accord did nothing to reverse sentiment, dealers said.
    The intervention, backed by remarks by Fed Chairman Paul
Volcker and Japanese central bank governor Satoshi Sumita,
which a few months ago would have brought the dollar fall to a
halt, has done little but slow the rate of its decline, they
noted.
    The situation has again raised the question of whether
intervention can succeed against the trend in today's huge
currency markets. Dealers said the market's cool response to
intervention reflected a basic oversupply of dollars.
    "This means that the current dollar selling is not of a
sheer speculative nature but backed by real demand," said Koichi
Miyazaki, deputy general manager at Sanwa Bank.
    Dealers said the dollar will remain weak despite the
intervention and it is only a matter of time before some
operators try to push it below 148 yen. The dollar closed in
Tokyo today at 149.40 against New York's 149.30/40. Its record
low was 148.40 in Tokyo last Tuesday.
    Dealers said the dollar will gain only temporary support to
rise above 150 yen toward early April when the Group of Seven
industrial nations meets to discuss currencies again.
    The market expects the seven nations (the Paris six plus
Italy) to try to agree on another way to stabilise currencies
apart from intervention, a chief dealer at a U.S. Bank said.
    Dealers said they were unsure what other methods could be
used and they are sceptical anyway about how long the Paris
accord nations, particulary the U.S., Will remain willing to
prevent a further dollar fall given the continuing high U.S.
Trade deficit, especially with Japan.
    Further pressure from a protectionist U.S. Congress for a
lower dollar is also limiting Washington's options, they said.
    The market now thinks the central bank action is to slow
the dollar fall, not to push it back over 150 yen, said
Tadahiko Nashimoto, manager at Long Term Credit Bank of Japan.
    Another bearish factor for the dollar is expected large
forward dollar sales from April to June for export bills
falling due for Japanese exporters from April to September.
    The exporters had delayed in expectation of a further yen
depreciation, dealers said.
    Yesterday's request to 30 trading houses by the Ministry of
International Trade and Industry to restrict dollar sales looks
ineffective in light of this real demand, they said.
    The market is also anticipating active institutional dollar
sales to hedge currency risks on bond holdings from the new
business year starting April 1, dealers said.
    "The market seems to have established a new dollar trading
range between 147 and 149 yen," one dealer said.
    The dollar traded between 151 and 153 yen after the Paris
accord on February 22 and 150 yen was then considered the low
end for the dollar against the yen, he said.
    Some dealers now believe that if the dollar falls below 148
yen, it will pick up renewed downward momentum and slide to
145.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9781>
The Bank of England said it revised its
estimate of today's money market shortfall to around 350 mln
stg from a flat position.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9783>
The Bank of Japan was thought to have
bought a small amount of dollars at around 149.30/40 yen,
dealers said.
    The dollar fluctuated marginally after the small-scale
intervention, believed to total several tens of mlns of dlrs,
they said. Large-scale buying by foreign banks or by a life
insurance company earlier pushed the dollar upwards, they said.
    Trading was not very active and dealers were watching for
further central bank intervention to smooth out any sharp
movements, but underlying dollar sentiment is still bearish.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9784>
The release of U.K. February trade data
showing that the current account surplus was a provisional 376
mln stg, up from a 73 mln surplus in January, has boosted hopes
of an early cut in interest rates, analysts said.
    Market forecasts had been for a worse outcome, with
expectations of a deficit in visible trade averaging about 750
mln stg, against the official figure of 224 mln stg, sharply
narrower than January's 527 mln deficit.
    "The figures are unreservedly good," Chase Manhattan
Securities economist Andrew Wroblewski said.
    Sterling rebounded on the trade figures, reversing a weaker
morning trend, to stand at 72.1 pct of its trade weighted index
against a basket of currencies at midday, unchanged from
yesterday's close but 0.3 points above the 1100 GMT level.
    The market had feared that a deteriorating non-oil trade
pattern would undermine international support for sterling,
which has been the motor behind the recent fall in U.K.
Interest rates. Money market sources said the market had begun
to doubt that a widely expected drop in bank base lending rates
to 9.5 pct from the present 10.0 pct was really on the cards.
    But sentiment now looks to have turned about again.
    There now looks to be no danger that the Chancellor of the
Exchequer Nigel Lawson's forecast of a 1987 current account
deficit of 2.5 billion stg will be exceeded, Wroblewski said.
    Seasonally adjusted figures showed imports rose in February
to 7.16 billion stg from 6.73 billion in January.
    Exports rose to a record 6.93 billion from 6.20 billion.
    However, Chris Tinker, U.K. Analyst at brokers Phillips and
Drew said the faster rise in exports than imports would prove
partly aberrational in coming months. He forecast the
Chancellor's Budget tax cuts would increase consumer
expenditure on imported goods.
    However, Warburg Securities economist Ian Harwood said his
firm was sharply revising its 1987 current account deficit
forecast in the light of the latest data, cutting one billion
stg off the expected full year total to about 1.75 billion stg.
    He said news of strong growth in exports of non-oil goods
confirmed recent bullish surveys among members of the
Confederation of British Industry.
    The growth in imports appears to be flattening, even if
January's bad weather had curbed consumer spending on overseas
goods and import-intensive stock building among manufacturers,
Harwood said.
    U.K. Government bonds, or gilts, surged by more than 1/2
point on the better-than-expected news, as earlier worries
about the figures evaporated.
    Sterling peaked at a high of 1.6075 dlrs, before settling
to a steady 1.6050 about 1300 GMT, nearly a cent higher than
the European low of 1.5960.
    However, analysts noted that the turnabout in market
sentiment still looks highly vulnerable to political news.
    Morning weakness in sterling and the gilt market was
largely attributed to a newspaper opinion poll showing that the
Conservative government's support was slipping.
    LONDON, March 26 - The Bank of England said it provided 15
mln stg in assistance to the money market this morning, buying
bank bills in band two at 9-13/16 pct.
    Earlier the Bank revised its money market liquidity
forecast from a flat position to a deficit of around 350 mln
stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9792>
An exchange loss of 7.6 billion
ringgit in 1986 pushed Malaysia's outstanding external debt up
to 50.99 billion ringgit, from 1985's 42.3 billion, the Central
Bank said in its annual report.
    Bank Negara said although Malaysia's net borrowing dropped
in 1986, its external debt rose due to the 30 pct appreciation
of the basket of currencies against which the ringgit is
pegged.
    The basket comprises principally the U.S. Dollar, yen,
mark, Swiss franc, French franc, sterling, guilder, Canadian
and Singapore dollars, it added.
    Bank Negara said growth in external debt, which declined
progressively from a peak of 58 pct in 1982 to 13.6 pct in
1985, rose by 20.2 pct in 1986.
    Malaysia's debt serving ratio of 17.6 pct of its exports in
1986 is within the prudency limit of 20 pct, Bank Negara
Governor Jaafar Hussein told reporters.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9797>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
he stood by the Paris agreement among leading industrial
nations to foster exchange rate stability around current
levels.
    "I would refer you to the Paris agreement which was a
recognition the currencies were within ranges broadly
consistent with economic fundamentals," Baker told The Cable
News Network in an interview.
    "We were quite satisfied with the agreement in Paris
otherwise we would not have been a party too it," he said.
    Baker also noted the nations agreed in the accord to
"co-operate to foster greater exchange rate stability around
those levels."
    He refused to comment directly on the current yen/dollar
rate but said flatly that foreign exchange markets recently
tended "to draw unwarranted inferences from what I say."
    Baker was quoted on British Television over the weekend as
saying he has no target for the U.S. currency, a statement that
triggered this week's renewed decline of the dollar.
    "I think the Paris agreement represents evidence that
international economic policy co-ordination is alive and well,"
Baker said.
    The Treasury Secretary stressed however it was very
important for the main surplus countries to grow as fast as
they could consistent with low inflation to resolve trade
imbalances.
    He added that Federal Reserve Board chairman Paul Volcker
has also "been very outspoken" in suggesting main trading
partners grow as fast as they can.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9848>
The release of U.K. February trade data
showing that the current account surplus was a provisional 376
mln stg, up from a 73 mln surplus in January, has boosted hopes
of an early cut in interest rates, analysts said.
    Market forecasts had been for a worse outcome, with
expectations of a deficit in visible trade averaging about 750
mln stg, against the official figure of 224 mln stg, sharply
narrower than January's 527 mln deficit.
    "The figures are unreservedly good," Chase Manhattan
Securities economist Andrew Wroblewski said.
    Sterling rebounded on the trade figures, reversing a weaker
morning trend, to stand at 72.1 pct of its trade weighted index
against a basket of currencies at midday, unchanged from
yesterday's close but 0.3 points above the 1100 GMT level.
    The market had feared that a deteriorating non-oil trade
pattern would undermine international support for sterling,
which has been the motor behind the recent fall in U.K.
Interest rates. Money market sources said the market had begun
to doubt that a widely expected drop in bank base lending rates
to 9.5 pct from the present 10.0 pct was really on the cards.
    But sentiment now looks to have turned about again.
    There now looks to be no danger that the Chancellor of the
Exchequer Nigel Lawson's forecast of a 1987 current account
deficit of 2.5 billion stg will be exceeded, said Wroblewski.
    Seasonally adjusted figures showed that imports rose in
February to 7.16 billion stg from 6.73 billion in January.
    Exports rose to a record 6.93 billion from 6.20 billion.
    However, Chris Tinker, U.K. Analyst at brokers Phillips and
Drew said that the faster rise in exports than imports would
prove partly aberrational in coming months. He forecast the
Chancellor's Budget tax cuts would increase consumer expediture
on imported goods.
    However, Ian Harwood, economist at Warburg Securities, said
his firm was sharply revising its 1987 current account deficit
forecast in the light of the latest data, cutting one billion
stg off the expected full year total to about 1.75 billion stg.
    He said news of strong growth in exports of non-oil goods
confirmed recent bullish surveys among members of the
Confederation of British Industry.
    The growth in imports appears to be flattening, even if
January's bad weather had curbed consumer spending on overseas
goods and import-intensive stock building among manufactureres,
Harwood said.
    U.K. Government bonds, or gilts, surged by more than 1/2
point on the better-than-expected news, as earlier worries
about the figures evaporated.
    Sterling peaked at a high of 1.6075 dlrs, before settling
to a steady 1.6050 dlrs about 1300 GMT, nearly a cent higher
than the European low of 1.5960.
    However, analysts noted that the turnabout in market
sentiment still looks highly vulnerable to political news.
    Morning weakness in sterling and the gilt market was
largely attributed to a newspaper opinion poll showing that the
Conservative government's support was slipping.
    The Marplan poll, published in "Today," showed Conservative
support had fallen to 36 pct, from 38 pct last month, while the
Alliance of Liberals and Social Democrats had rallied to 31
pct, from 21 pct, to run neck and neck with the Labour Party,
whose own support fell from 38 pct.
    The poll was taken after the Budget, which was greeted
enthusiastically by financial markets but seems to have left
the voters indifferent, political observers said.
    Another regular poll is due tomorrow, and eonomists warn
that today's improved sentiment could be dented if support for
Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher slips again.
    This upsetting of the markets' political perceptions, which
are all but discounting a Conservative victory in the upcoming
general election, made them more sensitive to the trade data,
Harwood said. "The news did come as a very, very substantial
relief," he said.
    However, on the interest rate front, economists caution
that Lawson might be wary of leaving sterling vulnerable by
encouraging another base rate fall. They noted Lawson had
already got an inflation-reducing cut in mortgage rates in
response to lower base rates, so domestic political reasons for
lower rates have been curtailed.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9855>
The Bank of England said it operated in
the money market this afternoon, buying 226 mln stg in bills.
    In band one, the central bank bought 37 mln stg treasury
bills and 72 mln stg bank bills at 9-7/8 pct together with 117
mln stg band two bank bills at 9-13/16 pct.
    This brings total money market help so far today to 241 mln
stg and compares with the Bank's revised estimate of a 350 mln
stg shortfall.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9864>
Treasury Assistant Secretary David
Mulford reaffirmed U.S. backing for the Paris Agreement among
six industrial nations to cooperate closely to foster exchange
rate stability around current levels.
    In testimony prepared for delivery before a Senate banking
subcommittee, Mulford said there was broad recognition in Paris
that "further substantial exchange rate shifts could damage
growth and adjustment prospects."
    But he also said while there are clear understandings among
the countries regarding cooperation, "We have refrained from
establishing a system of target zones or ranges."
    Mulford also said the six nations have not spelled out the
way in which they intend to deal with possible market
developments.
    He said governments must retain flexibility in dealing with
exchange market pressures and efforts to establish rigid
exchange rate objectives "or to specify too precisely the goals
of intervention" would hurt official attempts to react to
market pressures, he said.
    Accordingly, Mulford said setting specific currency
objectives and intervention to achieve those objectives would
be counterproductive.
    Commenting on the trade deficit, Mulford reiterated the
Treasury position that the current account deficit will decline
from 148 billion dlrs last year to around 130 billion dlrs this
year, due to the exchange rate adjustments of the past 18
months.
    But he added trade imbalances would also be corrected by
commitments from West Germany and Japan to stimulate their
economies and by U.S. efforts to cut the budget deficit and
enhance U.S. competitiveness.
    He also said some newly industrialized countries should let
their currencies appreciate.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9871>
The Bank of France intervened on the
market to buy dollars and sell yen to support the U.S.
Currency, dealers said.
    A major French bank said it acted for the central bank in
buying between five and 15 mln dlrs against yen.
    A dealer at another bank said his bank had been asked to
publicise the intervention, to send a clear signal to the
markets that central banks were acting in concert to maintain
the exchange rates agreed to be appropriate at last month's
meeting of the Group of Five and Canada in Paris.
    The dollar was being quoted at 6.0950/70 francs in early
afternoon dealings after a fix of 6.09425 francs.
    The major French bank said it sold yen at a rate of 149.28
against the dollar.
    The U.S. Currency was subsequently being quoted at
149.25/35.
    The Bank of Japan was reported in the market overnight to
bolster the credibility of the Paris accord following several
days of pressure against the dollar.
    Pressure developed after U.S. Treasury Secretary James
Baker repeated earlier statements that the Reagan
administration had no targets for the dollar, apparently
undermining the assumption that the agreement in Paris had
fixed broad fluctuation ranges for major currencies.
    Baker later said his remark had been misinterpreted.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9880>
The Bank of England said it provided
about 25 mln stg in late help to the money market, bringing the
total assistance today to 266 mln stg.
    This compares with the bank's revised estimate of a 350 mln
stg money market shortfall.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9923>
Treasury Assistant Secretary David
Mulford said the Paris agreement among leading industrial
nations is intended to produce "reasonable stability" in exchange
markets over the next few months.
    He told a Senate Banking subcommittee the Group of Five
nations and Canada agreed in Paris to "see if there can't be a
period of reasonable stability instead of volatility" to give
time for the committments in Paris to take place.
    Asked by Sen Phil Gramm (R-Tex) whether U.S. intervention
was not in fact overvaluing the dollar, Mulford replied that
the administration judged that after economic adjustments,
current exchange rates reflect underlying economic
fundamentals.
    In particular, the stability sought by the nations would
allow West Germany and Japan to stimulate their economies
domestically and the U.S. to cut its budget deficit, Mulford
said in his testimony.
    He stressed that a further sharp fall in the dollar would
hurt the ability of Germany and Japan to boost growth.
    Mulford noted that half of West Germany's economy was
affected by international developments.
    He also said increased Japanese domestic growth would
result in more U.S. exports to Japan and would not necessarily
lead to greater Japanese capital flows to the U.S., as Gramm
asserted, if Japan reformed its domestic capital market.
    Commenting on the Paris agreement, Mulford said, "I think
exchange rates ought to be stabilized so (Germany's and
Japan's) efforts can be carried out.
    Mulford rejected Gramm's argument that faster domestic
growth in Germany and Japan would result in an even lower
dollar.
    Mulford said the administration wanted to achieve a pattern
of higher growth overseas as a way of improving the U.S. trade
deficit.
    Otherwise, he said, the trade deficit would be resolved
either through a much lower dollar or a U.S. recession, both
alternatives he termed unacceptable and undesirable.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9946>
The Bank of France intervened to buy
small amounts of dollars and sell yen in Paris today to
stabilise the exchange rates agreed at last month's meeting of
Finance Ministers of the Group of Five and Canada, foreign
exchange dealers said.
    But they said recent central bank intervention in the
foreign exchange markets appeared to be a limited reaction to
temporary pressures rather than a major defence operation.
    A Bank of France spokesman declined all comment but sources
close to the central bank said it had also intervened
yesterday.
    Dealers said the earlier intervention was in concert with
the Bundesbank and Bank of Japan.
    The sources said the French central bank could have been in
the market again today in two-way operations, not necessarily
on its own account, but to counter short-term pressures arising
from the end of the Japanese financial year on March 31.
    One major French bank said it bought between five and 15
mln dlrs for the central bank and sold yen at 149.28 to the
dollar.
    Another bank said it had been asked by the Bank of France
to say it was in the market, a departure from the central
bank's usual insistence on confidentiality.
    But other banks said they had seen no sign of intervention,
which they said appeared to be on a very limited scale.
    "Even if 10 banks were buying five to 15 mln dlrs, you would
still be talking of a small overall amount," said one dealer.
    Recent intervention by the Bank of Japan appeared mainly to
have been required to meet year-end window dressing demand for
yen. "This is a specific short term phenomenon rather than a
wider trend," the dealer said.
    Operators have been extremely cautious about testing the
dollar's trading ranges against the West German mark and
Japanese yen.
    These ranges were set in February's stabilisation agreement
reached here by U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker and the
Finance Ministers of Japan, Germany, France, Britain and
Canada.
    But speculative pressures started to build again this week
after Baker was quoted on British television at the weekend as
repeating earlier statements that Washington had no target for
the dollar.
    Baker yesterday moved to defuse speculation he was talking
the dollar down, telling a Cable News Network interviewer and a
Senate committee he stood by the Paris agreement. Foreign
exchange markets had been misreading his comments, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9957>
Treasury Assistant Secretary David
Mulford said he did not believe that West Germany and Japan
have yet carried out their international responsibilities.
    "I do not believe they have up to this time," Mulford told
a Senate banking subcommittee.
    He said that for the U.S. trade deficit to continue
improving in the next two years, "We need more policy actions"
across the entire front of U.S. trade relations, including
Canada and the newly-industrialized countries (NICS).
    In particular, he said, efforts by South Korea and Taiwan
to strengthen their currencies were still disappointing.
    Mulford also said that OECD nations need to grow an average
three pct to help resolve the international debt crisis.
    He noted that Japanese and European imports from Latin
nations were significantly smaller than imports into the U.S.
    He stressed both Germany and Japan must continue to take
economic and structural measures to ensure stronger sustained
economic growth.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9975>
The Bundesbank's options for West
Germany monetary policy are limited for the foreseeable future
by the delicate stage of wage negotiations between unions and
employers, economists and money market dealers said.
    Call money fell in quite active trading today, dropping to
3.40/50 pct from 3.55/65 pct yesterday, and below the 3.50 pct
treasury bill rate as a difficult month-end approached.
    But dealers and economists said the Bundesbank was unlikely
to encourage lower rates in the foreseeable future largely for
fear of upsetting the current wage round.
    One money market dealer for a major foreign bank said, "I
don't think the Bundesbank wants rates to go up whatever
happens. But it also does not want them to fall. Above all it
wants to wait to see how the unions wage round goes."
    In West Germany, unions and employers prepare the ground
for triennial wage negotiations based on detailed assessments
of growth and inflation, economists said.
    Ute Geipel, economist with Citibank AG, said if the
Bundesbank became more accommodating in monetary policy,
raising fears in some quarters of a return in inflation in the
medium term, unions would be obliged to curtail wage demands.
    As a result the Bundesbank was concerned to make no move
that would interfere in the negotiating process, Geipel said.
    In the current round, the country's most powerful union,
the IG Metall representing metalworkers and engineers, is
demanding a shortening of the working week to 35 hours from the
present 38-1/2 and an accompanying five pct increase in wages.
    The engineering employers' association, Gesamtmetall, is
offering to bring in a 38-hour-week from July 1, 1988, and give
a two stage wage increase -- a 2.7 pct rise from April 1 this
year and another 1.5 pct from July 1, 1988.
    The agreement forged by IG Metall -- Europe's largest
union, with 2.5 mln members -- and the employers would set the
benchmark for settlements in other industries such as the
public sector, banks and federal post office. Negotiations
began in December and unions are hopeful they may conclude by
early April, ahead of the traditional holiday period in June.
    Though many economists said the unions' current warning
strikes and rhetoric were part of the negotiating strategy and
would not lead to a repeat of 1984's damaging seven-week
strikes, others said unions would not compromise greatly on
their positions and there could still be conflict.
    This could extend the length of time in which the
Bundesbank would keep its activity low-key, economists said.
    The money market head said the unions' humiliation by the
protracted financial problems of the Neue Heimat cooperative
housing venture would contribute to union obstinacy.
    "The unions haven't forgotten that and they will put this
squarely onto the account in the negotiations," he said.
    In addition, the newly-elected chairman of the IG Metall
union, Franz Steinkuehler, was more radical and determined than
his predecessor Hans Meyer and may be set for a longer battle
to achieve the best possible settlement for his membership.
    More than 16,000 engineering workers at 45 firms, mainly in
south Germany, held warning strikes lasting up to two hours
yesterday. Firms hit included Zahnradfabrik Passau GmbH and
aerospace group Messerschmitt-Boelkow-Blohm GmbH.
    Today, 28,000 employees from 110 companies came out in
warning strikes, a statement from IG Metall said.
    Money market dealers said that overnight call money rates
would rise in the near future in any case and did not depend on
a politically-inhibited Bundesbank.
    About eight billion marks were coming into the market
tomorrow from salary payments by the federal government.
    As a result, some banks fell back on the Bundesbank's offer
to mop up liquidity via the sale of three-day treasury bills,
anticipating still lower rates before the month-end.
    But a pension payment date by banks on behalf of customers
was due on Monday, other dealers noted. If banks were short of
liquidity until the bills matured on Tuesday, rates could soar,
perhaps to the 5.50 pct Lombard ceiling.
    Banks were well stocked up with funds, having an average
52.1 billion marks in Bundesbank minimum reserves in the first
24 days of March, well above the 50.7 billion requirement.
 REUTER
</BODY>
